Star Wars: Labyrinth of Evil 

Darkness was encroaching on Cato Neimoidia’s western
hemisphere, though exchanges of coherent light high above the
beleaguered world ripped looming night to shreds. Well under the
fractured sky, in an orchard of manax trees that studded the lower
ramparts of Viceroy Gunray’s majestic redoubt, companies of clone
troopers and battle droids were slaughtering one another with
bloodless precision.
A flashing fan of blue energy lit the undersides of a cluster of trees:
the lightsaber of Obi-Wan Kenobi.
Attacked by two sentry droids, Obi-Wan stood his ground, twisting
his upraised blade right and left to swat blaster bolts back at his
enemies. Caught midsection by their own salvos, both droids came
apart, with a scattering of alloy limbs.
Obi-Wan moved again.
Tumbling under the segmented thorax of a Neimoidian harvester
beetle, he sprang to his feet and raced forward. Explosive light
shunted from the citadel’s deflector shield dappled the loamy ground
between the trees, casting long shadows of their buttressed trunks.
Oblivious to the chaos occurring in their midst, columns of the fivemeter-long harvesters continued their stalwart march toward a
mound that supported the fortress. In their cutting jaws or on their
upsweeping backs they carried cargoes of pruned foliage. The
crushing sounds of their ceaseless gnawing provided an eerie
cadence to the rumbling detonations and the hiss and whine of
blaster bolts.
From off to Obi-Wan’s left came a sudden click of servos; to his
right, a hushed cry of warning.
“Down, Master!”
He dropped into a crouch even before Anakin’s lips formed the
final word, lightsaber aimed to the ground to keep from impaling his
onrushing former Padawan. A blur of thrumming blue energy sizzled
through the humid air, followed by a sharp smell of cauterized
circuitry, the tang of ozone. A blaster discharged into soft soil, then
the stalked, elongated head of a battle droid struck the ground not a
meter from Obi-Wan’s feet, sparking as it bounced and rolled out of
sight, repeating: “Roger, roger … Roger, roger …”
In a tuck, Obi-Wan pivoted on his right foot in time to see the
droid’s spindly body collapse. The fact that Anakin had saved his life
was nothing new, but Anakin’s blade had passed a little too close for
comfort. Eyes somewhat wide with surprise, he came to his feet.
“You nearly took my head off.”
Anakin held his blade to one side. In the strobing light of battle his
blue eyes shone with wry amusement. “Sorry, Master, but your head
was where my lightsaber needed to go.”
Master.
Anakin used the honorific not as learner to teacher, but as Jedi
Knight to Jedi Council member. The braid that had defined his
earlier status had been ritually severed after his audacious actions at
Praesitlyn. His tunic, knee-high boots, and tight-fitting trousers were
as black as the night. His face scarred from a contest with Dookutrained Asajj Ventress. His mechanical right hand sheathed in an
elbow-length glove. He had let his hair grow long the past few
months, falling almost to his shoulders now. His face he kept cleanshaven, unlike Obi-Wan, whose strong jaw was defined by a short
beard.
“I suppose I should be grateful your lightsaber needed to go there,
rather than desired to.”
Anakin’s grin blossomed into a full-fledged smile. “Last time I
checked we were on the same side, Master.”
“Still, if I’d been a moment slower …”
Anakin booted the battle droid’s blaster aside. “Your fears are only
in your mind.”
Obi-Wan scowled. “Without a head I wouldn’t have much mind
left, now, would I?” He swept his lightsaber in a flourishing pass,
nodding up the alley of manax trees. “After you.”
They resumed their charge, moving with the supernatural speed
and grace afforded by the Force, Obi-Wan’s brown cloak swirling
behind him. Victims of the initial bombardment, scores of battle
droids lay sprawled on the ground. Others dangled like broken
marionettes from the branches of the trees into which they had been
hurled.
Areas of the leafy canopy were in flames.
Two scorched droids little more than arms and torsos lifted their
weapons as the Jedi approached, but Anakin only raised his left hand
in a Force push that shoved the droids flat onto their backs.
They jinked right, somersaulting under the wide bodies of two
harvester beetles, then hurdling a tangle of barbed underbrush that
had managed to anchor itself in the otherwise meticulously tended
orchard. They emerged from the tree line at the shore of a broad
irrigation canal, fed by a lake that delimited the Neimoidians’ citadel
on three sides. In the west a trio of wedge-shaped Venator-class
assault cruisers hung in scudding clouds. North and east the sky was
in turmoil, crosshatched with ion trails, turbolaser beams, hyphens
of scarlet light streaming upward from weapons emplacements
outside the citadel’s energy shield. Rising from high ground at the
end of the peninsula, the tiered fastness was reminiscent of the
command towers of the Trade Federation core ships, and indeed had
been the inspiration for them.
Somewhere inside, trapped by Republic forces, were the Trade
Federation elite.
With his homeworld threatened and the purse worlds of Deko and
Koru Neimoidia devastated, Viceroy Gunray would have been wiser
to retreat to the Outer Rim, as other members of the Separatist
Council were thought to be doing. But rational thinking had never
been a Neimoidian strong suit, especially when possessions
remained on Cato Neimoidia the viceroy apparently couldn’t live
without. Backed by a battle group of Federation warships, he had
slipped onto Cato Neimoidia, intent on looting the citadel before it
fell. But Republic forces had been lying in wait, eager to capture him
alive and bring him to justice—thirteen years late, in the judgment of
many.
Cato Neimoidia was as close to Coruscant as Obi-Wan and Anakin
had been in almost four standard months, and with the last
remaining Separatist strongholds now cleared from the Core and
Colonies, they expected to be back in the Outer Rim by week’s end.
Obi-Wan heard movement on the far side of the irrigation canal.
An instant later, four clone troopers crept from the tree line on the
opposite bank to take up firing positions amid the water-smoothed
rocks that lined the ditch. Far behind them a crashed gunship was
burning. Protruding from the canopy, the LAAT’s blunt tail was
stenciled with the eight-rayed battle standard of the Galactic
Republic.
A gunboat glided into view from downstream, maneuvering to
where the Jedi were waiting. Standing in the bow, a clone
commander named Cody waved hand signals to the troopers on
shore and to others in the gunboat, who immediately fanned out to
create a safe perimeter.
Troopers could communicate with one another through the
comlinks built into their T-visored helmets, but the Advanced Recon
Commando teams had created an elaborate system of gestures meant
to thwart enemy attempts at eavesdropping.
A few nimble leaps brought Cody face-to-face with Obi-Wan and
Anakin.
“Sirs, I have the latest from airborne command.”
“Show us,” Anakin said.
Cody dropped to one knee, his right hand activating a device built
into his left wrist gauntlet. A cone of blue light emanated from the
device, and a hologram of task force commander Dodonna resolved.
“Generals Kenobi and Skywalker, provincial recon unit reports
that Viceroy Gunray and his entourage are making their way to the
north side of the redoubt. Our forces have been hammering at the
shield from above and from points along the shore, but the shield
generator is in a hardened site, and difficult to get at. Gunships are
taking heavy fire from turbolaser cannons in the lower ramparts. If
your team is still committed to taking Gunray alive, you’re going to
have to skirt those defenses and find an alternative way into the
palace. At this point we cannot reinforce, repeat, cannot reinforce.”
Obi-Wan looked at Cody when the hologram had faded.
“Suggestions, Commander?”
Cody made an adjustment to the wrist projector, and a 3-D
schematic of the redoubt formed in midair. “Assuming that Gunray’s
fortress is similar to what we found on Deko and Koru, the
underground levels will contain fungus farms and processing and
shipment areas. There will be access from the shipping areas into the
midlevel grub hatcheries, and from the hatcheries we’ll be able to
infiltrate the upper reaches.”
Cody carried a short-stocked DC-15 blaster rifle and wore the
white armor and imaging system helmet that had come to symbolize
the Grand Army of the Republic—grown, nurtured, and trained on
the remote world of Kamino, three years earlier. Just now, though,
areas of white showed only where there were no smears of mud or
dried blood, no gouges, abrasions, or charred patches. Cody’s
position was designated by orange markings on his helmet crest and
shoulder guards. His upper right arm bore stripes signifying
campaigns in which he had participated: Aagonar, Praesitlyn,
Paracelus Minor, Antar 4, Tibrin, Skor II, and dozens of other worlds
from Core to Outer Rim.
Over the years Obi-Wan had formed battlefield partnerships with
several Advanced Recon Commandos—Alpha, with whom he had
been imprisoned on Rattatak, and Jangotat, on Ord Cestus. Earlygeneration ARCs had received training by the Mandalorian clone
template, Jango Fett. While the Kaminoans had managed to breed
some of Fett out of the regulars, they had been more selective in the
case of the ARCs. As a consequence, ARCs displayed more individual
initiative and leadership abilities. In short, they were more like the
late bounty hunter himself, which was to say, more human. While
Cody wasn’t genetically an Advanced Recon Commando, he had ARC
training and shared many ARC attributes.
In the initial stages of the war, clone troopers were treated no
differently from the war machines they piloted or the weapons they
fired. To many they had more in common with battle droids poured
by the tens of thousands from Baktoid Armor Workshops on a host
of Separatist-held worlds. But attitudes began to shift as more and
more troopers died. The clones’ unfaltering dedication to the
Republic, and to the Jedi, showed them to be true comrades in arms,
and deserving of all the respect and compassion they were now
afforded. It was the Jedi themselves, in addition to other
progressive-thinking officials in the Republic, who had urged that
second- and third-generation troopers be given names rather than
numbers, to foster a growing fellowship.
“I agree that we can probably reach the upper levels, Commander,”
Obi-Wan said at last. “But how do you propose we reach the fungus
farms to begin with?”
Cody stood to his full height and pointed toward the orchards. “We
go in with the harvesters.”
Obi-Wan glanced uncertainly at Anakin and motioned him off to
one side.
“It’s just the two of us. What do you think?”
“I think you worry too much, Master.”
Obi-Wan folded his arms across his chest. “And who’ll worry about
you if I don’t?”
Anakin canted his head and grinned. “There are others.”
“You can only be referring to See-Threepio. And you had to build
him.”
“Think what you will.”
Obi-Wan narrowed his eyes with purpose. “Oh, I see. But I would
have thought Senator Amidala of greater interest to you than
Supreme Chancellor Palpatine.” Before Anakin could respond, he
added: “Despite that she’s a politician also.”
“Don’t think I haven’t tried to attract her interest, Master.”
Obi-Wan regarded Anakin for a moment. “What’s more, if
Chancellor Palpatine had genuine concern for your welfare, he would
have kept you closer to Coruscant.”
Anakin placed his artificial hand on Obi-Wan’s left shoulder.
“Perhaps, Master. But then, who would look after you?”
Despite their two pairs of powerful legs and the saw-toothed
pincers that extended from their lower mandibles, the broad-bodied
harvesters were single-minded creatures, complaisant except when
threatened directly. From their flat heads sprouted looping
antennae, which served not only as feelers, but also as organs of
communication, by means of powerful pheromones. Each beetle was
capable of carrying five times its considerable weight in foliage and
branches. Similar to the Neimoidians who had domesticated them,
their society was hierarchical, and included laborers, harvesters,
soldiers, and breeders, all of whom served a distant queen that
rewarded effort with food.
Obi-Wan, Anakin, and the commandos who made up Squad Seven
had to run to keep up with the beetles as they hurried their freshpicked loads from the orchard to the cave-like entrance to a natural
mound at the base of the redoubt. The beetles’ carapaces afforded
them cover from surveillance sorties by battle droid STAP patrols.
More important, the harvesters knew safe routes through mined
stretches of cleared ground that separated the trees from the fortress
itself.
The beetles’ frequent habit of lowering their heads to exchange
information with hivemates moving in the opposite direction
demanded that the Jedi and troopers keep between the harvesters’
rear legs. Hunched over, Obi-Wan ran with his lightsaber in hand
but deactivated. As the shielded royal residence came into view, a
certain uneasiness seemed to take hold of the creatures, disrupting
the ordered nature of their columns. Obi-Wan suspected that
outbound beetles were relaying accounts of potential perils to the
nest posed by the Republic’s unrelenting barrage. In response to the
crisis, soldier beetles were joining the procession, quick to shepherd
nervous strays back into line.
Anakin’s greater height required him to remain farther back,
almost directly under the beetle’s pug tail. To Obi-Wan’s right ran
Cody, with his teammates trailing behind and flanking him.
Soldier beetles or no, discipline was breaking down fast.
A harvester providing cover for one of the commandos veered from
the column before it could be guided back into line. Instead of
hurrying under another beetle, the commando stuck with the stray,
and quickly found himself out in open ground.
Obi-Wan felt a ripple in the Force an instant before the harvester’s
right foreleg tripped a land mine.
A potent explosion fountained from the rocky ground, blowing
away half the creature’s foreleg. The commando threw himself to one
side, rolling out from under a trio now of pounding legs, only to have
to bob and weave as the harvester began to run in frantic circles,
seemingly determined to trample the commando underfoot. A
glancing blow from the beetle’s left rear leg tipped the commando off
his feet. Confused, the harvester lowered its head and butted at the
hard white object in its path, again and again, until there wasn’t a
smooth area left in the commando’s armor.
The harvester’s distress was having an impact on the rest of the
beetles, as well.
While most were pressed tightly together, others were suddenly
scurrying away from the main column, sending the soldier beetles to
high alert. Tripping two mines in succession, a second harvester was
lifted off the ground by the ensuing explosions. With that, the
column dissolved into disorder, with harvesters and soldiers running
every which way, and commandos and Jedi alike doing their best to
protect themselves.
“Stay close to the ones who are still headed for the nest!” Anakin
shouted.
Obi-Wan was doing just that when he noticed that the trampled
commando was back on his feet and staggering toward him, tapping
the side of his helmet with the palm of his gloved hand, and
obviously indifferent to where he placed his booted feet. Barreling
straight for the maw of the mound, a harvester bore down on the
commando, clamping its pincers around his waist, then lifting him
high into the air. Summoning the last of his reserves, the commando
twisted his body back and forth, but was unable to break free.
All at once Anakin was out from under his protective harvester.
Lightsaber tight in his gloved hand, he bounded across the
denuded landscape toward the captive commando, the Force guiding
him to safe landings among the mines. The harvesters might have
taken him for a demented turfjumper were they not so fixed on
safeguarding their loads and reaching the security of the nest.
Anakin’s final leap dropped him directly in front of the harvester
that had seized the commando. With one upward stroke of his
lightsaber he rid the beetle of its pincers, freeing the commando, but
also sending the soldier beetles into a frenzy. Obi-Wan could almost
smell the pheromone release, and decipher the information being
exchanged: The area is rife with predators!
From the brood rose a shriek so high-pitched as to be barely
audible, and a stampede was under way. Mines began to detonate to
all sides, and out from billowing smoke above the orchard canopy
swarmed more than a hundred STAPs.
A Neimoidian version of the agile repulsorlift airhook used as an
observation vehicle throughout the galaxy, each Single Trooper
Aerial Platform was equipped with twin blasters that delivered more
firepower than the stubby-barreled models carried by infantry
droids.
From maximum range the swarm rained energy bolts on
everything in sight, dropping harvesters in their tracks and turning
the rocky ground into a killing field. Explosions erupted in jagged
lines as scores of mines were detonated. Supporting the commando
trooper with his left arm, Anakin warded off blaster bolts on the run.
The rest of Squad Seven supplied cover, blowing STAPs out of the
sky with uninterrupted fire.
Cody motioned everyone into a shallow irrigation trench just short
of the mound. By the time Obi-Wan arrived, the troopers were
deployed in a circle, and continuing to pour fire into the sky. Anakin
slid into the trench a moment later, lowering the commando gently
to the muddy slope. Squad Seven’s medical specialist crawled over,
removing the commando’s ravaged utility belt and deeply dented
helmet.
Obi-Wan gazed at the face of the injured clone.
A face he would never forget; now a face he couldn’t forget.
All these years later, he could still recall his brief conversation with
Jango Fett, on Kamino. He glanced at Cody and the rest. An army of
one man … But the right man for the job.
The clones’ rallying cry.
The injured commando had already prompted his armor to inject
him with painkillers, so he remained pliant while his chest plastron
was removed and the black bodyglove undergarment knifed open.
The harvester’s pincers had crushed the armor into the commando’s
abdomen. His skin was intact, but the bruising was severe.
With only half the original army of 1.2 million in fighting shape,
the life of every clone was vital. Blood and replacement organs—what
the regular troopers referred to as “spare parts”—were readily
available—“easily requisitioned”—but with the war reaching a
crescendo, battlefield casualties were on the rise and treated as high
priority.
“Not much I can do for him here,” the medspec told Anakin.
“Maybe if we can get an FX-Seven air-dropped—”
“We don’t need a droid,” Anakin interrupted. Kneeling, he placed
his hands on the injured commando’s abdomen and used a Jedi
healing technique to keep the clone from going into deep shock.
A sudden noise from above caught everyone’s attention.
Scores of boulder-sized objects were spewing from openings in the
lower ramparts of the fortress. Cody pressed a pair of
macrobinoculars to his eyes and gazed upward.
“That’s no ordinary avalanche,” he said, passing the glasses to ObiWan.
Obi-Wan raised the glasses and waited for the lens to autofocus.
Rolling toward the trench at better than eighty kilometers per hour
were some of the most feared of the Separatists’ infantry arsenal.
Droidekas.
Known also by the fearsome title destroyer droids, droidekas were
rapid-deployment killing machines produced by an alien species that
encouraged mayhem at every opportunity. A combination of sheer
momentum and sequenced microrepulsors allowed the bronziumarmored droids to roll like balls then unfurl in a blink as tripoded
gunfighters, shielded by individual deflectors and armed with paired,
twin-barreled, high-output blasters.
Since the shields were powerful enough to resist lightsabers,
blasters, even light artillery bolts, the proven strategy for dealing
with droidekas was simply to run from them.
More so, because surrender was never an option.
But Anakin had another idea.
“Comm fire support for an artillery strike,” he ordered Cody, loud
enough to be heard above STAP and DC-15 fire. “Do it now.”
Cody was more than willing to comply. After all, the order had
come directly from “the Hero with no Fear,” as Anakin was
sometimes known. “The Warrior of the Infinite.” There was, though,
a chain of command to maintain, so Cody looked to Obi-Wan for
confirmation.
Obi-Wan nodded. “Do as he says.”
The commando called for his comm specialist, who splashed
through the shallow water and flattened himself alongside Cody.
When the spec had provided needed coordinates, Cody opened a
frequency to the fire support base and spoke in a rush.
“To FSB from Squad Seven. We’re taking continuous fire from
STAPs in sector Jenth-Bacta-Ion, and are about to be buried under
destroyer droids deployed from the redoubt. Request immediate
artillery support at coordinates accompanying transmission.
Recommend tactical electromagnetic pulse airburst, followed by
SPHA-T barrage.”
“Pulse weapons don’t discriminate, Commander,” Obi-Wan
thought to point out.
Cody shrugged. “It’s the only way, sir.”
“Tell them we’ve got a wounded trooper for the Rimsoo,” Anakin
said. The term stood for “Republic Mobile Surgical Unit.”
Cody relayed the message. “Warn the evac pilot that he’ll be setting
down in a hot area. We’ll mark a safe landing zone with smoke, and
leave two behind to assist.”
The assistant squad leader moved his right hand through a series
of gestures. When the gestures had been repeated down the line, the
commandos removed their helmets and began to deactivate the
electronic systems built into their armor.
To a clone, they hunkered down in the fetid water.
A screaming came from the south.
Then: a nova-bright flare of white light, followed two seconds later
by a roar that turned Obi-Wan’s eardrums to mush. A shock wave
spread from the ramparts, down onto the clear ground at the foot of
the mound and out over the already blazing orchards. Above the
trench, half the droidekas deployed prematurely from ball position
and began to tumble down the slope in a tangle of limbs and
weapons. Behind the trench, STAPs fell like stones, plunging from
the sky into the burning trees.
What harvesters remained alive ran in dizzying circles, spilling
their precious loads.
Now from the south came an infernal wail as SPHA-Ts—the
Republic’s walking artillery—loosed lasers on those droidekas that
had survived the pulse weapon. Deprived of shields and unable to
fire, they melted like wax in the gushes of radiant energy that struck
the slopes.
Still without helmet, Cody stood up, signaling with both hands.
Obi-Wan interpreted the gestures: Sixty count, then suit up and
break for the entrance to the nest.
He prepared by calming himself.
For all their reliance on droids, for all their infatuation with high
technology, for all their inborn cowardice, greed, and guile,
Neimoidians had a soft spot for their youth—their seven formative
years as grubs, struggling for limited food in communal hives,
discovering early on the benefits of duplicity and self-regard. The
fungus foodstuff of those early years was as dear to them as adults as
it was to them as hatchlings, and no wonder, since it was that same
fungus that had found favor with species galaxywide, and from which
the Neimoidians had evolved into a wealthy, spacefaring society,
with ships enough to attract the eye of the notorious Trade
Federation and, ultimately, droids enough to equal an army.
It would have been natural to assume that the fungus—prized for
its medicinal as well as nutritional value—was somehow concocted
from manax foliage gathered by the harvesters. But in fact the leaves
and branches provided little more than a growth medium. Enzymes
produced by the beetles, coupled with the dank conditions within the
burrows and grottoes of the nest mounds, encouraged the rapid
growth of a product that required only a modicum of refinement to
become palatable.
Elsewhere during the sieges of Deko and Koru Neimoidia, ObiWan had never visited a fungus farm, but no sooner had he and
Anakin dashed through the cave-like opening to the nest than the
briefings he had received more than ten standard years earlier came
back to him in a flash.
Here were the partly masticated leaves, carefully arranged in
layers; the clumps of branches and other impurities; the laborer
beetles; the droid overseers; the conveyors and similar contraptions
devoted to sorting and transport … Not a Neimoidian in sight, but
that was consistent with their doctrine that exertion of any sort was
anathema. In the deep recesses of the mound, untouched by
sunlight, the starter fungi—molds, mildews, and sickly white
mushrooms—would be undergoing treatments with natural and
synthetic growth-acceleration agents. And higher up, in what
constituted the basement of the citadel, the matured end product
was probably being consumed by grubs, or packed and readied for
shipment.
Cody ordered the squad to secure the area. Those in the rear were
still taking sporadic fire from STAPs, but the droid pilots couldn’t get
close to the entrance because of the bodies of dead beetles piled
outside.
Squad Seven’s medspec hurried over to Obi-Wan and Anakin.
“Sirs, I recommend you keep your rebreathers close at hand. Odds
are we won’t have to penetrate any deeper into the nest, but there’s
always a chance of encountering free-floating spores in other areas.”
Obi-Wan quirked his brows together. “Toxic, Sergeant?”
“No, sir. But the spores have been known to have an adverse effect
on humans.”
“Adverse how?” Anakin asked.
“The effect is most often described as ‘dislocating,’ sir.”
Obi-Wan glanced at Anakin. “Then I suggest we do as he says.”
The fingers of his left hand were prizing the small, twin-tanked
rebreather from its pouch on his utility belt when a volley of blaster
bolts streaked into the grotto. Caught in their upper chests, two
troopers were knocked off their feet.
The source of the sudden fire was the mouth of a narrow side
tunnel that could be sealed by an overhead door. Anakin was already
racing for the tunnel, lightsaber gripped in both hands, deflecting
most of the bolts back through the entrance.
Obi-Wan leapt to one side, raising his blade to deal with two bolts
that got past Anakin. The first he returned toward its source; the
second, he parried at a deliberately downward angle. Striking the
grotto’s hard-packed floor, the deflected bolt ricocheted to one wall,
then to the ceiling, to the other wall, and back to the floor, from
which it caromed squarely into the control panel that operated the
tunnel door.
Showering sparks, the device shorted out, and a slab of thick alloy
dropped from its pocket in the wall, sealing the tunnel with a loud
thud!
Switching off his lightsaber, Anakin cast a complimentary glance
over his shoulder.
“Nicely done, Master.”
“The beauty of Form Three,” Obi-Wan said with theatrical
nonchalance. “You should try it sometime.”
“You’ve always been better at evasion than I have,” Anakin said. “I
prefer more straightforward tactics.”
Obi-Wan rolled his eyes. “Master of understatement.”
“General Kenobi,” the comm spec said from across the grotto.
“Provincial recon reports that Viceroy Gunray and his entourage are
heading for the launching bays. They’re protected by super battle
droids, a group of which are now closing on our position.”
Anakin swung to Obi-Wan. “One of us has to divert the droids.”
“One of us,” Obi-Wan repeated. “Haven’t we been through this
before?”
“The beauty of our partnership, Master. You lure the bodyguards
away, I capture Gunray. It hasn’t failed us yet, has it?”
Obi-Wan compressed his lips. “From a certain point of view,
Anakin.”
Anakin scowled. “Fine. Then I’ll be the bait this time.”
“That makes no sense,” Obi-Wan said quickly, shaking his head.
“We play to our separate strengths.”
Anakin couldn’t restrain a smile. “I knew you’d listen to reason,
Master.” He singled out four commandos. “You’ll come with me.”
“Sir!” they said in unison.
Obi-Wan, Cody, and the rest of Squad Seven set out for the
turbolift shafts. Obi-Wan hadn’t gone five meters when he stopped
and swung around.
“Anakin, I know we’ve got a score to settle with Gunray, but don’t
make it personal. We want to take him alive!”
Oh, but it is personal, Anakin told himself while he watched ObiWan, Cody, and four troopers disappear into the turbolift.
It was personal because of what Nute Gunray had done to Naboo
thirteen years ago.
It was personal because of Gunray’s hiring of Jango Fett to
assassinate Padmé three years ago—first with a bomb planted on her
ship, then with the pair of kouhuns a changling had inserted into
Padmé’s Senatorial quarters on Coruscant.
The woman Anakin loved above all else. His wife. The deepest
though brightest of his secrets. Even Obi-Wan didn’t know, for that
would have created problems.
Finally, it was personal because of all that had occurred on
Geonosis: the mock trial, the sentencing, the executions that were to
have taken place in the arena …
Even if he could put all that aside, as Obi-Wan plainly wanted him
to do, it was personal because Gunray had aligned himself with
Dooku and the Separatists, and the war they had planned from the
start had brought ruin to a thousand worlds.
The deaths of the Separatist leaders was the only solution now. It
had always been the solution, despite objections by certain members
of the Jedi Council, who still believed in peaceful resolutions. Despite
the Senate’s attempts to bind the hands of Supreme Chancellor
Palpatine, so that corrupt politicians could continue to turn a profit.
Line the pockets of their shimmersilk cloaks with kickbacks from the
immoral corporations that funded the war machine. Supplying both
sides with weapons, ships, whatever was needed to extend the
conflict.
It made Anakin’s blood boil.
Yes, just as Yoda had sensed after Qui-Gon Jinn and Obi-Wan had
freed him from slavery on Tatooine and brought him to the Jedi
Temple, he had a lot of anger in him. But what Yoda failed to realize
was that anger could be a kind of fuel. In peaceful times Anakin
might have been able to bridle his rage, but now he relied on it to
drive him forward, to transform him into the person he needed to be.
Cut off the head.
Twice he might have been able to kill Dooku himself had Obi-Wan
not held him back. But he didn’t hold that against his former Master.
For all his skills, Anakin still looked to Obi-Wan for guidance.
On occasion.
As he and the four troopers were exiting the grotto, the tip of his
boot sent some object skittering across the floor. On the fly he used
the Force to call the thing to his left hand and realized that it was
Obi-Wan’s rebreather, which must have fallen from its utility pouch
during the brief exchange with the unseen battle droids. But no
matter; Obi-Wan was probably already in the lower levels of the
redoubt, where there would be little need for the device.
Opening one of the pouches on his belt, Anakin wedged the
rebreather inside.
He urged the troopers on, and they stayed close on his heels.
Upward: following burrows, ramps, and shafts used only by
droids. Through processing and shipment areas, through hatcheries
filled with squealing grubs. Upward: into the citadel’s gleaming
middle levels. Through rooms large as starship docking bays filled
floor to ceiling with … stuff. A boundless collection of junk, ritual
gifts, impulsive purchases. Thousands of faddish devices never to be
used but too prized as possessions to be thrown out, donated,
handed down, or destroyed. More technology than existed on entire
worlds, hoarded, stacked, piled about, crammed into every available
space.
Anakin could only shake his head in wonder. In Mos Espa, on
Tatooine, he and his mother had lived simply, and never wanted for
anything.
His grin was short-lived.
Anger and despair made him grit his teeth.
Upward: until they reached the citadel’s semicircular projection of
launching bays, which overlooked the surrounding lake and a ridge
of forested mountains.
Anakin brought his team to a halt. One of the commandos held up
his hand, palm outward, then tapped the side of his helmet to
indicate an incoming transmission. The commando listened, then
spoke to Anakin with hand signals.
Gunray’s party is nearby.
“They’re testing escape vectors for the shuttle by lowering the
defensive shield and launching decoys,” the commando said quietly.
“Turbolaser fire has allowed several of the decoys to get past our
blockade and reach orbiting core ships.”
The muscles in Anakin’s jaw bunched. “Then we have to act
quickly.”
No one contested when Anakin held point position. The
commandos accepted without question that body armor and imaging
systems were primitive compared to the power of the Force. They
moved vigilantly through a maze of elegant corridors, abandoned in
a rush, strewn with belongings dropped during flight.
Approaching an intersection, Anakin made a halting gesture with
his left hand.
He listened for a moment; heard from around the corner the
telltale heavy footfalls of super battle droids. The commando to
Anakin’s left nodded in confirmation, then extended a finger-thin
holocam around the corner and activated his gauntlet holoprojector.
Noisy images of Nute Gunray and his entourage of elite officers
formed in midair. Hurrying down the corridor, tall headpieces
bobbing, rich robes aswirl, safeguarded front and rear by burly battle
droids.
Anakin motioned for silence, and was just about to step into the
intersecting corridor when a banged-up silver protocol droid
appeared from across the hall, raising its hands in delighted surprise.
“Welcome, sirs!” it said loudly. “I can’t tell you how good it is to
find guests in the palace! I am TeeCee-Sixteen and I am at your
service. Nearly everyone has left—because of the invasion, of course
—but I’m sure that we can make you comfortable, and that Viceroy
Gunray will be most pleased—”
One hand clamped over TC-16’s small rectangle of vocabulator, a
commando yanked the droid to one side, but it was too late. Anakin
leapt around the corner in time to see the Neimoidians set off at a
run, red-eyed, flat-nosed Gunray casting a nervous glance over his
shoulder.
As for the super battle droids, they had about-faced and were
marching stiff-legged in Anakin’s direction. Catching sight of him,
their right arms elevated, twisted downward, locked into firing
position.
And the corridor began to fill with blaster bolts.
Qui-Gon Jinn hadn’t believed in baiting, Obi-Wan thought as he
and the commandos rode the turbolift to the fortress’s lowest level.
Baiting implied a certain amount of advance planning, and Qui-Gon
had no patience for that. He took situations as they came, throwing
back his shoulders and striding boldly to the center of things, relying
as much on his instincts as his lightsaber to deal with the
consequences. It must have been difficult for him to have served
under a methodical master such as Dooku, consummate planner,
consummate duelist.
Now a Sith.
But that made sense, of a sort.
The desire to dominate and control.
For a time the same issues had stood at the center of Obi-Wan’s
conflicts with Anakin. Clearly Anakin was as strong in the Force as
any Jedi who had ever sat on the Council. But as Obi-Wan had told
him time and again, the essence of being a Jedi didn’t hinge on
attaining mastery of the Force, but on attaining mastery over oneself.
Someday Anakin would come to accept that, and then he would be
truly unstoppable. Qui-Gon had had the insight to recognize it more
than a decade earlier, and Obi-Wan felt duty-bound to his former
Master to help Anakin fulfill his destiny.
His faith in Anakin had grown so strong that he had become
Anakin’s staunchest defender to those on the Council who had grown
apprehensive about the young man’s prowess, and uncomfortable
with his confidential, almost familial relationship with Supreme
Chancellor Palpatine. If Obi-Wan was, as Anakin sometimes said, the
father he never had, then Palpatine was his wise uncle, adviser,
mentor in the ways of life outside the Temple.
Obi-Wan understood that Anakin envied him for having been
appointed to the Council. But how could he not, having been all but
anointed “the Chosen One,” continually bolstered by Palpatine’s
praise, driven to prove to his former Master that he could be the
perfect Jedi Knight.
On countless occasions Anakin’s bold actions had allowed them to
prevail against seemingly impossible odds. But just as often it had
been Obi-Wan’s circumspection that had pulled them back from the
brink. Whether foresight was something innate in Obi-Wan or the
result of his continuing fascination with the unifying Force—the long
view—Obi-Wan couldn’t say. What he could say was that he had
learned to trust Anakin’s instincts.
On occasion.
He wouldn’t have been able to go on playing the bait, otherwise.
“The next stop is ours, General,” Cody said from behind him.
Obi-Wan turned, watched Cody slam a new blaster-pack into his
DC-15, heard the familiar whine of the weapon’s repower
mechanism.
Reflexively, he placed his thumb on the lightsaber’s activator
button.
“How do you want to handle this, sir?”
“You’re the master of warcraft, Commander. I’ll follow your lead.”
Cody nodded, perhaps grinning beneath his helmet. “Well, sir, our
mandate is a simple one: Kill as many of the enemy as possible.”
Obi-Wan recalled a conversation he had had on Ord Cestus with a
clone trooper named Nate, regarding analogies between the Jedi and
the clones: the former ushered by midi-chlorians to serve the Force;
the latter, grown and programmed to serve the Republic.
But the analogies ended there, because the troopers never paused
to consider possible repercussions of their actions. Tasked, they
executed their orders to the best of their abilities, whereas lately,
even the most forceful Jedi knew moments of doubt. Qui-Gon had
always criticized the Council for being too authoritative, and for
cultivating inflexible methods of teaching. He saw the Temple as a
place where candidates were programmed to become Jedi, instead of
a place where beings were allowed to grow into Jedihood. Qui-Gon
was no stranger to what the Jedi referred to as “aggressive
negotiations,” which typically involved lightsabers more than
diplomacy. But Obi-Wan wondered what he would have had to say
about the war. He recalled, as if yesterday, Dooku’s taunt on
Geonosis that Qui-Gon would have joined Dooku in championing the
Separatist cause.
As soon as the turbolift came to rest, two commandos tossed
concussion grenades into the corridor beyond. Right and left, battle
droids were blown against the walls and ceiling. Obi-Wan knew,
because the corridor quickly became a torrent of blaster bolts. He,
Cody, and the others threw themselves into the horizontal hail.
Repeating blasters roared to life. Staccato bursts made short work of
the droids, but reinforcements were already appearing.
Two commandos fell to fire while Obi-Wan’s team was making its
way down the corridor in the direction of the citadel’s packing and
shipping rooms. Halfway there, they encountered the contingent of
super battle droids the Neimoidians had sent to root out the
infiltrators.
Comparing the spindly infantry droid to the black-bodied super
battle droid was like comparing a Muun to a champion shock-ball
player. Quick decapitations weren’t possible because the droid’s head
was all but buried in and fused to its broad torso. Heavy-gauge armor
protected long arms and legs. Monogrip hands were suited only for
gripping and firing high-energy dispersal blasters.
“Looks like they’ve taken the bait, General!” Cody said while he,
Obi-Wan, and two commandos fought their way into a side room.
“Another successful action! Now we just have to survive it!”
Cody pointed to the entrance to a second room, opposite their
present position.
“Through there,” he said. “A second bank of turbolifts on the far
side.” He tapped Obi-Wan on the shoulder. “You first. We’ll provide
cover. Go!”
Obi-Wan shot for the room, deflecting bolts and mangling two
super battle droids that stood in his way. The room beyond was
stacked with coffin-sized repulsorlift shipping containers,
constructed of some lightweight alloy. Treaded labor droids were
moving additional containers into the room from an adjacent
packaging area. Without warning, a battle droid appeared in the
entrance. Obi-Wan glanced at the wall-mounted mechanism that
operated the sliding doors. Adopting a defensive stance, he did just
as he had done in the grotto, returning the first of the droid’s blaster
bolts, and sending the second caroming around the room in a path
calculated to disable the door apparatus.
Things might have gone as planned had a labor droid not entered
the room at an inopportune moment, guiding a levitated shipping
container behind him. Ricocheting from the floor, the deflected bolt
passed completely through the container before it struck the door
mechanism. The pair of sliding doors attempted to close, but the
crippled container was now in the way, so they began to cycle
through attempts to repocket themselves, close, repocket
themselves …
Each time they opened, a battle droid would squeeze into the
room, firing away, forcing Obi-Wan back toward the entryway
through which he had originally come, where a brutal firefight was
still raging between commandos and super battle droids.
While all this was occurring, something else was afoot. Strands of
some gauzy white substance were beginning to drift from the holed
shipping container.
Obi-Wan realized instantly what the substance was.
Taking one hand from the hilt of his lightsaber, he began to fumble
for the rebreather pouched on his belt, only to find it empty.
“Stars’ end,” he cursed, more in disappointment than anger.
Already beginning to feel woozy.
Sirs, this a terrible mistake!” TC-16 inserted into a brief pause in the
firefight.
“Keep him quiet,” Anakin snapped at the commando closest to the
droid.
“But, sirs—”
A second commando glanced at Anakin and motioned down the
corridor behind them. “Six infantry droids advancing. We’re going to
be caught in a crossfire.”
Anakin gave his head a quick shake. “Wrong. Follow me—and
bring the droid.”
A muffled sound of dismay escaped TC-16’s vocabulator.
Fury clouded Anakin’s eyes. Lightsaber held high in his crooked
right arm, he whirled into the intersecting corridor. No need to use
the Force, as many Jedi said, for he was never anywhere but fully in
the Force. He called instead on his anger, bringing images to mind to
fuel his rage. It wasn’t difficult, with so many to choose from: images
of a Tusken Raider camp on Tatooine, Yavin 4, the defeat at Jabiim,
Praesitlyn …
Blue blade flashing, he cut a swath through the super battle droids,
opening their burnished carapaces with diagonal slashes, cutting off
blaster arms, hobbling the droids by deflecting bolts into their
hermetically sealed knees. Scarcely letting a shot get past him, so
that the commandos following in his wake could concentrate their
fire on the ones Anakin only wounded.
Their enemies fell aside, almost as if surrendering.
Focused on the route Gunray and his lackeys had taken, Anakin
raced through corridors, rounding corners without slowing down,
sprinting for the launching bay at the far end of the final corridor.
Confronted with an iris-hatch blast door, he thrust his glowing blade
into the metal as if it were living flesh. Lips drawn back over his
teeth, he tried to force the lightsaber to burn a fast circle in the door.
He brought his will to bear on the task, but the lightsaber could
accomplish only so much, even in the hands of a powerful Jedi.
Withdrawing the blade, he stepped back from the door and moved
his hands through a Force pass, willing the iris portal to open. The
door shuddered but remained sealed. Screaming through gnashed
teeth, he tried again.
When the commandos finally caught up with him, he spun to
them.
“Blow the door!”
A commando hurried forward to place magnetic charges against
the alloy. Anakin paced behind him, waiting. Another commando
had to tug him to a safe distance.
The charges blew, and the portal yielded. Anakin charged through
the irising seal even before it had opened fully.
The launching bay was littered with containers, articles of clothing,
objects the Neimoidians hadn’t had time or space to take with them.
The shuttle was gone.
Wisps of vapor swirled about, and the air smelled faintly of fuel.
Anakin ran to the platform’s forward-curving edge, eyes scanning
Cato Neimoidia’s light-riddled night sky for some sign of the fleeing
ship. The palace’s defensive shield had been deactivated. Thick
packets of crimson light lanced from laser cannon batteries on the
slopes below.
Anakin’s teammates joined him at the brink, one with a hand vised
on TC-16’s upper left arm.
“What type of ship is it?” Anakin demanded of the droid.
TC-16 tipped his head to one side. “Ship, sir?”
“The shuttle—Gunray’s shuttle. What model?”
“Why, I believe it was a Sheathipede-class, sir.”
“Haor Chall Engineering Sheathipede-class transport shuttle,” one
of the commandos explained. “Design is based on the soldier beetles.
Upraised stern, bow ramp, clawfoot landing gear. Gunray’s is named
the Lapiz Cutter.”
A second commando spoke up, signaling that he was receiving
commo.
“General. From Commander Dodonna’s flagship: more than sixty
shuttles and landing craft launched from the redoubt. Thirteen
destroyed, eighteen seized. An unknown quantity have managed to
dock aboard Trade Federation core ships and open-ring Lucrehulk
carriers. Additional shuttles are still in the envelope.”
Anakin turned through a circle, gloved hand gripped on the
lightsaber pommel, the other balled into a fist. A conduit nearby took
the brunt of his anger. Cleaved by the blade, it fell in pieces to the
landing platform’s seamless floor. Anakin began to pace again, then
stopped, yanking a commando around by his shoulder.
“Comm forward command. I want my ship and astromech droid
flown here immediately. One of the ARC-one-seventy pilots can fly
it.”
The commando nodded, relayed the message, then said: “FCC will
comply, sir. You’ll have your starfighter soonest.”
Anakin returned to the lip of the platform, blowing his breath into
the night. The battle appeared to be winding down, except within
him. Not until he had Gunray in his grip—
“General Skywalker,” a commando said from behind him. “Urgent
from Commander Cody. He and General Kenobi are pinned down on
level one.”
Anakin shot him a questioning look. “By droids?”
“A lot of them, apparently.”
Anakin glanced into the glowing sky, then back at the commando
who had delivered Cody’s message.
“General, forward command reports that your starfighter is on the
way,” another commando updated.
Again, Anakin glanced at the sky, only to turn back to the
commando. “Where did you say Obi-Wan and Cody are?”
“Level one, sir. In the shipping area.”
Anakin compressed his lips. “All right. Let’s go rescue them.”
In the shipping room, the sliding doors were still cycling—striking
the punctured shipping container, retracting, attempting to close
once more. Battle droids were still entering with each parting of the
doors, and spores were still wafting through the air.
Not much had changed, except within Obi-Wan, who felt as if he
had downed three bottles of Whyren’s Reserve. Bleary-eyed but
lucid, tipsy but sure-footed, weary but attentive, Obi-Wan seemed to
be the sum of all contrasts.
More or less rooted in place, he swayed, wobbled, tottered, and
reeled, evading or parrying an almost unremitting current of blaster
bolts. His singed and burned cloak bore evidence of all the near hits,
but the floor—heaped with droids, whole and in parts, bodies
sparking and limbs twitching—spoke to the accuracy of his
deflections.
He felt at times as if he were merely holding the lightsaber and
letting it do all the work. In one hand, in both, it made no difference.
Other times he was able to anticipate the bolts, twist himself aside at
the last instant, and allow the walls and floor to handle the ricochets.
Sometimes he actually took a moment to congratulate himself on
the skill of his returns.
He was in the Force, to be sure, but deep in some other zone as
well, giddy with astonishment, as the world unfolded in slow motion.
Alerted by the commandos that the air was saturated with spores,
Anakin had his rebreather in his mouth as he approached the room
in which Obi-Wan had held his own against better than fifty droids,
all of which lay scattered about the room. A weaving, shuffling,
staggering Obi-Wan was dealing with the last of them when Anakin
entered.
When the final droid collapsed, Obi-Wan aimed the blade of his
lightsaber casually toward the floor and stood swaying in place,
breathing hard but almost grinning.
“Anakin,” he said happily. “How are you?”
When Anakin went to him, Obi-Wan promptly collapsed in his
arms.
Anakin deactivated Obi-Wan’s blade and inserted a rebreather into
his mouth—the same one that had ended up on the floor of the
grotto. Then he carried him from the room to where Cody and
several commandos were waiting, some with their helmets removed.
“Exactly what lightsaber form were you using back there, Master?”
Anakin asked when Obi-Wan had come around and the rebreathers
were no longer necessary.
“Form?”
“More the absence of it.” Anakin laughed shortly. “If only Mace,
Kit, or Shaak Ti could have seen you.”
Obi-Wan blinked in confusion and glanced around at the carnage
of droids in the shipping area. “We did this?” he said to Cody.
“You did most of it, General.”
Obi-Wan regarded Anakin in confusion.
“I’ll explain later,” Anakin said.
Obi-Wan ran his hand through his hair, then, as if just
remembering, said: “Gunray! Did you get him?”
Anakin’s shoulders dropped. “The entire entourage escaped the
palace.”
Obi-Wan mulled it over for a moment. “You could have gone after
them.”
Anakin shrugged. “And leave you?” He paused, then added: “Of
course, if I’d known you’d become master of a new lightsaber
form …”
Obi-Wan’s eyes brightened. “They’ll be taken in orbit.”
“Maybe.”
“If not, there’ll be other times, Anakin. We’ll see to it.”
Anakin nodded. “I know that, Master.”
Obi-Wan was about to add something when a helmeted
commando stepped from a nearby turbolift and hurried over to
them.
“General Kenobi, General Skywalker, we’ve found something of
interest among the equipment the Neimoidians left behind.”
The fact that the Sheathipede shuttle had managed to thread its
way through a storm of turbolaser bolts and dock in the core ship’s
port-side command tower was no guarantee of safety. Indeed, while
everyone was filing down the shuttle’s tongue-like boarding ramp,
the core ship was still being pummeled by fire from Republic
warships.
First to set foot on deck, Viceroy Nute Gunray, attired in blood-red
robes and sporting a tall, helmet-like miter, asked for a situation
report from one of the goggle-wearing technicians who was waiting
in the docking bay.
“Even now coordinates for the jump to lightspeed are being
calculated, Viceroy,” the nearest one said. “A matter of moments and
we will be well away from Cato Neimoidia. Your peers on the Council
of Separatists await us in the Outer Rim.”
“Let us hope so,” Gunray said, as the vessel was rocked by a
massive explosion.
Behind Gunray walked settlement officer Rune Haako, wearing a
crested skullcap; and behind Haako, various financial, legal, and
diplomatic officers, each wearing a distinctive headpiece. Droids
were already beginning to unload the possessions—the treasures—for
which Gunray had risked so much.
He called Haako aside while the others were exiting the sterile
docking bay. “Do you think there will be a chance to return and
reclaim what we had to leave behind?”
“Not a chance,” puckered Haako said flatly. “Our purse worlds now
belong to the Republic. Our only hope is to find sanctuary in the
Outer Rim. Otherwise, this ship will have to serve as our home—and
perhaps our final resting place!”
Sadness crept into Gunray’s red orbs. “But my collections, my
keepsakes …”
“Your most cherished items accompany you,” Haako said,
gesturing to the containers already piled at the foot of the boarding
ramp. “More important, we escaped with our lives. Another instant
and the Jedi would have had us.”
Gunray allowed a nod of agreement. “You warned me.”
“I did.”
“Count Dooku will help us find new worlds to settle when the war
is won.”
“If the war is won, you mean. The Republic seems keen on driving
us from the galaxy.”
Gunray made a dismissive gesture with his fat fingers. “Temporary
setbacks. The Republic has yet to see the face of its real enemy.”
Haako hunched slightly at the reference. “But is even he enough,
Viceroy?” he asked quietly.
Gunray said nothing, although he had been asking himself the
same question for the past several weeks.
One thing was clear: the glory days of the Trade Federation had
come to an untimely end. Ironically, the individual most responsible
for that bright burning—for the rise of Nute Gunray himself—was the
same individual who had repeatedly betrayed him, and to whom
Gunray and the other Separatists were now forced to look for
salvation.
The Sith Lord, Darth Sidious.
There at Dorvalla and Eriadu, manipulating events to shunt power
and influence to the Neimoidians; there at Naboo, ordering a
blockade of the planet, the murder of Jedi, assassination of the
Queen … a debacle for the Trade Federation. Years of attempts by the
Republic to try to convict Gunray and his chief officers, to break the
hold the Trade Federation enjoyed on galactic shipping. But not once
during that time of public disgrace did Gunray mention the role
Sidious had played.
Out of fear?
Certainly.
But also because he had sensed that Sidious had not abandoned
him completely. Rather, the Dark Lord was somehow seeing to it that
the trials never came to fruition, that no lasting verdicts were
rendered or punishments handed down. As the Separatist movement
gained strength, threatening the security of ships and shipments in
the far sectors, the Trade Federation had actually been able to
increase the size of its standing army of battle droids by dealing
directly with foundry worlds, such as Geonosis and Hypori. Making
the most of the Republic’s sudden instability, lucrative deals had
been arranged between the Trade Federation and the Corporate
Alliance, the InterGalactic Banking Clan, the Techno Union, the
Commerce Guild, and other corporate entities.
It was during the final trial that Gunray had been approached by
Count Dooku, who had promised that all would ultimately turn out
well for the Trade Federation. In a moment of weakness, Gunray had
revealed the truth about his dealings with Darth Sidious. Dooku has
listened attentively; had promised to bring the matter to the
attention of the Jedi Council, though he himself had left the Order
some years earlier. Gunray had mixed feelings about Dooku’s
purpose in creating a Separatist movement, chiefly because
corruption in the Republic Senate had so often worked to the Trade
Federation’s advantage. But if Dooku’s Confederacy of Independent
Systems could eliminate even some of the bribes and kickbacks
commonplace in galactic trade, then so much the better.
By and by Dooku’s real aims had been made clear: he was less
interested in providing an alternative to the Republic than he was in
bringing the Republic to its knees—through the use of force if
necessary. In much the same way that the Trade Federation had
amassed an army right under the nose of Supreme Chancellor Finis
Valorum, Dooku—in plain sight—was seeing to it that Baktoid Armor
Workshops was supplying weapons to any corporations that agreed
to ally with him.
Regardless, Gunray had resisted offers to throw his full support to
the Separatists—not when there were still profits to be made in
countless Republic star systems. Playing a game of his own, teasing
Dooku along, he had informed Dooku that a precondition to their
entering into any exclusive arrangement was the death of former
Naboo Queen Padmé Amidala, who had foiled Gunray on two
occasions, and had been the loudest opposition voice at his trials.
Dooku had hired a bounty hunter to oversee the business, but two
attempts at assassinating Senator Amidala had failed.
Then came Geonosis.
But just when Gunray finally had Amidala in his grasp—on trial,
no less, for espionage—Dooku had equivocated, refusing to have
Amidala killed outright, and not lifting a hand against the Jedi until
some two hundred of them had showed up with a clone army the
Republic had grown in secret!
That day had provided Gunray with the first in what would be a
series of narrow escapes. Hurrying to the catacombs with Dooku at
their side, Gunray and Haako had barely managed to flee the
embattled surface and recall what core ships and droid carriers
remained.
By then, though, it was too late for anyone to resign from Dooku’s
Confederacy.
The war was begun, and it was Dooku’s turn for revelations: he,
too, was Sith, and his Master was none other than Sidious! Whether
a replacement for the fearsome Darth Maul, or a Sith even during his
years in the Jedi Order, Gunray didn’t care to know. What mattered
was simply that Nute Gunray was right back where he had been so
many years earlier: in service to forces over which he had no control
whatsoever.
When the war had been going well, the issue of whom he served
had been scarcely a problem. Trade had continued, and the Trade
Federation had continued in the black. For a time it appeared that
Sidious and Dooku’s dreams of toppling the Republic might succeed
after all. But they found themselves facing a worthy opponent in the
person of Supreme Chancellor Palpatine—also from Naboo—who
had never much impressed Gunray, but who had managed through a
combination of charm and artfulness not only to remain in power
long past his term of office, but also, in conjunction with the Jedi, to
conduct the war. Slowly, the wheel began to turn, as one Separatist
world after another was retaken by the Republic, and now Viceroy
Nute Gunray himself had been driven from the Core.
A tragedy for the Trade Federation; a tragedy, he feared, for the
entire Neimoidian species.
He gazed at the few possessions he had been able to gather: his
costly robes and miters, resplendent jewelry, priceless works of art—
A sudden chill laddered up his spine. His bulging forehead and
lower jaw tingled in dread. Eyes protruding from his mottled gray
face, he swung to Rune Haako.
“The chair! Where is the chair?”
Haako stared at him.
“The mechno-chair!” Gunray said. “It’s not here anywhere!”
Now Haako’s eyes widened in apprehension. “Surely we couldn’t
have overlooked it.”
Gunray paced worriedly, trying to recall when and where he had
last seen the device. “I’m certain that I had it moved to the launching
bay. Yes, yes, I remember seeing it there! But in the rush to launch—”
“But you armed it to self-destruct,” Haako said. “Tell me you
armed it!”
Gunray stared at him. “I thought you had armed it.”
Haako gestured to himself. “I don’t even know the sequence
codes!”
Gunray fell silent for a moment. “Haako, what if they should
decide to tamper with it?”
Haako’s broad slash of mouth twitched with worry. “Without the
codes, what could they possibly gain from it?”
“You’re right. Of course, you’re right.”
Gunray tried to convince himself. It was just a mechno-chair, after
all; finely wrought, but just a walking chair. A walking chair
equipped with a hyperwave transceiver. A hyperwave transceiver
given to him fourteen years ago by—
“What if he should learn that we left it behind?” Gunray rasped.
“Sidious,” Haako said softly.
“Not Sidious!”
“Count Dooku, you mean.”
“Are you brain-dead?” Gunray fairly screeched. “Grievous! What if
Grievous should find out?”
Supreme Commander of the droid armies, General Grievous had
been San Hill and Poggle the Lesser’s gift to Dooku. Once merely a
barbaric living being; now a cyborg monstrosity, devoted to death
and destruction. Already the butcher of entire populations; the
devastator of countless worlds—
“It’s not too late,” Haako said suddenly. “We can communicate
with the chair from here.”
“Can we arm it to self-destruct?”
Haako shook his head negatively. “But we might be able to instruct
it to arm itself.”
A technician intercepted them while they were hurrying toward a
communications console.
“Viceroy, we are prepared to make the jump to lightspeed.”
“You will do no such thing!” Gunray cried. “Not until I give the
order!”
“But, Viceroy, our vessel can only withstand so much
bombardment.”
“Bombardment is the least of our concerns!”
“Hurry,” Haako insisted, “we haven’t much time!”
Gunray rushed to join him at the console. “Say nothing of this to
anyone,” he warned.
Sickle-footed, humpbacked, incised with intricate designs, the
mechno-chair sat in the launching bay of the now seized fortress,
amid a heap of equally exquisite belongings left by the fleeing
Neimoidians.
Obi-Wan was circling it, right hand caressing his bearded chin. “I
think I’ve seen this chair before.”
Squatting alongside it, Anakin looked up at him. “Where?”
Obi-Wan stopped. “On Naboo. Shortly after Viceroy Gunray and
his entourage were taken into custody in Theed.”
Anakin shook his head. “I don’t remember seeing it.”
Obi-Wan snorted. “I suspect you were too excited about having
blown up the Droid Control Ship to take much notice of anything.
What’s more, I saw it only for a moment. But I do remember being
struck by the design of the holoprojector plate. I’d never seen one
quite like it—or since, for that matter.”
On the far side of the spacious bay, up on its hard-stand, sat
Anakin’s sleek yellow starfighter. R2-D2 stood nearby, communing
with TC-16. Commander Cody and the rest of Squad Seven were
elsewhere in the palace, “mopping up,” as the clones liked to say.
Anakin examined the chair’s holoprojector without touching it. An
oval of ribbed alloy, it was equipped with a pair of dorsal sockets
sized to accept data cells of some sort. “It is unusual. You know,
Master, these cells could contain valuable messages in storage.”
“All the more reason to leave it be until someone from Intelligence
can have a look at it.”
Anakin frowned. “That could take forever.”
Obi-Wan folded his arms and regarded him. “Are you in a rush,
Anakin?”
“For all we know, the cells could be programmed to erase
themselves.”
“Do you see any evidence of that?”
“No, but—”
“Then we’re better off waiting until we can run a proper
diagnostic.”
Anakin grimaced. “What do you know about running diagnostics?
Master.”
“I’m not exactly a stranger to the Temple’s cyberlabs, Anakin.”
“I know that. But Artoo can run the diagnostic.” He beckoned for
the droid to join him at the mechno-chair.
“Anakin,” Obi-Wan started to say.
“Really, sirs, I must protest,” TC-16 interrupted, hurrying behind
R2-D2. “These items remain the property of Viceroy Gunray and
other members of his party.”
“You don’t have a say in the matter,” Anakin said.
R2-D2 trilled and hooted at the battered protocol droid. The two
had been bickering since R2-D2’s arrival a short time earlier.
“I’m fully aware that my circuits are corroded,” TC-16 said. “As for
my posture, there’s little I can do about that until my pelvic joint is
serviced. You astromechs think very highly of yourselves, just
because you can pilot starfighters.”
“Don’t pay Artoo any mind, TeeCee,” Anakin said. “He’s been
spoiled by another protocol droid. Haven’t you, Artoo?”
Artoo toodled a response, extended his computer interface arm,
and inserted the magnetic tip into an output socket in the chair.
“Anakin!” Obi-Wan said sharply.
Anakin stood up and joined Obi-Wan on the launch platform. ObiWan was pointing to a blinking light that was growing larger by the
second in the night sky.
“Do you see that? That is very likely the ship we’re waiting for. And
the Intelligence officers aboard are not going to take kindly to our
sticking our noses in their business.”
“Sirs,” TC-16 said from behind them.
“Not now,” Obi-Wan said.
R2-D2 began to loose a long series of whistles, chirps, and chitters.
“If and when they give the okay,” Obi-Wan went on, “then feel free
to dissect the entire chair, if that’s your objective.”
“That’s not my objective, Master.”
“Maybe Qui-Gon should have left you at Watto’s junk shop.”
“You don’t mean that, Master.”
“Of course not. But I know how you love to tinker with things.”
“Sirs—”
“Keep quiet, TeeCee,” Anakin said.
R2-D2 honked and razzed, though as if from a distance.
“And you, too, Artoo.”
Obi-Wan glanced over his shoulder, and his jaw dropped. “Where’s
the mechno-chair?”
Anakin swung around and scanned the bay. “Where’s Artoo?”
“I’ve been trying to tell you, sirs,” TC-16 said, gesturing toward the
launching bay’s ruined iris hatch. “The chair walked away—taking
your high-thinking little droid with it!”
Obi-Wan stared at Anakin in bewilderment.
“Well, it couldn’t have gotten far on foot, Master.”
They rushed into the corridor, saw that it was deserted in both
directions, and began searching the rooms that adjoined the bay. A
prolonged electronic squeal brought both of them back into the main
corridor.
“That’s Artoo,” Anakin said.
“Either that, or TeeCee has developed a talent for mimicry.”
The protocol droid following behind, they hurried into a compact
data room, where they saw R2-D2 with his interface arm still jacked
into the chair, and the gripper of his grasping arm clamped to the bar
handle of a storage cabinet. Stretched to its full extent, a computer
interface cable now connected the mechno-chair to a control console
of some sort. The chair’s talon-like feet were in constant motion,
attempting to gain purchase on the smooth floor in an effort to
propel the chair closer to the console.
“What’s it doing?” Obi-Wan asked.
Anakin made his face long and shook his head. “Recharging
itself?”
“Never seen such tenacity in a mechno-chair.”
R2-D2 chattered and wheezed.
“What’s Artoo saying?” Obi-Wan asked TC-16.
“He’s saying, sir, that the mechno-chair has just armed itself to
self-destruct!”
Anakin made a mad dash for the console.
“Artoo, unplug yourself!” Obi-Wan shouted. “Anakin, get away
from that thing!”
Anakin’s fingers were already busy undoing leads that linked the
holoprojector unit to the chair.
“Can’t, Master. Now we know there’s something stored in this
chair no one wants us to see.”
Obi-Wan glanced worriedly at R2-D2. “How much time, Artoo?”
TC-16 translated the astromech’s response. “Seconds, sir!”
Obi-Wan rushed to Anakin’s side. “There isn’t time, Anakin.
Besides, it could be rigged to detonate if tampered with.”
“Almost there, Master …”
“You’ll deactivate us in the process!”
Obi-Wan sensed a disturbance in the Force.
Without thinking, he pulled Anakin to the floor an instant before
the chair shot a stream of white vapor into the space Anakin had
occupied.
Coughing, Obi-Wan covered his mouth and nose with the wide
sleeve of his robe. “Poison gas! Good bet it’s the same one Gunray
tried to use on Qui-Gon and me at Naboo.”
“Thank you, Master,” Anakin said. “What’s that make it, twentyfive to thirty-seven?”
“Thirty-six—if you’ve any interest in accuracy.”
Anakin studied the chair for a moment. “We have to take the
chance.”
Before Obi-Wan could even think about stopping him, Anakin had
leaned forward and wrenched the interface cable from the control
console.
R2-D2 yowled, and TC-16 moaned in distress.
A web of blue energy gamboled around the chair and the console,
knocking Anakin onto his backside.
At the same time, a high-resolution blue hologram projected from
the chair’s holoplate.
R2-D2 mewled in alarm.
And to the meter-high figure in the hooded cloak, the
unmistakable voice of Viceroy Nute Gunray was saying:
“Yes, yes, of course. Trust that I will see to it personally, my Lord
Sidious.”
These days, an appointment with Supreme Chancellor Palpatine
was not something to be taken lightly—even for a member of the socalled Loyalist Committee.
Appointment?
More an audience.
Bail Organa had just arrived on Coruscant, and was still wearing
the deep blue cloak, ruffle-collared shirt, and knee-high black boots
his wife had laid out for him for the trip from Alderaan. He had been
away from the galactic capital for only a standard month, and could
scarcely believe the disturbing changes that had taken place during
his short absence.
Alderaan never seemed more a paradise, a sanctuary. Just
thinking about his beautiful blue-and-white homeworld made Bail
yearn to be there, yearn for the company of his loving wife.
“I’m going to need to see further identification,” the clone trooper
stationed at the landing platform’s Homeworld Security checkpoint
told him.
Bail motioned to the identichip he had already slotted in the
scanner. “It’s all there, Sergeant. I’m a member in good standing of
the Republic Senate.”
The helmeted noncom glanced at the display screen, then looked
down at Bail. “So it says. But I’m still going to need to see further
identification.”
Bail sighed in exasperation and fished into the breast pocket of his
brocaded tunic for his credit chip.
The new Coruscant, he thought.
Faceless, blaster-wielding soldiers on the shuttle landing
platforms, in the plazas, arrayed in front of banks, hotels, theaters,
wherever beings gathered or mingled. Scanning the crowds, stopping
anyone who fit the current possible terrorist profile, conducting
searches of individuals, belongings, residences. Not on a whim,
because the cloned troopers didn’t operate like that. They answered
merely to their training, and the duties they performed were for the
good of the Republic.
One heard rumors about antiwar demonstrations being put down
by force; of disappearances and seizures of private property. Proof of
such abuses of power rarely surfaced, and was quickly discredited.
The omnipresence of the soldiers seemed to bother Bail more than
it did his few friends on Coruscant or his peers in the Senate. He had
tried to attribute his agitation to the fact that he hailed from pacific
Alderaan, but that explained only some of it. What bothered him
most was the ease with which the majority of Coruscanti had
acclimated to the changes. Their willingness—almost an eagerness—
to surrender personal freedoms in the name of security. And a false
security, at that. For while Coruscant seemed far from the war, it was
also at the center of it.
Now, three years into a conflict that might have been ended as
abruptly as it had begun, every new security measure was taken in
stride. Except, of course, by members of those species most closely
associated with the Separatist agenda—Geonosians, Muuns,
Neimoidians, Gossams, and the rest—many of whom had been
ostracized or forced to flee the capital. Having lived for so long in
fear and ignorance, few Coruscanti stopped to question what was
really going on. Least of all the Senate itself, which was so busy
modifying the Constitution that it had completely abandoned its role
as a balancing arm of the government.
Before the war, widespread corruption had stifled the legislative
process. Bills languished, measures sat for years without being
addressed, votes were protested and subjected to endless
recounts … But one effect of the war had been to replace corruption
and inertia with dereliction of duty. Reasoned discourse and debate
had become so rare as to be archaic. In a political climate where
representatives were afraid to speak their minds, it was easier—and
thought to be safer—to cede power to those who at least appeared to
have some grasp of the truth.
“You’re free to go,” the trooper said at last, apparently satisfied
that Bail was in fact who his credentials claimed him to be.
Bail laughed to himself.
Free to go where? he wondered.
This high up on Coruscant, one couldn’t be a pedestrian. Walking
was an activity reserved for the bottom feeders who occupied
Coruscant’s reflectively lit sub-levels. Bail hailed a free-travel air taxi
and instructed the droid driver to take him to the Senate Building.
Even outside the normal skylanes, above the myriad and abysmal
canyons that fissured the urbanscape, far from patrols of security
soldiers or the prying eyes of Republic spies, Coruscant looked much
as it had for as long as Bail had known it. Traffic was as dense as
ever, with ships arriving perpetually from all points in the galaxy.
New restaurants had opened; more art was being created.
Paradoxically, there seemed to be more joviality in the air, and more
opportunities than ever for vice. Even with trade disrupted to the
Outer Rim, many Coruscanti were living the good life, and many
Senators were continuing to avail themselves of the limitless
privileges they had enjoyed in the prewar years.
From up here one had to look closely to observe the changes.
In the oval, twin-drive air taxi, for example.
Running in tiny print across the passenger’s-seat display screen
was a public service ad extolling the virtues of COMPOR—the
Commission for the Protection of the Republic.
NONHUMANS NEED NOT APPLY.
And there, dazzling the sheer face of a towering office building, a
piece of late-breaking HoloNet news detailing the Republic’s victory
at Cato Neimoidia. Lately it was triumph after triumph, praise for the
Grand Army of the Republic, all glory to the clone troopers.
Rarely a mention of the Jedi, save for when one of them was
commended by Palpatine in the Senate’s Great Rotunda. Young
Anakin Skywalker or some other. Otherwise one rarely saw an adult
Jedi on Coruscant any longer. Spread thin throughout the galaxy,
they led companies of troopers into battle. The holofeeds were fond
of using the phrase aggressive peacekeeping to describe their
actions. To the extent that friendships could be forged with them,
Bail had come to know a few: Jedi Masters Obi-Wan Kenobi, Yoda,
Mace Windu, Saesee Tiin—the privileged few who also were allowed
to meet personally with Palpatine.
Bail stirred in his seat.
Even Palpatine’s harshest critics in the Senate or in the various
media couldn’t hold him fully accountable for what Coruscant had
become. Though hardly the innocent he sometimes pretended to be,
Palpatine was not to blame. His talent for being at once sincere and
exacting was what had gotten him elected in the first place.
According to Bail Antilles, at any rate, Bail’s predecessor in the
Senate.
Thirteen years ago the Senate was interested only in ridding itself
of Finis Valorum, Antilles had once told Bail. Valorum, who had
believed he could put honesty on the Senate agenda. Even in those
days Palpatine had had his share of influential friends.
Still, Bail couldn’t help but wonder who might have succeeded
Palpatine as Supreme Chancellor if the Separatist crises on Raxus
Prime and Antar 4 had not occurred when they did, just as
Palpatine’s term of office was ending. He remembered the arguments
that had raged over passage of the Emergency Powers Act; that it was
dangerous to “change dewbacks in the middle of a sand dune.” Back
then, many Senators felt that the Republic should bide its time and
simply allow Count Dooku’s movement to play itself out.
But not after the full extent of the Separatist threat became clear.
Not after some six thousand worlds, lured by the promise of free
and unrestricted trade, had seceded from the Republic. Not after
heavily armed corporations such as the Commerce Guild and the
Techno Union had partnered with Dooku. Not after the entire
Rimward leg of the Rimma Trade Route had become inaccessible to
Republic shipping.
As a consequence—and by an overwhelming majority—the Senate
had voted to amend the Constitution, and to extend Palpatine’s term
indefinitely, with the understanding that he would voluntarily step
down from office when the crisis was resolved. In short order,
however, the likelihood of a quick resolution evaporated. Formerly
gracious and unassuming Palpatine was suddenly democracy’s
champion, vowing that he could not condone a Republic divided
against itself.
Rumors of a Military Creation Act began to circulate. But Palpatine
himself had refused to come out in favor of building an army for the
Republic. He left that to others—the Senate’s nominal Sand
Panthers. Finally he attempted to arrange a peace summit, but Count
Dooku had refused to attend.
Instead came war.
Bail could recall clearly the day he had stood with Palpatine, Mas
Amedda, Malastarian Senators, and others on a balcony of the
Senate Office Building, watching tens of thousands of clone troopers
march into the enormous ships that would take the war to the
Separatists. He could recall clearly his utter disconsolation. That
after a thousand years of peace, war and evil had returned.
More accurately, been allowed to return.
Regardless, Bail had put his feelings aside and had played his part,
endorsing bills he might have previously denounced, supporting
Palpatine’s “efficient streamlining of cumbersome bureaucracy.” It
wasn’t until passage of the Reflex Amendment, some fourteen
months back, that his fears had begun to resurface and intensify. The
sudden disappearance of Senator Seti Ashgad after he had argued
against installation of surveillance cams in the Senate Building; the
suspicious explosion of a star freighter aboard which Finis Valorum
was a passenger; the passage of a security bill that granted Palpatine
wideranging powers over Coruscant …
The behavior of the Supreme Chancellor himself—frequently
isolated by his covey of advisers and illegal cadre of red-robed
personal bodyguards; his unbending resolve to continue fighting
until the war was won. Gone was humble, self-deprecating Palpatine.
And with him, tractable Bail Organa. Bail vowed to speak openly of
his concerns, and he began to cultivate friendships with Senators
who shared those concerns.
Some of them were waiting for him when the air taxi touched
down in the broad plaza that fronted the mushroom-shaped Senate
Building. Padmé Amidala, of Naboo; Mon Mothma of Chandrila;
human Senators Terr Taneel, Bana Breemu, and Fang Zar; and alien
Senator Chi Eekway.
Slender, short-haired Mon Mothma hurried to embrace Bail as he
approached. “A momentous occasion, Bail,” she said into his left ear.
“An audience with Palpatine.”
Bail laughed to himself. They did think alike.
Padmé hugged him, as well, though somewhat stiffly. She looked
radiant. A bit more full-faced than Bail remembered, but the very
picture of classic beauty in her elegant robes and elaborate coiffure.
A golden protocol droid stood behind her. She told him she had just
returned from a wonderful week on Naboo, visiting with her family.
“An extraordinary world, Naboo,” Bail said. “I’ll never understand
how it spawned someone as stubborn as our Supreme Chancellor.”
Padmé scolded him with a frown. “He’s not stubborn, Bail. You
just don’t know him as I do. He’ll take our concerns to heart.”
“For all the good it will do,” Chi Eekway said, displeasure
wrinkling her blue face.
“You underestimate Palpatine’s acuity,” Padmé said. “Besides, he
appreciates frank speech.”
“We’ve been nothing if not frank, Senator,” dark-complected, bibbearded Fang Zar said. “With scant success.”
Padmé glanced at everyone. “Surely, faced with all of us …”
“Had we a tenth of the Senate we would prove too few,” Bana said,
draped head-to-toe in shimmersilk. “But it is important that we hold
to our intention.”
Eekway nodded gravely.
“It can be hoped,” Fang Zar said, “not counted on.”
The conversation turned to personal matters as they entered the
vast building. They were an animated group when they finally
arrived at the holding office, directly beneath the Great Rotunda,
where Palpatine’s human appointments secretary asked them to wait
in the receiving area.
After an hour of waiting, their spirits began to flag. But then the
door to Palpatine’s office slid open, and Sate Pestage, one of
Palpatine’s chief advisers, appeared.
“Senators, what a surprise,” he said.
Bail came to his feet, speaking for everyone when he said: “It
shouldn’t be. The appointment was confirmed more than three
weeks ago.”
Pestage glanced at the appointments secretary. “Really? I wasn’t
informed.”
“You most certainly were informed,” Padmé said, “since the
appointment was secured through your office.”
“Several of us have risked much and traveled great distances,”
Eekway added.
Pestage spread his hands in a patronizing way. “Such times require
sacrifices, Senator. Or perhaps you feel you’ve risked more than the
Supreme Chancellor has.”
Bail spoke up. “No one is implying that the Supreme Chancellor
has been anything but tireless in his … devotion. But the fact remains
that he agreed to see us, and we’re not about to leave here until he
honors his pledge.”
“We’re not asking for much of his time,” Terr Taneel said, in a
more placating tone.
“Maybe not, but you must realize how busy he is. What with new
developments occurring daily.” Pestage looked at Bail. “I understand
you’ve become quite friendly with the Jedi Council. Why not visit
with them while I attempt to reschedule you?”
Anger mottled Bail’s bearded face. “We’re not leaving until we see
him, Sate.”
Pestage forced a smile. “As is your prerogative, Senator.”
The shuttle whose landing lights had caught Obi-Wan’s attention
on Cato Neimoidia carried more than Intelligence analysts and
technicians. Yoda was aboard, eager to see for himself what Obi-Wan
and Anakin had discovered.
The technicians had succeeded in inducing the mechno-chair’s
holoprojector to replay the image of Lord Sidious, and Republic
cryptographers working with the Jedi were confident that the unique
device would yield even greater secrets once it was relocated to
Coruscant and examined thoroughly.
Refusing to let the mechno-chair out of his sight, Anakin had
demanded to oversee its transfer to the waiting shuttle. Feeling
unnecessary, Obi-Wan and Yoda decided to take a stroll down the
corridor of Viceroy Gunray’s now appropriated palace. The venerable
Jedi Master was pensive as they walked, the silence broken only by
the sounds of distant blasterfire and the tick, tick of Yoda’s gimer
stick as it struck the polished floor.
Yoda was unreadable.
Obi-Wan wasn’t sure if Yoda was pondering the image of Sidious,
or the fact that two Jedi had been killed during the fighting on Cato
Neimoidia. Every day saw more Jedi die. Many were as shot up as
the clone troopers. Wounded, blinded, scarred, deprived of arms or
legs … patched up by bota and bacta. More than a thousand
Padawans had lost their Masters; more than a thousand Masters,
their Padawans. When Jedi gathered now they talked not about the
Force, but about their military campaigns. New lightsabers were
constructed not as a meditative exercise, but to handle the rigors of
close combat.
Reaching the end of the long corridor, Obi-Wan and Yoda turned
and started back. Without taking his eyes from the floor, Yoda said:
“Found something important, you have, Obi-Wan. That Count
Dooku is in league with someone, proof this is. That in this war a
greater part the Sith play than we realize.”
The name Sidious had come up only once since the war began—on
Geonosis, when Dooku had told an imprisoned Obi-Wan that a Sith
Lord by that name had hundreds of Republic Senators under his
influence. At the time, Obi-Wan assumed that Dooku was lying, in
order to persuade Obi-Wan that he was still aligned with the Jedi,
although attempting to thwart the powers of the dark side by his own
methods. And yet, even after Dooku had revealed himself to be Sithtrained, Yoda and others on the Council continued to believe that he
had been lying about Sidious. Two Council members were convinced
that Dooku was the Dark Lord, having somehow tutored himself—by
Sith Holocron, perhaps—in the use of dark side powers.
Now that Sidious appeared to be real, Obi-Wan didn’t know what
to think.
A hunt for Dooku’s Sith allies had been going on almost since the
start of the war. Dooku was known to have trained Jedi in the dark
arts—Jedi Knights who had lost faith in the ideals of the Republic,
Padawans fascinated by the power of the dark side, misinformed
novices such as Asajj Ventress, who had been mentored by a Jedi—
but the question remained, who, if anyone, had been Dooku’s
teacher?
Thirteen years earlier, when Obi-Wan had fought and killed a Sith
on Naboo, had he killed a Master or an apprentice? The question was
rooted in the belief that the Sith, having essentially defeated
themselves a millennium earlier, had learned that an army of Sith
could never stand, and that there should be only two at any given
time, lest a pair of apprentices conspire to combine their strengths to
eliminate a Master.
More a doctrine than a rule; but a doctrine that had managed to
keep the Sith order alive, if well concealed, for going on a thousand
years.
But the horned and tattooed Sith whom Obi-Wan killed could not
have trained Dooku, because Dooku had still been a member of the
Jedi Order then. As clouded as the dark side made some things, there
was simply no way Dooku could have been living a double life within
the walls of the Temple itself.
“Master Yoda,” Obi-Wan said, “is it possible that Dooku wasn’t
lying about the Senate being under the control of Sidious?”
Yoda gave his head a quick shake while they walked. “Looked hard
at the Senate, we did. And risked much we did by doing so—
questioning in secret those we serve. But no evidence we found.” He
glanced up at Obi-Wan. “If in control of the Senate Sidious was,
would not defeated the Republic already be? Would not to the
Confederacy the Core and Inner Rim belong?”
Yoda paused for a moment, then added: “Perhaps at Geonosis, an
accident it was that Dooku revealed himself. Had he not, searched we
would have for Sidious, leaving Dooku to escalate his war. What
think you, Obi-Wan? Hmmm?”
Obi-Wan folded his arms. “I’ve thought long and hard about that
day, Master, and I believe Dooku couldn’t help revealing himself—
even though he may have regretted it. When he was fleeing for his
ship, it was almost as if he allowed himself to be seen; almost as if he
was attempting to draw us into an engagement. My first thought was
that he was trying to ensure the safe escape of Gunray and the other
Separatist leaders. But my instincts tell me that he wanted
desperately to demonstrate how powerful he had become. I think he
was genuinely surprised to see you turn up. But instead of killing
Anakin or me, he deliberately left us alive, to send a message to the
Jedi.”
“Right you are, Obi-Wan. Pride undid him. Forced him, it did, to
show us his true face.”
“Could he have been trained by this … Sidious?”
“Stands to reason, it does. Accepted by Sidious he was, following
the death of the one you killed.”
Obi-Wan considered it. “I’ve heard rumors about Dooku’s early
fascination with the dark side. Was there not an incident in the
Temple involving a stolen Sith Holocron?”
Yoda squeezed his eyes shut and nodded. “True that rumor is. But
understand, Obi-Wan, a Jedi Dooku was. For many, many years.
Difficult the decision is to leave the Order. Influenced he was by
many things. The death of your former Master, for one—even though
avenged Qui-Gon was.”
He glanced at Obi-Wan. “Complicated this is. Not merely by what
we know, but by what we do not know; what we have to assume.”
Yoda stopped, then gestured to a carved bench.
“Sit for a while, we will. Enlighten you, I can.”
Obi-Wan sat, his heart wanting to race.
“A stern Master Dooku was, to Qui-Gon and others,” Yoda began.
“Powerful he was; skilled, disdainful. More important, convinced
that lowering the shroud of the dark side was. Signs there were, all
about us, long before to the Temple you came; long before Qui-Gon
came. Gross injustices, favoritism, corruption … More and more,
called the Jedi were to enforce the peace. More and more deaths
there were. Out of control events were becoming.”
“Did the Council sense that the Sith had returned?”
“Never absent they were, Obi-Wan. But stronger suddenly. Closer
to the surface. Spoke much of the prophecy, Dooku did.”
“The prophecy of the Chosen One?”
“The larger prophecy: that unfold the dark times would. Born into
their midst the Chosen One is, to return balance to the Force.”
“Anakin,” Obi-Wan said.
Yoda regarded him for a long moment. “Difficult to say,” he said
quickly. “Maybe, yes; maybe, no. More important the shroud of the
dark side is. Many, many discussions Dooku had. With me, with
other members of the Council. Most of all, with Master Sifo-Dyas.”
Obi-Wan waited.
“Close friends they were. Bound together by the unifying Force.
But worried about Master Dooku, Sifo-Dyas was. Worried about his
disenchantment with the Republic; about self-absorption among the
Jedi. Saw in Dooku the effect of Qui-Gon’s death, Sifo-Dyas did. The
effect that resurfaced the Sith had.” Yoda shook his head mournfully.
“Knew of Dooku’s imminent departure, Master Sifo-Dyas did.
Sensed, he may have, the birth of the Separatist movement.”
“And yet the Council dismissed Dooku as an idealist,” Obi-Wan
said.
Yoda gazed at the floor. “Saw with my own eyes what he had
become, and refused to believe it, I did.”
“But how could Dooku have searched out Sidious? Or was it the
other way around?”
“Impossible to know. But accept Sidious as a mentor Dooku did.”
“Could Sifo-Dyas have foreseen that, as well?”
“Also impossible to know. Believed he might have, that Sidious
Dooku would hunt down. To destroy.”
“Could that have motivated Dooku to leave the Order?”
“Perhaps. But by the power of the dark side, even the most
steadfast heart can be seduced.”
Obi-Wan turned to face Yoda. “Master, did Sifo-Dyas order the
clone army?”
Yoda nodded. “Contacted the Kaminoans, he did.”
“Without your knowledge?”
“Without it, yes. But exists, a record of his initial contact.”
Obi-Wan gave in to some of his frustration. “I should have
questioned Lama Su more extensively.”
“Questioned, the Kaminoans were. Furnished much they did.”
“Did they?” Obi-Wan said in surprise. “When?”
“Reticent they were when first to Kamino I went. Only what
already they had told you, I heard. That Sifo-Dyas the order placed;
that Tyranus the donor clone furnished. That for the Republic the
clones were. Seen by the Kaminoans, neither Sifo-Dyas nor Tyranus
was. But later, after attacked Kamino was, more I learned from Taun
We and Ko Sai. About the payments.”
“From Sifo-Dyas?”
“From Tyranus.”
“Could Tyranus have been an alias for Sifo-Dyas? Could he have
adopted the name to provide deniability for the Jedi in case the clone
army was discovered?”
“Wished for that I did. But killed Sifo-Dyas was, before on Kamino
Jango Fett arrived.”
“Murdered?”
Yoda compressed his thin lips. “Unsolved the crime remains, but,
yes: murdered.”
“Someone knew,” Obi-Wan said, more to himself. “Dooku?” he
asked Yoda.
“A theory I have—nothing more. Murder, Dooku committed. Then,
from the Jedi archives erased Kamino, he did. Of that tampering,
proof Master Jocasta Nu found—proof of Dooku’s action, though well
concealed it was.”
Obi-Wan recalled his visit to the archives to search out the location
of Kamino, only to be told by Jocasta Nu that the planetary system
didn’t exist. What had caused him that day three years earlier to
stare so intently at the library’s bronzium bust of Count Dooku?
“Nevertheless, the clone army continued to be financed and built,”
he said at last. “Could Sifo-Dyas and Tyranus have been partners?”
“Of our ignorance, another example this is. But playing both sides
Jango Fett clearly was. By someone on the side of the Republic,
chosen he was on Bogg Four to be the clone template. But serving
Dooku he was, as a hired killer. With the changeling who targeted
Amidala, an intermediary he was.”
Obi-Wan pictured Fett in the execution arena on Geonosis,
standing behind Dooku in a box reserved for dignitaries. “He had
knowledge of both armies. Could he have killed Sifo-Dyas?”
“Perhaps.”
“Were you able to trace the source of the payments—beyond
Tyranus, I mean?”
“From Bogg Four into a maze of deception, they led.”
“Did the Kaminoans say whether anyone had tried to persuade
them not to build the army?”
“Intercede, none did. Reveal themselves too soon, our enemies
would have.”
“So Dooku had no choice but to create an army before the clones
were trained and ready.”
“Appears that way, it does.”
Obi-Wan fell silent for a moment.
“When I was being held captive on Geonosis, Dooku told me that
the Trade Federation had been allied with Sidious during the
blockade of Naboo, but that they had later been betrayed by him.
Dooku said that Gunray had gone to him for help, and that Dooku
had tried to appeal to the Council. He claimed that, even after several
warnings, the Council refused to believe him. Is any of that true,
Master?”
“More lies,” Yoda said. “Building a case to enlist you in his cause,
Dooku was.”
You must join me, Obi-Wan, Dooku had said, and together we will
destroy the Sith!
“If Gunray hadn’t been so keen on assassinating Padmé Amidala,”
Obi-Wan mused. “If I’d failed to trace the saberdart that killed the
changeling …”
“Ignorant about the clone army, we might have remained.”
“But surely the Kaminoans would have contacted us, Master.”
“Eventually. But grown greater in numbers the Separatist army
would have. Invincible, perhaps.”
Obi-Wan’s eyes narrowed. “Mine wasn’t a case of blind luck.”
Yoda shook his head. “Meant to learn of the clone army, we were.
Destined to fight this war, we were.”
“In the nick of time. The Council couldn’t conceive of Dooku as
anything but an idealist. Perhaps he never believed that the Jedi
could become generals.”
“Nonsense,” Yoda said. “Warriors always have we been.”
“But are we helping to return balance to the Force, or are our
actions contributing to the growth of the dark side?”
Yoda grimaced. “Impatient with such talk I grow. Cryptic this
conflict is—the way it began, the way it unfolds. But for the ideals of
the Republic we fight. To prevail and restore peace our priorities
must remain. Then to the dark heart of this matter will we burrow.
Expose the truth, we will.”
Yoda was correct, Obi-Wan told himself. If the Jedi hadn’t learned
of the clone army, Dooku’s Separatists would have suddenly
appeared on the scene with tens of millions of battle droids, fleets of
warships, and seceded from the Republic without contest. But there
would have been no coexisting with the Confederacy. Ultimately it
would have bled the Republic dry. War would have been inevitable,
and the Jedi would have been caught in the middle, as they were
now.
But why hadn’t Yoda told him sooner about Sifo-Dyas?
Or was this yet another lesson, as the search for Kamino had been?
Yoda’s way of telling him to search for the thing that didn’t seem to
be there by analyzing its effects on the world around it. The
difference between knowledge and wisdom, Obi-Wan’s friend Dex
might have said, as he did on identifying the source of the saberdart
that had killed Zam Wessel, when the Temple analysis droids
couldn’t.
Yoda was regarding him when he lifted his head.
“Reveal you, your thoughts do, Obi-Wan. Believe I should have
told you sooner, you do.”
“Yours is the wisdom of centuries, Master.”
“Years matter not. Busy fighting a war, you have been. Mentoring
your headstrong Padawan. In pursuit of Dooku and his
minions … Darker, events became. Attempting to turn this war to
their own uses, Dooku and Sidious are.”
“We’ll have Dooku soon enough.”
“Lifted the veil of the dark side wasn’t after your success on Naboo.
Grown beyond Dooku this war has. Now to justice both must be
brought. And to justice all those Sidious to the dark side has turned.”
Yoda looked hard at Obi-Wan. “Uncover Sidious’s tracks, you must.
A chance this war to conclude, you and Anakin have been given.”
In the launching bay Anakin kept his eyes on the mechno-chair,
while R2-D2 and TC-16 kept their photoreceptors on Anakin. Now
that the analysts had run their diagnostic routines, the technicians
were preparing to pack the device for safe shipment to Coruscant.
Just as Obi-Wan had said, they resented the fact that Anakin had
tampered with the chair, despite the fact that, had he not, the chair
would have blown itself to pieces, taking with it the holoimage of
Sidious and whatever other communications memories it might
contain.
Maybe Qui-Gon should have left you at Watto’s junk shop.
Obi-Wan’s little joke. But the words had stung, for some reason.
Probably because of Anakin’s own musings about what might have
become of him had the Jedi not been forced to land on Tatooine to
find a replacement part for Padmé’s starship. It wasn’t hard to
imagine himself stuck in Mos Espa. With his mom; with C-3PO,
without the bright shell he now wore—
No.
At nine years of age he had been an expert Podracer; by twentyone he would have been a galactic champion. With or without QuiGon’s or Watto’s help, he would eventually have won the Boonta Eve
race, and his reputation would have been made. He would have
bought freedom for himself, his mother, all the slaves in Mos Espa,
gone on to win the Grand Races on Malastare, been hailed in the
gambling casinos on Ord Mantell and Coruscant. He wouldn’t have
become a Jedi—he would have been too old to train—would never
have learned to wield a lightsaber. But he would have been able to fly
rings around the finest of Jedi pilots, including Saesee Tiin.
And he still would have been stronger in the Force than any of
them.
He might never have met Padmé …
He had thought her an Angel, arrived on Tatooine from the Moons
of Iego. A playful remark on his part, but not as entirely innocent as
it had sounded. Even so, to her he was just a funny little boy. Padmé
didn’t know then that his precocity wasn’t limited to a skill for
building and fixing things. He had an uncanny sense for knowing
what was going to happen; a certainty that he would become
celebrated. He was different—chosen long before the Jedi Order had
bestowed the title. Mythical beings came to him—Angels and Jedi—
and he excelled in contests in which humans weren’t even meant to
participate. And yet, even with an Angel and Jedi for guests in his
home, he hadn’t divined the sudden departure from Tatooine, the
Jedi training, his marriage.
He was no longer the funny little boy. But Padmé remained his
Angel—
A vision of her broke his reverie.
Something … something had changed. His heart filled with longing
for her. Even through the Force he couldn’t clarify what he was
feeling. He simply knew that he should be with her. That he should
be there to protect her …
He flexed his artificial hand.
Remain in the living Force, he told himself. A Jedi didn’t dwell in
the past. A Jedi surrendered attachment to persons and things that
passed out of his or her life. A Jedi didn’t fantasize, or think: What if
—
He cut his eyes to the three human technicians who were fitting
the mechno-chair into a crash-foam safety harness. One of them was
working too fast, and almost knocked the chair over.
Anakin shot to his feet and stormed across the bay.
“Be careful with that!” he shouted.
The oldest of the three gave him a scornful glance. “Relax, kid, we
know our job.”
Kid.
He waved his hand, calling on the Force to keep the mechno-chair
fixed in place. The three techs strained to move it, baffled until they
realized what Anakin had done. Then the same one straightened and
glared.
“All right, let go of it.”
“When I’m convinced you actually know what you’re doing.”
“Look, kid—”
Anakin beetled his brows in anger and advanced a step. The three
techs began to back away from the chair.
They’re afraid of me. They’ve heard about me.
For an instant, their fear empowered him; then he felt shame, and
averted his glance.
The eldest was holding up his hands. “Take it easy, Jedi. I didn’t
mean to offend you.”
“Pack it yourself if you want to,” another said.
Anakin swallowed hard. “It’s important, that’s all. I don’t want
anything to happen to it.” He let the mechno-chair settle to the floor.
“Carefully, this time,” the eldest said, refusing to so much as glance
at Anakin.
“General Skywalker!” a trooper called from behind him.
Anakin turned, saw the trooper motioning to the shuttle.
“Hyperwave commo for you—from the office of the Supreme
Chancellor.”
Now the three technicians looked at him again. As well they
should.
Without a word, Anakin spun on his heel and ascended the
shuttle’s boarding ramp. Above a holoprojector plate in the ship’s
comm center, a flickering image of Supreme Chancellor Palpatine
was resolving. When Anakin had positioned himself on the
transmission grate, Palpatine smiled.
“Congratulations, Anakin, on your victory at Cato Neimoidia.”
“Thank you, sir. But I’m sorry to report that Viceroy Gunray
escaped, and that fighting continues in the rock-arch cities.”
Palpatine’s smile faltered. “Yes, I was informed as much.”
It wasn’t the first time Anakin had heard from Palpatine in the
field. At Jabiim, Palpatine had ordered Anakin to retreat before the
planet fell to the Separatists; at Praesitlyn he had praised Anakin for
having saved the day. Still, the communications were often as
awkward as they were flattering.
“What’s wrong, my boy?” Palpatine asked. “I sense that you’re
troubled about something. If it involves Gunray, accept my word that
he won’t be able to hide from us forever. None of them will. One day
you’ll have your chance for complete victory.”
Anakin wet his lips. “It’s not about Gunray, sir. Just a small
incident here that made me angry.”
“What incident?”
Anakin was tempted to disclose the details of his and Obi-Wan’s
discovery, but Yoda had told him to remain silent about the mechnochair. “Nothing important,” he said. “But I always feel guilty when I
become angry.”
“That’s a mistake,” Palpatine said gently. “Anger is natural,
Anakin. I thought we’d been through all this—regarding what took
place on Tatooine?”
“Obi-Wan doesn’t show anger—except, of course, at me. Even
then, it’s more like … aggravation.”
“Anakin, you’re a passionate young man. That’s what separates
you from your Jedi comrades. Unlike Obi-Wan and the others, you
weren’t raised in the Temple, where younglings are taught to
conquer their anger by transcending it. You enjoyed a natural
childhood. You can dream, you have imagination and vision. You’re
not some unthinking machine, some heartless piece of technology.
Not that I’m suggesting that the Jedi are,” Palpatine was quick to
add. “But for someone like you, any threat to someone or something
important to you is likely to evoke an emotional response. It
happened with your mother; it will happen again. But you shouldn’t
fight those responses. Learn from them, but don’t fight them.”
Anakin suppressed an impulse to reveal his marriage to Padmé, as
well.
“Do you think I’m immune to anger?” Palpatine said into the short
silence.
“I’ve never seen you angry.”
“Well, perhaps I’ve grown adept at reserving my anger for private
moments. But it grows more difficult to do so, in the face of the
frustrations I face with the Senate. With the way this war
persists … Oh, I know that you and the other Jedi are doing
everything you can … But the Jedi Council and I don’t always see
eye-to-eye on how this war should be waged. You know my love for
the Republic knows no bounds. That’s why I’m struggling so hard to
keep it from falling to pieces.”
Anakin forced a derisive breath. “The Senate should simply follow
your lead. Instead, they block you. They tie your hands. It’s as if they
envy the power they gave you.”
“Yes, my boy, many do. But many support me, as well. More
important, we must abide by the rules and regulations of the
Constitution, or else we are no better than those who stand in the
way of freedom.”
“Some individuals should be above the rules,” Anakin grumbled.
“A case can be made for it. And, indeed, you are one of those
people, Anakin. But you must know when to act, and when not to.”
Anakin nodded. “I understand.” He paused, then said, “How is
Coruscant, sir? I miss it.”
“Coruscant is as ever, a shining example of what life could be. But
I’m far too busy to indulge in its manifold pleasures.”
Anakin searched for some way to frame the question he needed to
ask. “I guess you’ve been meeting frequently with the Loyalist
Committee.”
“As a matter of fact, I have. A treasured group of Senators, who
value the high standards of the Republic as much as you and I do.”
Palpatine smiled. “Senator Amidala, for example. So filled with vigor
and compassion—the same qualities she brought to her term as
Queen of Naboo. She causes a stir wherever she goes.” He looked
directly at Anakin. “I’m so glad that you and she have become such
dear friends.”
Anakin swallowed nervously. “Will you tell her … will you tell her
hello from me?”
“Of course I will.”
An ensuing silence lingered an instant too long.
“Anakin, I will somehow see to it that you return from the Outer
Rim soon,” Palpatine said. “But we cannot rest until those
responsible for this war have been held accountable for their crimes
and eliminated as a threat to lasting peace. Do you understand?”
“I’ll do my part, sir.”
“Yes, my boy. I know you will.”
In the reception area of the holding office, Bail Organa paced
restlessly. He was preparing to vent his exasperation on Palpatine’s
appointments secretary when the door to the Supreme Chancellor’s
office opened once again, and his advisers began to file out between
the imposing, red-cowled guards that flanked the opening.
Advisers Sim Aloo and Janus Greejatus; director of Intelligence
Armand Isard; senior member of the Security and Intelligence
Council, Jannie Ha’Nook of Glithnos; Chagrian Speaker of the Senate
Mas Amedda; and staff aide Sly Moore, tall and ethereal-looking in
her Umbaran shadowcloak. Last to exit was Pestage.
“Senators, you’re still here, I see.”
“We’re nothing if not patient,” Bail said.
“Good to know, since the Supreme Chancellor still has much to
attend to.”
Just then Palpatine himself appeared, glancing at Bail and the
others, then at Pestage.
“Senator Organa, Senator Amidala—all of you. What a delight to
find you here.”
“Supreme Chancellor,” Bail said, “we were under the impression
we had an appointment with you.”
Palpatine lifted an eyebrow. “Indeed? Why wasn’t I informed of
this?” he asked Pestage.
“Your schedule is so full, I didn’t want to overburden you.”
Palpatine frowned. “My day is never so full that I can’t take time to
confer with members of the Loyalist Committee. Leave us, Sate, and
don’t allow us to be disturbed. I’ll call for you when you’re needed.”
Stepping aside, he gestured Bail and the others into the circular
office. C-3PO was last to cross the threshold, twisting his head to
regard both of the motionless guards.
Bail took a seat directly across from Palpatine’s high-backed chair,
which was said to house some sort of shield generator—necessary for
his protection, as were the guards, though something that would
have been unheard of three years earlier. Saturated in red, the
windowless, carpeted office contained several singular pieces of
statuary, as did Palpatine’s chambers in the Senate Office Building,
and his suite in the crown of 500 Republica. Rumored to work for
days on end without sleeping, Palpatine seemed alert, curious,
somewhat imperious.
“So, what matters have brought you here on such a glorious
Coruscant afternoon?” he said from his chair. “I can’t help but sense
a certain urgency …”
“We’ll come directly to the point, Supreme Chancellor,” Bail said.
“Now that the Confederacy has been chased from the Core and Inner
Rim, we wish to discuss the abrogation of some of the measures that
were enacted in the name of public safety.”
Palpatine gazed at Bail over steepled fingers. “Our recent victories
have made you feel so secure?”
“They have, Supreme Chancellor,” Padmé said.
“The Enhanced Security and Enforcement Act in particular,” Bail
continued. “Specifically those measures that permit the unrestricted
use of observation droids, and searches and seizures without the
need for warrants or due process.”
“I see,” Palpatine said slowly. “Unfortunately, the fact of the matter
is that the war is far from won, and I, for one, am not entirely
satisfied that traitors and terrorists are not a continued threat to
public safety. Oh, I realize that our victories give all appearances of a
quick resolution to the war, but as of this morning I was informed
that the Separatists still hold many key worlds in the Outer Rim, and
that our sieges there could go on indefinitely.”
“Indefinitely?” Eekway said.
“Why not consider ceding some of those worlds,” Fang Zar
suggested. “Trade in the Core and Inner Rim has resumed almost to
prewar standards.”
Palpatine shook his head. “Some of those Outer Rim worlds were
Republic worlds, taken by force. And I fear we risk setting a
dangerous precedent by allowing the Confederacy to retain them. I
believe, furthermore, that now is the very time to press our attack,
until the Separatists no longer present a threat to our way of life.”
“Is there not some other way than continued warfare?” Bail asked.
“Surely Dooku can be persuaded to listen to reason now.”
“You misjudge his resolve, Senator. But even if I’m wrong, suppose
we decide to cede some worlds, as a conciliatory gesture. Who will
choose which worlds? Me? You? Shall we submit the matter to a
Senate vote? And how might the denizens of those ceded worlds
respond to our gesture? How would the good people of Alderaan feel
about being a Confederacy world? Should loyalty to the Republic
count for so little? Such decisions were what prompted many worlds
to ally with Count Dooku in the first place.”
“But can we even triumph in the Outer Rim,” Eekway said, “with
the army so reduced, the Jedi so dispersed? Might it not appear that
the Jedi are deliberately perpetuating this war?”
Palpatine stood up and paced away from his huge chair, turning
his back to everyone. “This has become a very regrettable situation—
one we have attempted to correct, with limited success.” He swung
around. “We must consider how others view this war. A former Jedi
at the helm of the Separatist movement; the clone army of the
Republic led by Jedi … Many remote worlds see this war as an
attempt by the Jedi to dominate the galaxy. To many, the Jedi were
not to be trusted before the war—in part as a result of the aggressive
negotiations they were constrained to undertake during the terms of
my predecessors. Word reaches those same worlds that it was the
Jedi who invaded Geonosis, all because two of the Order had been
sentenced to death for espionage. We know better, of course, but
how to amend the misinterpretation?”
Realizing that he had allowed the discussion to go off track, Bail
said: “Returning to the matter of rescinding the Security Act—”
“I serve the Republic, Senator Organa,” Palpatine said, cutting him
off. “Introduce a measure to repeal in the Senate. I will accept
whatever outcome ensues from a vote.”
“Will you remain impartial during the debates?”
“You have my word.”
“And these amendments to the Constitution,” Mon Mothma
started to say.
“I view the Constitution as a living document,” Palpatine
interrupted. “As such, it must be allowed to expand and contract
according to circumstances. Otherwise, what do we have but stasis.”
“If we can be assured of a certain … exhalation of power,” Bana
Breemu said.
Palpatine grinned faintly. “Of course.”
“Then we’ve made a beginning,” Padmé said. “Just as I knew we
would.”
Palpatine beamed at her. “Senator Amidala, is that not the droid
Jedi Skywalker constructed?”
Padmé looked at C-3PO. “Yes, it is.”
For a moment it appeared that C-3PO was speechless—but only for
a moment.
“I am honored that you remember me, Your Majesty,” he said.
Palpatine returned an abrupt laugh. “A title more fit for a king or
emperor.” He glanced at Padmé. “In fact, I have just spoken with
him, Your Highness.”
“Anakin?” Padmé said in surprise.
Palpatine held her gaze. “Why Senator Amidala, I do believe you’re
blushing.”
Returning to the launching bay with Yoda, Obi-Wan observed
Anakin and Yoda trade the briefest of looks, the meaning of which
escaped him. Neither Jedi appeared to be bothered by the silent
exchange, and yet Yoda doddered off without a word to speak with
the Intelligence analysts huddled near the shuttle’s boarding ramp.
“Jedi Council business?” Anakin asked when Obi-Wan joined him.
“Nothing of the sort. Yoda believes that the mechno-chair may
yield clues to the whereabouts of Darth Sidious. He wants us to take
up the search.”
Anakin didn’t respond immediately. “Master, aren’t we obligated
to notify the Supreme Chancellor of our find?”
“We are, Anakin, and we will.”
“When the Council sees fit, you mean.”
“No. After the matter has been discussed.”
“But suppose one or two of you should disagree with the
majority?”
“Decisions are not always unanimous. When we are truly divided,
we defer to Yoda’s counsel.”
“Then the Force can sometimes be felt more strongly by one than
by eleven.”
Obi-Wan tried to discern Anakin’s intent. “Even Yoda is not
infallible, if that’s what you’re getting at.”
“The Jedi should be.” Anakin glanced furtively at Obi-Wan. “We
could be.”
“I’m listening.”
“By going farther with the Force than we allow ourselves. By riding
its crest.”
“Master Sora Bulq and many others would agree, Anakin. But few
Jedi have the stomach for such a ride. We’re not all as self-composed
as Yoda or Master Windu.”
“But maybe we’re wrong to attach ourselves to the Force at the
expense of life as most beings know it, which includes lust, love, and
a lot of other emotions that are forbidden to us. Devotion to a higher
cause is fine and good, Master, but we shouldn’t ignore what’s going
on in front of our own eyes. You said yourself that we’re not
infallible. Dooku understood that. He looked things squarely in the
eye, and decided to do something about it.”
“Dooku is a Sith, Anakin. He may have had his good reasons for
leaving the Order, but he is nothing now but a master of deceit. He
and Sidious prey on the weak-willed. They deceive themselves into
believing that they are infallible.”
“But I’ve seen instances where the Jedi lie to one another. Master
Kolar lied about Quinlan Vos going to the dark side. We’re lying now,
by not sharing our information about Sidious with Chancellor
Palpatine. What would Sidious or Dooku have to say about our lies?”
“Don’t compare us to them,” Obi-Wan said, more harshly than he
meant. “The Jedi are not a cult, Anakin. We don’t worship a
leadership of elites. We’re encouraged to find our paths; to validate
through personal experience the value of what we have been taught.
We don’t offer facile justifications for exterminating a perceived
enemy. We’re guided by compassion, and the belief that the Force is
greater than the sum of those who open themselves to it.”
Anakin grew quiet. “I’m only asking, Master.”
Obi-Wan took a calming breath. Too sure of themselves, the Jedi
have become, Yoda had once told him. Even the older, more
experienced ones …
How might Anakin have fared under Qui-Gon’s guidance? he
wondered. He was merely Anakin’s adoptive mentor, and a flawed
mentor in many ways. So eager to live up to the memory of Qui-Gon
that he was continually overlooking Anakin’s attempts to live up to
him.
“Carries on his shoulders the weight of the galaxy, Obi-Wan does,”
Yoda said, approaching with one of the Intelligence analysts. “Ease
your concerns, this news might,” he added before Obi-Wan could
respond.
The dark-haired, robust-looking analyst Captain Dyne perched
himself on the edge of a shipping container. “While we still don’t
know whether the mechno-chair was left behind deliberately, as
some kind of trap, the image of Sidious is authentic. The
transmission appears to have been received two days ago, local, but
we’re going to have trouble tracking its source because it was routed
through a system of hyperwave transceivers used by the Confederacy
as a substitute for the HoloNet, and was encrypted using a code
developed by the InterGalactic Banking Clan. We’ve been working on
cracking that code for some time now, and when we do, we might be
able to use the chair’s hyperwave receiver to eavesdrop on enemy
communications.”
“Better you feel already, ummm?” Yoda said to Obi-Wan,
motioning with his gimer stick.
“The chair bears the stamps of several of the manufacturers
affiliated with Dooku,” Dyne continued. “The hyperwave receiver is
equipped with summoning chips and transponding antennae similar
to ones we discovered in a mine-laying chameleon droid Master Yoda
brought back from Ilum.”
“An image of Dooku, the droid contained.”
“For the time being we’re proceeding on the assumption that
Dooku—or Sidious, for that matter—might have developed the chips,
and had them installed in transceivers awarded to Gunray and other
key members of the Council of Separatists.”
“Is the mechno-chair the same one I saw on Naboo?”
Obi-Wan asked.
“We think so,” Dyne said. “But it has undergone some
modifications in the years since. The self-destruct mechanism, for
one, along with the self-defense gas.” He looked at Obi-Wan. “Your
hunch was right about it being the same one the Neimoidians have
been using for years, and appears to have originally been developed
by a Separatist researcher named Zan Arbor.”
“Zan Arbor,” Anakin said angrily. “The gas used on the Gungans at
Ohma-D’un.” He looked at Obi-Wan. “No wonder you were able to
sense it!”
Dyne glanced from Anakin to Obi-Wan. “The gas-emitter
mechanism is identical to what you find in some of the Techno
Union’s E-Five-Twenty-Two assassin droids.”
Obi-Wan stroked his chin in thought. “If Gunray has had the chair
for fourteen years, then he could have been using it to contact
Sidious during the Naboo crisis. If we could learn who manufactured
the chair …”
Yoda laughed. “Ahead of Obi-Wan, the experts are,” he said to
Anakin.
“We know who’s responsible for the chair’s Neimoidian
engravings,” Dyne explained. “A Xi Charrian whose name I’m not
even going to attempt to pronounce.”
“How do you know?” Anakin asked.
The analyst grinned. “Because he signed his work.”
Padmé parted company with Bail and the others in the Senate
Plaza. She spied Captain Typho waving to her from the landing
platform, and hastened toward their waiting speeder. The towering
statues that graced the plaza seemed to stare down at her; the
building had never seemed so enormous.
The brief meeting with Palpatine had left her flustered—but for all
the wrong reasons. Though her every other thought was of Anakin,
she had resolved to put him from her mind for the meeting; to focus
on what was expected of her both as a public servant and concerned
citizen of the Republic. And yet, despite her best intentions,
Palpatine had brought Anakin to the fore.
Had Anakin confessed to him? she wondered. Had the Supreme
Chancellor learned of their secret ceremony on Naboo, from Anakin
or others?
A feeling of light-headedness forced her to slow her pace. The heat
of the afternoon. The glare. The enormity of recent events …
She could feel Anakin at a great remove. He was thinking of her;
she was certain of it. Images of him riffled through her mind. She
paused at one that made her smile: their first dinner together on
Tatooine. Qui-Gon reprimanding Jar Jar Binks for his uncouth
behavior. Anakin sitting beside her. Shmi … Was she sitting opposite
her? Wasn’t Shmi’s gaze fixed on her when Shmi said, referring to
Anakin: He was meant to help you.
The truth didn’t matter.
That was the way she remembered it.
Protected by two squadrons of Trade Federation Vulture fighters,
Nute Gunray’s organic-looking shuttle cut a blazing trail through the
void of deep space, plasma bolts from a dozen Republic V-wings
nipping at its upraised tail. The droid fighters were matching the
twists and slaloms of the faster enemy ships, and the blaster cannons
buried deep in the clefts of their narrow wings were spewing
continuous cover fire.
From the bridge of the Trade Federation cruiser the Invisible
Hand—flagship of the Confederacy fleet—General Grievous observed
the whole mad dance.
To any other spectator it might appear that the viceroy was risking
his wattled neck, but Grievous knew better. Late to arrive at the
rendezvous because of his decision to detour to Cato Neimoidia,
Gunray was putting on a show for the general’s benefit, attempting to
make it seem that he had been chased to the Outer Rim when, in
fact, he had undoubtedly allowed his hyperspace vectors to be
plotted by Republic forces. Where common sense would have
dictated using secret routes pioneered by and known only to
members of the Trade Federation, the core ship the shuttle had
launched from had adhered to standard hyperlanes in jumping from
the inner systems.
More to the point, Gunray’s vessel was in no real peril.
Outnumbered by better than two to one and flying headlong into the
vanguard vessels of the Confederacy fleet, it was the pilots of the
Republic starfighters who were risking their necks. At another time
Grievous might have applauded their bravery by allowing them to
escape with their lives, but Gunray’s transparent attempts at
pretense had exposed the fleet to surveillance, and now the Republic
pilots would have to die.
But not immediately.
First, Gunray would have to be punished for his blunder; given a
foretaste of what awaited him the next time he disobeyed a directive.
Grievous turned from the cruiser’s forward viewports to the
weapons stations, where a pair of rangy droids were monitoring the
pursuit.
“Gunners, the Republic starfighters are not to leave this sector.
Target and destroy their hyperdrive rings. Then you are to target and
destroy one squadron of the shuttle’s escort Vulture fighters.”
“Acquiring targets,” one of the droids said.
“Firing,” the other said.
Grievous swung back to the viewport in time to see the half-dozen
hyperdrive rings come apart in short-lived explosions. An instant
later, clouds of billowing fire began to erupt to both sides of Gunray’s
shuttle, and twelve droid fighters vanished from sight. The
unexpected explosions wreaked havoc on the rest of the escort,
leaving the shuttle vulnerable to strafing runs by the starfighters.
With the formation in tatters, the Vultures followed protocol by
attempting to regroup, but in so doing left themselves open to
precisely placed bolts from the starfighters.
A consequence of the Neimoidians’ reluctance to augment the
droid brains of the fighters with interface capabilities, Grievous
noted. Although they functioned better now than they had five years
earlier.
Three more Vulture fighters blew to pieces, this time due to
Republic fire.
Now the Neimoidian pilots of the shuttle weren’t sure what to do.
Attempts to go evasive were sabotaged by the droid ships’ attempts
to keep the shuttle centered in their shield array.
Enemy laser bolts kept finding their marks.
The destruction of the hyperdrive rings had alerted the Republic
pilots to the fact that they were well inside the range of the cruiser’s
weapons, and that they had to make their kill quickly if they hoped to
escape. Jinking and weaving among the remaining escort droids,
they pressed the attack on the shuttle.
Grievous wondered for a moment if any of the pilots might be Jedi,
in which case he would opt to capture rather than kill. The more
closely he studied the maneuvers, however, the more certain he grew
that the pilots were clones. Skilled fliers nevertheless—as indeed
their Mandalorian template had been—but they evinced none of the
supernatural perception afforded to the Jedi by the Force.
Still, Gunray’s shuttle was taking a beating. One of its landing
appendages had been amputated, and vapor streamed from its pug
tail. The vessel’s primitive particle and ray shields were still holding,
but they weakened steadily with each direct hit. The convergence of a
few more plasma bolts would overwhelm them. Then the ship the
shields protected could be sliced and diced or taken out by a wellplaced proton torpedo.
Grievous pictured Gunray, Haako, and the others strapped into
luxurious acceleration couches, shivering with dread, perhaps sorry
for the brief detour to Cato Neimoidia, wondering how a handful of
Republic pilots had so easily decimated their squadrons, certainly
comlinking the core ship to dispatch reinforcements.
The general was almost of a mind to award the Republic pilots
their kill, for he and Gunray had been at odds frequently over the
past three years. One of the first spacefaring species to build a droid
army, the Neimoidians had grown accustomed to thinking of their
soldiers and workers as thoroughly expendable. Their extraordinary
wealth had allowed them to replace whatever they lost, so they had
never developed a sense of respect for the machines fashioned for
them by Baktoid Armor Workshops, the Xi Char, Colicoids, or
others.
From their first acquaintance, Gunray had made the mistake of
treating Grievous as just another droid—even though he had been
told that this was not the case.
Perhaps Gunray had thought of him as some mindless entity, like
the reawakened Gen’Dai, Durge; or Dooku’s misguided apprentice,
Asajj Ventress; or the humanoid bounty hunter called Aurra Sing—
all three of whom had been so driven by personal hatred of the Jedi
that they had proved worthless, mere distractions while Grievous
went about the real business of war.
The attitude of the Neimoidians had changed quickly enough,
though, in part because they had been witness to Grievous’s
capabilities, but more as a result of what had occurred on Geonosis.
Had it not been for Grievous, Gunray and the rest might have
suffered the same fate as Poggle the Lesser’s lieutenant, Sun Fac.
Grievous’s actions in the catacombs that day—with the Geonosians
retreating by the thousands from the arena and companies of clone
commandos following them in—had allowed Gunray to escape the
planet alive.
Sometimes he wondered just how many clones he had killed or
wounded that day.
And Jedi, of course—though none had lived to speak of him.
The Jedi corpses that were retrieved bespoke something atrocious
that resided in those dark underground passages. Perhaps the Jedi
believed that a rancor or a reek had shredded the bodies of their
Forceful comrades; or perhaps they thought the damage had been
done by Geonosian sonic weapons set to maximum power.
Either way, they must have wondered what became of the victims’
lightsabers.
Grievous regretted that he hadn’t been able to see the reactions,
but he, too, had been forced to flee as Geonosis fell.
The revelation of his existence had had to wait until a handful of
hapless Jedi had arrived on the foundry world of Hypori. By then,
Grievous had already amassed a sizable collection of lightsabers, but
at Hypori he had been able to add several more, two of which he
wore inside his command cloak even now.
As trophies they were superior to the pelts of hunted beings he
knew some bounty hunters to affect. He admired the precision and
care that had gone into the construction of the lightsabers; more,
each seemed to retain a faint memory of its wielder. As a former
swordmaster, he could appreciate that each had been handcrafted,
rather than turned out in quantity like blasters or pike weapons.
He could respect the Jedi for that, though he had nothing but
hatred for them as an Order.
Because of the remoteness of their homeworld, his species, the
Kaleesh, had had few dealings with the Jedi. But then war had
broken out between the Kaleesh and their planetary neighbors—a
savage, insectile species known as the Huk. Grievous had become
infamous during the long conflict: conquering worlds, defeating
grand armies, exterminating entire colonies of Huk. But instead of
surrendering, as would have been the honorable course, the Huk had
appealed to the Republic to intercede, and the Jedi had arrived on
Kalee. In what passed for negotiations—fifty Jedi Knights and
Masters ready to loose their lightsabers on Grievous and his army—
the Kaleesh were made to appear the aggressors. The reason was
plain: where Kalee had little to offer in the way of trade, the Huk
worlds were rich in ore and other resources lusted after by the Trade
Federation and others. Chastised by the Republic, the Kaleesh
foundered. Sanctions and reparations were imposed; traders avoided
the planet; Grievous’s people starved and perished by the hundreds
of thousands.
Ultimately the InterGalactic Banking Clan had come to their
rescue, helping with funds, reinstating trade, providing Grievous
with a new direction.
Years later, the Muuns would come again …
Grievous’s eyes tracked the course of the now imperiled shuttle.
Count Dooku and his Sith Master would never forgive him if he
allowed anything untoward to happen to Gunray. Neimoidians were
clever. Their knowledge of secret hyperlanes was unparalleled, and
their immense army of infantry and super battle droids were rigged
with devices that compelled them to respond principally to Gunray
and his elite. Should the Neimoidian chiefs die, the Confederacy
would lose a powerful ally.
It was time to spring Gunray from the trap he had fashioned for
him.
“Launch tri-fighters to assist the shuttle,” Grievous instructed the
gunners. “Target and destroy the Republic starfighters outright.”
Deployed from the cruiser, a wing of the new red-eyed droid
fighters was soon visible from the bridge viewports.
Alerted to the approaching tri-droids, the Republic pilots had
sense enough to realize that they were severely outnumbered.
Disengaging from the last of the Vulture fighters, they began to make
for free space, the nearest habitable planets, wherever their sublight
ion drives could deliver them, since their means of jumping to
lightspeed had already been destroyed.
Two of the starfighters were slower than the rest to disengage.
Calling for magnification of the shuttle pursuit, Grievous saw that the
stragglers were newly minted ARC-170s, copiloted crafts equipped
with powerful laser cannons at the tips of their outstretched wings
and multiple torpedo launchers. He was eager to see what they were
capable of.
“Instruct three squadrons of the tri-fighter wing to shield the
shuttle and escort it to our docking bay. Set the rest against the
fleeing starfighters, except for the ARC-one-seventies. The ARC-oneseventies should be lured into engagement, without disintegration—
even if some of the tri-droids are forced to succumb to enemy fire.”
Grievous sharpened his gaze.
The tri-fighters had split into two groups, the larger forming up
around Gunray’s impaired shuttle and pouncing on the retreating Vwings, while the diverted squadron began to tease the pair of ARC170s into duels and sallies.
What impressed Grievous was how quickly the pilots came to each
other’s assistance. Combat camaraderie hadn’t been bred into them
by the Kaminoan cloners, or been something they had learned from
the Jedi. It had come from the Mandalorian bounty hunter. Fett
would have denied it, of course, would have insisted that he was out
only for himself. But that was not the way of his warrior brethren,
and that was not the way of the clone pilots now. Exaggerating the
value of each life, as if the clones were uncontrived humans.
Was the Republic so shorthanded it couldn’t afford losses?
Something to bear in mind. Something that could be exploited at
some point.
Without glancing at the bridge gunners, Grievous said: “Finish
them off.”
Then, turning to a droid at the communications suite, he added:
“See to it that the Neimoidians are ushered directly to the briefing
room. Inform the others that I am on my way.”
Still shaken from the ordeal of transiting from the core ship to the
Invisible Hand, Nute Gunray sat restively in the cabin space to which
he and Haako had been shown immediately on disembarking. He
had expected that a few Republic starfighters might pursue the core
ship from Cato Neimoidia—as they no doubt had other Trade
Federation vessels launched to equally distant star systems in the
Outer Rim. And he had hoped that the appearance of those
starfighters would convey the impression that he had been chased
from the Neimoidian purse world. But the scenario hadn’t unfolded
as planned. What should have been a quick, effortless crossing had
ended up a flight for life, with the shuttle left seriously damaged and
more than a squadron of Vulture fighters destroyed.
It was almost beyond explanation until the shuttle pilot confirmed
that most of the Vultures had been atomized by fire from the
cruiser’s turbolaser batteries.
Grievous!
Castigating him for arriving late.
Gunray would have liked nothing more than to inform Dooku of
the general’s actions, but he feared that the Sith would stand with
Grievous.
Every bit as shaken, Rune Haako sat alongside Gunray at the
cabin’s gleaming table. Other members of the Separatist Council
occupied the choice seats: the almost two-dimensionally thin San
Hill, Muun chairman of the InterGalactic Banking Clan; the Skakoan
foreman of the Techno Union, Wat Tambor, encased in the
cumbersome pressure suit that supplied him with methane; the
vestigial-winged Geonosian Poggle the Lesser, Archduke of the
Stalgasin Hive; the stalk-necked Gossam president of the Commerce
Guild, Shu Mai; the cranial-horned Corporate Alliance Magistrate,
Passel Argente; and former Republic Senators Po Nudo and Tikkes—
Aqualish and Quarren, respectively.
Separate conversations were in progress when the sound of
clanging footfalls echoed from the long corridor that led to the
briefing room. Abruptly everyone fell silent, and a moment later
General Grievous appeared in the hatchway, the rounded crown of
his elongated death mask of a helmet grazing the top of the opening,
his high-backed collar of ceramic armorplast reminiscent of a neck
brace. Sheathed in metal more suited to a starfighter, his skeletal
upper limbs were spread wide, clawlike duranium hands just
touching the hatchway frame. His two feet, which also resembled
claws, were capable of increasing his height by several centimeters.
Legs of sleek alloy bones looked as if they could propel him into
orbit. His campaign cloak, slit down one side from left shoulder to
floor, was thrown back so that twin pectorals of armor plating were
exposed, along with the reverse ribs that began at Grievous’s hip
girdle and extended upward to his shielded sternum. Beneath it all,
encased in a kind of fluid-filled, forest-green gutsac, were the organs
that nurtured the living part of him.
Behind helmet holes that rendered his visage at once mournful
and fearsome, sallow reptilian eyes fixed Gunray with a gimlet stare.
In a synthesized voice, deep and grating, he said: “Welcome aboard,
Viceroy. For a moment we feared that you weren’t going to arrive.”
Gunray felt the gazes of everyone in the cabin fall on him. His
distrust of the cyborg was no secret; nor was Grievous’s enmity for
him.
“And I can only assume that you were very troubled by the
prospect, General.”
“You must know how important you are to our cause.”
“I know it, General. Though I confess to wondering if you do.”
“I am your keeper, Viceroy. Your protector.”
Striding into the cabin, he began to circle the table, stopping
directly behind Gunray, towering over him. Peripherally, Gunray saw
Haako slouch deeper into his chair, refusing to look either at him or
at Grievous, circling his hands in a nervous gesture.
“I have no favorite among you,” the general said at last. “I
champion all of you. That is why I summoned you here: to ensure
your continued protection.”
No one said a word.
“The Republic fools itself believing that they have you on the run,
but, in fact, Lord Sidious and Darth Tyranus have engineered this,
for reasons that will be made clear soon enough. All is proceeding
according to plan. However, with your homeworlds fallen to the
Republic, your purse and colony worlds throughout the galaxy
threatened, you are ordered to remain a group for the foreseeable
future. I have been instructed to find a safe harbor for you here, in
the Outer Rim.”
“What world will accept us now?” equine-faced San Hill asked in a
disconsolate voice.
“If none offers, Chairman, then I will take one.”
Grievous walked to the hatchway, his talons screeching along the
deck. “For now, return to your separate vessels. When a world has
been selected, I will contact each of you in the usual manner, and
provide you with new rendezvous coordinates.”
Careful not to betray his sudden misgiving, Gunray traded covert
glances with Haako.
The “usual manner” meant the mechno-chair inadvertently left
behind on Cato Neimoidia.
A patchwork of dull red and pale brown, Charros IV filled the
forward viewports of the Republic cruiser. The twin-piloted ship had
been an antique twenty years earlier, but its sublight and hyperdrive
engines were reliable, and with vessels deployed on so many fronts
Obi-Wan and Anakin couldn’t be choosy. The cruiser’s once
emblematic crimson color was obscured under fresh coats of white
paint; as a result of the war, laser cannons were carefully tucked
astern under the radiator panel wings, and forward, beneath the
cockpit, in the space that had once functioned as a salon for
passengers.
Obi-Wan had plotted the three jumps it had taken them to reach
the Xi Char world from the Inner Rim, but Anakin had done all the
piloting.
“Landing coordinates coming in,” Anakin said, eyes fixed on a
display screen set into the instrument panel.
Obi-Wan was pleasantly surprised. “That will teach me not to be
skeptical. In the past when we’ve been informed that Intelligence has
done the advance work, I’ve found that to be anything but the case.”
Anakin looked at him and laughed.
“Something funny?”
“I was just thinking, Here you are again …”
Obi-Wan sat back in his chair, waiting for the rest of it.
“I only mean that, for someone with a reputation for hating space
travel, you’ve certainly taken part in more than your share of exotic
missions. Kamino, Geonosis, Ord Cestus …”
Obi-Wan plucked at his beard. “Let’s just say that the war has
prompted me to take a long view of things.”
“Master Qui-Gon would have been proud of you.”
“Don’t be too sure.”
Obi-Wan had argued against going to Charros IV. Dexter Jettster,
his Besalisk friend on Coruscant, could probably have furnished the
Intelligence analysts with everything they needed to know about
Viceroy Gunray’s mechno-chair. But Yoda had insisted that Obi-Wan
and Anakin attempt to speak personally with the Xi Charrian whose
sigil had been discovered on the walking chair.
Now Obi-Wan wondered why he had been so averse to making the
trip. Compared to the past few months, the mission already felt like a
furlough. Anakin was correct about Obi-Wan’s having had more than
his share of such assignments. But several other Jedi had also
doubled as Intelligence operatives during the course of the war.
Aayla Secura and the Caamasi Jedi Ylenic It’kla had taken a Techno
Union defector into custody on Corellia; Quinlan Vos had gone
undercover to infiltrate Dooku’s circle of dark side apprentices …
And Supreme Chancellor Palpatine hadn’t been told—or learned
since—about any of the covert operations.
It wasn’t that the Jedi Council didn’t trust him; it was more a
matter of no longer trusting anyone.
“Do you think the Xi Char will talk to us?” Anakin said.
Obi-Wan swiveled to face him. “They’ve every reason to be
accommodating. After the Battle of Naboo, the Republic refused to
do any business with them, for their having supplied the
Neimoidians with proscribed weapons. They’ve been eager to atone
ever since, especially now that their signature designs are being
mass-produced more cheaply by Baktoid Armor and other
Confederacy suppliers.”
The Xi Char’s principal contribution to the Neimoidian arsenal
had been the so-called Variable Geometry Self-Propelled Battle
Droid starfighter, a meticulously engineered solid-fuel craft that was
capable of configuring itself into three separate modes.
Anakin adopted a thin-lipped expression of wariness. “I hope they
won’t hold it against us that I destroyed so many of their fighters.”
Obi-Wan laughed shortly. “Yes, let’s hope your fame hasn’t spread
this far into the Outer Rim. But in fact, our success hinges almost
entirely on whether TeeCee-Sixteen can speak Xi Char as fluently as
he claims.”
“Master Kenobi, I assure you that I can speak the tongue almost as
well as an indigenous Xi Charrian,” the protocol droid chimed in
from one of the cockpit’s rear seats. “My term of service to Viceroy
Gunray demanded that I familiarize myself with the trader’s tongues
used by all the hive species, including the Xi Char, the Geonosians,
the Colicoids, and many others. My fluency will ensure complete
cooperation on the part of the Xi Char. Although I expect that they
will be rather disgusted by my physical appearance.”
“Why’s that?” Anakin asked.
“Devotion to precision technology forms the basis of Xi Char
religious beliefs. They accept as a matter of faith that meticulous
work is no different from prayer; indeed, their workshops have more
in common with temples than factories. When a Xi Charrian is
injured, he goes into self-exile, so that others won’t have to look upon
his imperfections or deformities. A Xi Char adage has it that ‘The
deity is in the details.’ ”
“Wear your flaws proudly, TeeCee,” Anakin said, raising and
clenching his right hand. “I do, mine.”
The cruiser was descending into Charros IV’s ice-clouded
atmosphere. Leaning toward the viewport, Obi-Wan gazed down on
an arid, almost treeless world. The Xi Char lived on high plateaus,
hemmed in by ranges of snowcapped mountains. Expansive blackwater lakes dotted the landscape.
“A bleak planet,” Obi-Wan said.
Anakin made adjustments to the controls to compensate for strong
winds that were buffeting the ship. “I’ll take it over Tatooine any
day.”
Obi-Wan shrugged. “I can think of far worse places to live than
Tatooine.”
Into view came the landing platform to which they had been
directed. Oval in shape and perfectly sized to the cruiser, it looked
newly built.
“I’m certain that it was constructed specifically for us,” TC-16 said.
“That’s why the Xi Char were unremitting in their requests to know
the cruiser’s exact dimensions.”
Anakin glanced at Obi-Wan. “The Republic could use the Xi Char
right about now.”
He set the cruiser down on its broad disks of landing gear and
extended the vessel’s starboard boarding ramp. At the top of the
ramp, Obi-Wan raised the hood of his cloak against a frigid wind that
howled down the slopes. Ahead, a gleaming alloy runner ran from
the edge of the landing platform to a cathedral-like structure half a
kilometer distant. To both sides of the runner stood hundreds of
excited Xi Charrians.
“Guess they don’t get many guests,” Anakin said as he, Obi-Wan,
and TC-16 started down the ramp.
As was often the case, the Xi Char’s technological creations
mirrored their own anatomy and physiology. With their short,
chitinous bodies, quartets of pointed legs, scissor-action feet, and
teardrop-shaped heads, they might have been living versions of the
shapeshifting droid fighters they had helped produce for the Trade
Federation—in walk/patrol mode, at any rate. The wild chitterings of
the hundreds-strong mob of welcomers was so loud that Anakin had
to raise his voice to be heard.
“Celebrity treatment! I think I’m going to enjoy this!”
“Just be sure to follow my lead, Anakin.”
“I’ll try, Master.”
The closer the Jedi and the protocol droid drew to the edge of the
landing platform, the louder the chitterings became. Obi-Wan didn’t
know what to make of the sheer eagerness he felt from the aliens. It
was as if some sort of footrace were about to begin. Frequently, an
individual Xi Charrian, carried away by enthusiasm, would leap onto
the sleek runner, only to be yanked back into the crowd by others.
“TeeCee, are they normally so zealous?” Obi-Wan asked.
“Yes, Master Kenobi. But their zest has nothing to do with us. It’s
the ship!”
The meaning of the remark became clear the instant the three of
them stepped from the landing platform. At once the Xi Charrians
surged forward and swarmed the cruiser, covering it from flat-faced
bow to barrel-thrustered stern. Obi-Wan and Anakin watched in awe
as patches of carbon scoring disappeared, dents were straightened,
pieces of superstructure were realigned, and transparisteel viewports
were polished.
“Let’s remember to tip them when we leave,” Anakin said.
Occasionally a Xi Charrian would leap on TC-16 or make a grab for
one of his limbs, but the droid was able to shake his assailants off.
“In their eagerness to perfect me, I’m afraid they’ll wipe my
memory!” the droid said.
“Would that be such a bad thing,” Anakin said, “after what you
claim to have been through?”
“How can I be expected to learn from my mistakes if I can no
longer remember them?”
They were halfway down the runner when a pair of larger Xi
Charrians scurried out to meet them. TC-16 exchanged chitterings
and stridulations with them, and explained.
“These two will take us to the Prelate.”
“No weapons,” Anakin said quietly. “That’s a good sign.”
“The Xi Char are a peaceful species,” the droid explained. “They
care only about the engineering of a piece of technology, not its
intended use. That was why they felt unjustly accused and harshly
judged by the Republic for the part their droid fighters played in the
Battle of Naboo.”
The enormous building TC-16 had called a workshop topped two
hundred meters in height and was crowned with latticework spires
and towers that evoked strains of eerie music from the steady wind.
Arrays of tall skylights lit the vast interior space, in which thousands
of Xi Charrians toiled. Arcades of exquisitely engraved columns
supported a vaulted ceiling of exposed roof trusses, among which
roosted several thousand more Xi Charrians, suspended by their
scissor feet and humming contentedly.
“The night shift?” Anakin wondered aloud.
Their pair of escorts led them into a kind of chancery, whose tall
doors opened on a spotless room that could have passed for the
captain’s cabin of a luxury space yacht. Occupying a throne-like chair
in the center of the room was the largest Xi Charrian the Jedi had yet
seen, being attended to by a dozen smaller ones. Elsewhere, groups
of tool-wielding Xi Charrians were going over every square
millimeter of the chamber, scrubbing, cleaning, polishing.
Without ceremony, TC-16 approached the Prelate and tendered a
greeting. The droid had tasked his vocoder to provide Obi-Wan and
Anakin with simultaneous translations of his utterances.
“May I present Jedi Obi-Wan Kenobi, and Jedi Anakin Skywalker,”
he began.
Waving away his retinue, the Prelate pivoted his long head to
regard Obi-Wan.
“TeeCee,” Obi-Wan said, “tell him we’re sorry to have disturbed
him during his ablutions.”
“You’re not disturbing him, sir. The Prelate is attended to in
similar fashion at all hours of the day.”
The Prelate chittered.
“Excellency, I speak your language as a result of my former
employment in the court of Viceroy Nute Gunray.” The droid listened
to the Prelate’s response, then said: “Yes, I realize that does not
endear me to you. But may I say in defense that my time among the
Neimoidians was the most trying of my existence. To which my
physical appearance surely attests, and is cause for my great shame.”
Clearly mollified, the Prelate chittered again.
“These Jedi have come to seek permission from you to pose
questions to a devotee in Workshop Xcan—a certain t’laalak-s’lalakt’th’ak.”
TC-16 supplied the glottal stops and clicking sounds necessary to
pronounce the name.
“A virtuoso engraver, to be sure, Excellency. As to the Jedi’s
interest in him, it is hoped that a work of art to which he devoted
himself will provide a clue as to the current whereabouts of an
important Separatist leader.” The droid listened, then added: “And
may I add that anything that brings joy to the Xi Char brings
contentment to the Republic.”
The Prelate’s eye grooves found the Jedi again.
“The lightsabers are not weapons, Excellency,” TC-16 said after a
brief exchange. “But if permission to speak with t’laalak-s’lalakt’th’ak rests on their surrendering the lightsabers, then I’m certain
they will comply.”
Obi-Wan was already reaching for his lightsaber, but Anakin
looked dubious.
“You did say you would follow my lead.”
Anakin opened his cloak. “I said I’d try, Master.”
They handed the lightsabers to TC-16, who presented them to the
Prelate for inspection.
“It hardly surprises me that you see room for improvement,
Excellency,” the droid said after a moment. “But then, what tool
could fail to benefit from the touch of a Xi Charrian?” He listened,
then added: “I’m certain that the Jedi know you will honor your
pledge to leave the imperfections intact.”
“That went better than expected,” Obi-Wan said as he, Anakin, and
TC-16 were being escorted into the heart of Workshop Xcan.
Anakin wasn’t convinced. “You’re too trusting, Master. I sense
much suspicion.”
“We can thank Raith Sienar for some of that.”
Almost two decades earlier, the wealthy and influential ownerpresident of Sienar Design Systems—a chief supplier of starfighters
to the Republic—had spent time among the Xi Char, mastering
ultraprecision engineering techniques he would later incorporate
into his own designs. Revealed to be a “nonbeliever,” Sienar had
been exiled from Charros IV, and been made the target of bounty
hunters, four of whom Sienar had managed to strand at a black hole
known only to him and a handful of other hotshot hyperspace
explorers. Sienar had engaged in similar acts of corporate espionage
among the Trade Federation, Baktoid Armor, Corellian Engineering,
and Incom Corporations, but the Xi Char had a long memory for
what they considered sacrilege. Six years before the Battle of Naboo,
a second attempt on Raith’s life had resulted in the death of his
father, Narro, at Dantooine. But once again the heretic had escaped.
Ten years back, Obi-Wan and Anakin had had their own brush
with Sienar at the living world known as Zonama Sekot. Because
Sienar had been partly responsible for Zonama Sekot’s
disappearance, he was also the reason that the Xi Char no longer
accepted human apprentices.
Workshop Xcan was a marvel to behold.
Xi Char artisans worked individually or in groups of three to three
hundred, on devices ranging from high-end home appliances to
starfighters, adding enhancements or adornments, tweaking,
personalizing, customizing in a thousand different ways. Here were
all the priceless devices Obi-Wan and Anakin had found crammed
into storage rooms in Gunray’s Cato Neimoidia citadel. The
environment was the antithesis of the deafening freneticism that
characterized a Baktoid Armor foundry, such as the one the Republic
had commandeered on Geonosis. Xi Charrians rarely conversed with
one another while working, preferring instead to amplify their
concentration through the repetition of high-pitched stridulations,
analogous to chants. The few who did take notice of the three visitors
in their midst showed more interest in TC-16 than in the Jedi.
And yet, for all the fine work that was performed in Workshop
Xcan, the cathedral-factory was little more than a stepping-stone for
many Xi Charrians, who aspired to work for the Haor Chall
Engineering conglomerate which had abandoned Charros IV for
other worlds in the Outer Rim.
The same pair of outsized aliens who had escorted Obi-Wan and
Anakin to the Prelate’s chancery guided them to t’laalak-s’lalakt’th’ak’s altar, which was located in the workshop’s western
colonnade, the piers of which were decorated with mosaics of
engraved tiles. High overhead, resting Xi Charrians hung inverted
from the great curving rafters that supported the roof, like
configurable droid fighters arrayed inside a Trade Federation carrier.
Obi-Wan could see how the sound of their ceaseless humming
could be slightly unnerving.
t’laalak-s’lalak-t’th’ak was engrossed in engraving a corporate logo
into a piece of starship console. Dozens of yet-to-be-completed
pieces walled him in on one side; completed pieces were on the
other. On hearing his name called, he glanced up from his work.
The escorts chittered to him briefly before TC-16 took over.
“t’laalak-s’lalak-t’th’ak, first allow me to say that your work is of
such exceptional quality that the deities themselves must be
covetous.”
The Xi Charrian accepted the compliment in humility, and
chittered a response.
“We appreciate the offer to watch you at work. But in fact, we are
not unacquainted with some of your finer pieces, and it is because of
one piece in particular that we have journeyed so far to speak with
you. An example that recently came to light on Cato Neimoidia.”
The Xi Charrian took a long moment to respond.
“A mechno-chair you adorned for Trade Federation viceroy, Nute
Gunray, some fourteen standard years ago.” TC-16 listened, then
added: “But surely it was yours, for the inner portion of the rear leg
bears your devotional symbol.” Again he listened. “A Baktoid
forgery? Are you suggesting that your work could so easily be
imitated?”
Anakin nudged Obi-Wan in the upper arm: Xi Charrians working
nearby were beginning to take a keen interest in the conversation.
“We understand your reluctance to discuss such matters,” TC-16
was saying quietly. “Why, the very fact that you autographed a piece
could be interpreted by the Prelate as a statement of pride.”
t’laalak-s’lalak-t’th’ak’s anger was apparent.
“Well, of course, you should be proud. But should the Prelate learn
that the piece has for all these years resided with a personage such as
Viceroy Gunray—”
Without another chitter, the Xi Charrian let go his tools and
launched himself from his work pallet—not at TC-16 or either of the
Jedi, but straight up into the web of overhead girders. Ignoring
indignant squeals from rudely awakened Xi Charrians, he began to
leap from one girder to the next, clearly determined to reach one of
the tall skylights that perforated the roof.
Obi-Wan watched him for a moment, then turned to Anakin. “I
don’t think he wants to speak with us.”
Anakin kept his eyes on t’laalak-s’lalak-t’th’ak. “Well, he has to.”
And with that, he leapt in pursuit.
“Anakin, wait!” Obi-Wan said, then added, more to himself, “Oh,
what’s the use,” and sprang up toward the ceiling.
Hurling himself from truss to truss like some circus performer,
Anakin arrived quickly at the intricate tracery surrounding the
partially opened roof window through which t’laalak-s’lalak-t’th’ak
was desperately trying to squirm. The Xi Charrian’s insectile forelegs
were already outside the window when Anakin leapt again, clutching
on to him in an effort to return him to the floor. But the alien was
stronger than he looked. Chittering madly, he leapt for a higher
window, this time taking Anakin with him.
Ten meters away, Obi-Wan paralleled the Xi Charrian’s flight into
the upper reaches of the vaulted ceiling, where the chase had now
roused scores of roosting Xi Charrians, inciting more than a few to
join in.
Anakin was still trying to drag his quarry down, but his weight was
insufficient to the task. Fearing what might result should Anakin call
too strongly on the Force—Obi-Wan had visions of the entire
workshop crumbing to pieces!—he fairly flew after them, barely
managing at the apex of his ascent to grab hold of t’laalak-s’lalakt’th’ak’s rear legs.
And down they came.
All three, entwined, and bringing with them more than thirty
inverted Xi Charrians. Cascading onto the floor, Obi-Wan and
Anakin lost their hold on t’laalak-s’lalak-t’th’ak, and suddenly
couldn’t tell one Xi Charrian from the next. Losing t’laalak-s’lalakt’th’ak had ceased to be an immediate concern, in any case, because
Xi Charrians throughout the workshop were rushing to the aid of
those the two Jedi had caused to plummet from the rafters. Some
were already attempting to zap the Jedi into submission by
brandishing assorted soldering and engraving tools, while others
were busy constructing a plasteel hemisphere under which the
violence might be contained.
“No mayhem!” Obi-Wan shouted.
Anakin showed him a wide-eyed glance from beneath a threemeter-tall heap of irate Xi Charrians.
“Who exactly are you talking to?”
Obi-Wan glanced around the workshop. “Topple something—
quickly! Before they complete the mound!”
With a shoving motion of his free hand, Obi-Wan overturned a
small table twenty meters away, spilling several stacks of freshly
engraved comlinks and droid summoners. Chittering in panic, half
the Xi Charrians who were holding him to the floor—and most of the
ones rushing toward him—scampered off to repair the damaged
devices.
“Quickly, Anakin!”
Even with his hands pinned under him, Anakin managed to upend
a pallet of kitchen appliances, then knock over a carefully arranged
collection of toys, then tear from the wall more than half a dozen
sconces.
Chittering in dismay, more Xi Charrians raced off.
“Stop making it look like fun!” Obi-Wan cautioned.
Eyes riveted on a bin filled with musical instruments, he was about
to rid himself of his remaining tormenters when blasterfire erupted
in the workshop, and into the midst of the throng of infuriated Xi
Char appeared the Prelate himself, seated on a litter carried by six
bearers and grasping a weapon in each foot.
Twenty Xi Charrians flattened themselves to the floor as the
Prelate brought the blasters to bear on Obi-Wan and Anakin. But
before a bolt could be fired TC-16 emerged from a side gallery, his
body realigned and polished to a dazzling luster, shouting: “Look
what they’ve done to me!”
The droid’s tone of voice combined anguish and wonder, but the
change in him was so unexpected and remarkable that the Prelate
and his bearers could only gape, as if a miracle had occurred in their
midst. A babble of chitterings was exchanged, before the Prelate
swung back to Obi-Wan and Anakin, raising the blasters once more.
“But they meant no harm, Excellency!” the droid intervened.
“t’laalak-s’lalak-t’th’ak fled in response to their questions! Master
Obi-Wan and Jedi Skywalker sought merely to ascertain the reason!”
The Prelate’s gaze singled out t’laalak-s’lalak-t’th’ak.
TC-16 translated.
“Master Kenobi, the Prelate advises you to pose your questions,
and to leave Charros Four before he has a change of heart.”
Obi-Wan looked at t’laalak-s’lalak-t’th’ak, then at TC-16. “Ask him
if he remembers the chair.”
The droid relayed the question.
“He remembers it now.”
“Was the engraving done here?”
“He answers, ‘yes,’ sir.”
“Was the chair brought to Charros Four by the Neimoidians or by
another?”
“He says, sir: ‘By another.’ ”
Obi-Wan and Anakin traded eager looks.
“Was the hyperwave transceiver already affixed to it?” Anakin
asked.
TC-16 listened. “Both the transceiver and the holoprojector itself
were already affixed to the chair. He says that he did little but
inscribe the legs of the chair and tweak some of its motion systems.”
Lowering his voice, the droid added: “May I say, sirs, that t’laalaks’lalak-t’th’ak’s voice is … quavering. I suspect that he is hiding
something.”
“He’s afraid,” Anakin said. “And not of Nute Gunray.”
Obi-Wan looked at TC-16. “Ask him who made the transceiver. Ask
him where it shipped from.”
t’laalak-s’lalak-t’th’ak’s chitterings sounded contrite.
TC-16 said: “The transceiver unit arrived from a facility known as
Escarte. He believes that the device’s maker is still there.”
“Escarte?” Anakin said.
“An asteroid mining facility,” TC-16 explained, “belonging to the
Commerce Guild.”
Ten years ago it would have had all the makings of a full-blown
diplomatic incident,” Intelligence officer Dyne was explaining to
Yoda and Mace Windu in the data room of the Jedi Temple.
Filled with computers, holoprojector tables, and communications
apparatus, the windowless chamber also housed an emergency
beacon that transmitted on a frequency known only to the Jedi,
allowing the Temple to send and receive encrypted messages without
having to rely on the more public HoloNet.
“Since when are the Xi Char so forgiving?” Mace asked. Dressed in
a brown belted tunic and beige trousers, he was poised on the edge of
a desk, one booted foot planted on the shiny floor.
“Since they’ve been forced to make do with subcontracting work,”
Dyne said. “What they want is to get back in the game by landing a
nice fat Republic contract for starfighters or combat droids. It has to
be driving them mad, knowing that Sienar is getting even richer on
techniques he basically stole from them.”
Mace glanced at Yoda, who was standing off to one side, both
hands resting on the knob of his gimer stick. “Then the Xi Char
Prelate isn’t likely to report the incident to the Senate.”
Dyne shook his head. “Not a chance. No real harm was done,
anyway.”
“Reach the ears of the Supreme Chancellor, it won’t,” Yoda said.
“But surprised I was by Obi-Wan’s report. Losing some of his better
judgment, Obi-Wan is.”
“We both know why,” Mace said. “He’s become Anakin’s partisan.”
“If the Chosen One Skywalker is, then a hundred such diplomatic
incidents we should suffer without concern.” Yoda shut his eyes for a
moment, then looked at the Intelligence analyst. “But come to tell us
of these things, Captain Dyne hasn’t.”
Dyne grinned. “We’ve succeeded in deciphering the code Dooku—
and, we have to assume, Sidious—has been using to communicate
with the Council of Separatists. Using the code, we were able to
intercept a message sent to Viceroy Gunray, through the mechnochair.”
Mace came to his feet. “Your people have been working on
cracking that code for years.”
“The chair’s hyperwave transceiver provided us with our first solid
lead. We saw right away that the code embedded in the transceiver’s
memory was a variant on codes used by the InterGalactic Banking
Clan. So we decided to offer a deal to one of the Muuns arrested after
the Battle of Muunilinst. It took some convincing, but the Muun
finally confirmed that the Confederacy code comes closest to a code
used on Aargau, for transferring bank funds and such.” Dyne paused,
then added: “Remember the missing credits that became the basis
for accusations leveled against Chancellor Valorum back in the day?”
Yoda nodded. “Remember the incident well, we do.”
“The credits that allegedly disappeared into the pockets of
Valorum’s family members on Eriadu were routed through Aargau.”
“Interesting, this is.”
Dyne opened an alloy briefcase and removed a ribbed data cell.
Moving to one of the holoprojector tables, he inserted the cell into a
socket. A meter-high holoimage appeared in the table’s cone of blue
light.
“General Grievous,” Yoda said, narrowing his eyes.
“You’ll be pleased to learn that I’ve chosen a world for us,
Viceroy,” Grievous was saying. “Belderone will be our temporary
home.” The cyborg fell silent for a moment. “Viceroy? Viceroy!”
Whirling to someone off cam, he barked: “End transmission.”
Dyne paused the message before Grievous had faded from view.
“As high-resolution an image as I’ve ever seen,” he said.
“Technology of a different order than we’re used to seeing—even
from the Confederacy.”
“About his image, Sidious cares, ummm?”
Mace’s clean-shaven upper lip curled. “What was the source of the
transmission?”
“Deep in the Outer Rim,” Dyne said. “Six clone pilots pursued a
core ship that jumped to the sector following the Battle of Cato
Neimoidia. None returned.”
“Rendezvous of the Confederacy fleet, it is,” Yoda said.
Mace nodded. “And Belderone next.” Again his gaze fell on Dyne.
“Anything further on the source of the original Sidious
transmission?”
Dyne shook his head. “Still working on it.”
Mace paced away from the table. “Belderone is not a highly
populated world, but it is friendly to the Republic. Grievous will kill
millions just to make a point.” He glanced at Yoda. “We can’t let that
happen.”
Dyne looked from Mace to Yoda and back again. “If Republic
forces are waiting when Grievous attacks, the Separatists will realize
that we’ve managed to eavesdrop on their transmissions.”
Yoda pressed his fingers to his lips in thought. “Act, we must.
Lying in wait, Republic forces will be.”
Dyne nodded. “You’re right, of course. If no actions are taken, and
word of this intelligence were to leak …” He regarded Yoda. “Do we
inform the Supreme Chancellor?”
Yoda’s ears twitched. “Difficult, this decision is.”
“The information stays here,” Mace said firmly.
Yoda sighed with purpose. “Agree I do. Use the beacon we will, to
gather a force.”
“Obi-Wan and Anakin aren’t far from Belderone,” Mace said. “But
they’re pursuing another lead to Sidious’s whereabouts.”
“Wait, the lead will. Needed Obi-Wan and Anakin will be.” Yoda
turned to the still image of General Grievous. “Prepare carefully for
this battle, we must.”
In dreams, Grievous remembered his life.
His mortal life.
On Kalee, and in the aftermath of the Huk War.
After all the close calls on battlefields on his home system worlds,
on Huk worlds, sowing destruction, exterminating as many of them
as he could … After all the times he had returned home wounded,
bloodied to the bone, surrounded by his wives and offspring, basking
in their support—relying on it to recall him to life.
After all the brushes with death … to be fatally injured in a shuttle
crash.
The unfairness, the indignity had cost him more pain than the
injuries themselves. To be denied a warrior’s death—as was his due!
Floating suspended in bacta, keenly aware that no healing fluid or
gamma blade wielded by living being or droid could repair his body.
In moments of consciousness: seeing his wives and offspring gazing
on his ravaged body from the far side of the permaglass. Offering
words of encouragement; prayers for his return to health.
He had asked himself: could he be content to be a mind in a body
without feeling? More, could he abandon a life of combat for a life in
which the only battles he fought were with himself? The struggle to
endure, to live another day …
No. It was beyond him.
By then, the Huk War had ended—more accurately had been
ended by the Jedi, and the Kaleesh were still reaping the whirlwind.
Their world in ruins, their appeals for justice and fair play ignored by
the Republic.
Ever on the alert for investment opportunities, members of the
InterGalactic Banking Clan had offered Kalee a dubious sort of
rescue. They would support the planet financially, assume its
staggering debt, if Grievous would agree to serve the clan as an
enforcer. Their hailfire weapons were proficient at delivering
“payment reminders” to delinquent clients, and their IG-series
assassin droids took care of the wet work. But the hail-fires had to be
programmed, the IGs were dangerously unpredictable, and
assassination was bad for business.
The clan wanted someone with a talent for intimidation.
Both to save his world and to provide himself with a touch of the
life he had known as a warrior, a strategist, a leader of armies,
Grievous had accepted the offer. IBC chairman San Hill himself had
overseen the details of the arrangement. Still, Grievous wasn’t
entirely proud of his decision. Debt collection was a far cry from
warcraft. An arena for beings without principles; for beings so
attached to their possessions that they feared death. But Kalee had
profited from his work for IBC. And Grievous’s previous notoriety
was such that it could not be eclipsed.
Then: the shuttle crash. The accident. The misfortune …
He told his would-be healers to fish him from the bacta tank. He
could bear to die in atmosphere or the vacuum of deep space, but not
in liquid. In the shadow of felled trees that would fuel his funeral
pyre, he lapsed in and out of consciousness. That was when San Hill
had paid him a second visit. Something consequential in mind.
Obvious even to someone who could barely see straight.
“We can keep you alive,” rail-thin Hill had whispered into
Grievous’s unimpaired ear.
Others had promised as much. He pictured breathing devices, a
hover platform, a surround of life-sustaining machines.
But Hill had said: “None of that. You will walk, you will speak, you
will retain your memories—your mind.”
“I have my mind,” Grievous had said. “What I lack is a body.”
“Most of your internal organs are damaged beyond the repair of
the finest surgeons,” Hill had continued. “And you will have to
surrender even more than you already have. You will no longer know
the pleasures of the flesh.”
“Flesh is weak. You need only gaze on me to see that.”
Encouraged by the remark, Hill had talked in glowing terms of the
Geonosians: how they had raised cyborg technology to an art form,
and how the blending of living and machine technology was the
future.
“Consider the battle droids of the Trade Federation,” Hill had said.
“They answer to a brain that is also nothing more than a droid.
Protocol droids, astromechs, even assassin droids—all require
programming and frequent maintenance.”
Two words had caught Grievous’s attention: battle droids.
“A war is brewing that will call many droids to the front,” Hill had
said just loudly enough to be heard. “I am not privy to when it will
begin, but when that day comes, the entire galaxy will be involved.”
His interest piqued, Grievous had said: “A war begun by whom?
The Banking Clan? The Trade Federation?”
“Someone more powerful.”
“Who?”
“In time, you will meet him. And you will be impressed.”
“Then why does he need me?”
“In every war, there are leaders and there are commanders.”
“A commander of droids.”
“More precisely, a living commander of droids.”
So he had allowed the Geonosians to go to work on him,
constructing a duranium and ceramic shell for what little of him
remained. His recuperation had been long and difficult. Coming to
terms with his new and in many ways improved self, even longer and
more difficult. Only then had he been presented to Count Dooku, and
only then had his real training begun. From the Geonosians and
members of the Techno Union he had already come to understand
the inner workings of droids. But from Dooku—Lord Tyranus—he
came to understand the inner workings of the Sith.
Tyranus himself had trained him in lightsaber technique. In mere
weeks he had surpassed any of Tyranus’s previous students. It
helped, of course, to have an indestructible body reminiscent of a
Krath wardroid. The ability to tower over most sentient beings.
Crystal circuitry. Four grasping appendages …
In dreams he remembered his past life.
But in fact, he was not dreaming, for dreams were a product of
sleep, and General Grievous did not sleep. He endured instead brief
periods of stasis in a pod-like chamber that had been created for him
by his body’s builders. While inside that chamber he could
sometimes recall what it had felt like to live. And while inside, he was
not to be disturbed—unless in the event of inimical circumstances.
The chamber was equipped with displays linked to devices that
monitored the status of the Invisible Hand. But Grievous was aware
of a problem even before the displays told him as much.
As he exited the chamber and hurried for the cruiser’s bridge, a
droid joined him, supplying updates.
No sooner had the Separatist fleet emerged from hyperspace at
Belderone than it had come under attack—not by Belderone’s meager
planetary defense force, but by a Republic battle group.
“Wings of starfighters are converging on the fleet,” the droid
reported. “Assault cruisers, destroyers, and other capital vessels are
arrayed in a screen formation above night-side Belderone.”
Klaxons were blaring in the corridors, and gunner droids and
Neimoidians were hastening to battle stations.
“Order our ships to raise shields and form up behind us. Vanguard
pickets are to fall back in shield formation to protect the core
vessels.”
“Affirmative, General.”
“Roll the ship starboard to minimize our profile, and reorient the
deflector shields. Deploy all wings of droid tri-fighters and ready all
port-side batteries for enfilade fire.”
Grievous braced himself against a bulkhead as the cruiser was
shaken by an explosion.
“Ranged fire from the Republic destroyers,” the droid said. “No
damage. Shields functioning at better than ninety percent.”
Grievous quickened his pace.
On the bridge, a real-time hologram of the battle was running
above the tactical console. Grievous took a moment to study the
deployment of the Republic ships and starfighter squadrons. Made
up of sixty capital vessels, the battle group wasn’t large enough to
overwhelm the Separatist fleet, but it packed enough combined
firepower to defend trivial Belderone.
On the far side of the dun-colored planet, a convoy of transports
was angling toward the lesser of Belderone’s two inhabited moons,
starfighters and corvettes flying escort.
“Evacuees, General,” one of the droids explained.
Grievous was stunned. An organized evacuation could mean only
one thing: the Republic had somehow learned that Belderone had
been targeted! But how could that be, when only the Separatist
leaders had been apprised?
He moved to the forward viewports to observe the strobing
spectacle of battle.
He would learn how he had been foiled. But survival was the first
order of business.
With its stubby wings and bulbous aft cockpit, Anakin’s starfighter
was closer in design to the Delta-7 Aethersprite he had flown at the
start of the war than it was to the newer-generation V-wings and
ARC-170s flown by clone pilots. But where the Delta-7 was triangular
in shape, the two-tone starfighter had a blunt bow composed of two
separate fuselages, each equipped with a missile launcher. Laser
cannons occupied notches forward of the wings. As with the Delta-7,
the astromech socket was located to one side of the humpbacked
cockpit.
Plus, Anakin had made a few significant modifications.
Already a veteran of battles at Xagobah and other worlds, the craft
looked as if it had been around for ten years. But it handled better
than the Azure Angel he had flown at Praesitlyn, and was faster, as
well.
Launched from the Integrity, Anakin poured on speed in an effort
to catch up with the ARCs and V-wings that had been first to deploy
from the assault cruiser’s massive ventral bay. An instrument panel
monitor indicated that the starfighter’s ion drive was functioning at
just under optimal.
“Artoo,” he said toward the comlink, “run a diagnostic on the
starboard thruster.”
The starfighter’s console display translated the droid’s toodled
response into Basic characters.
“I thought so. Well, go ahead and make the adjustments. We don’t
want to be last to arrive.”
R2-D2’s plaintive mewl needed no translation.
The drive readout graph pulsed and climbed, and the starfighter
surged forward.
“That’s it, pal. Now we’re moving!”
Settling back into the padded seat, he flexed his gloved hands and
exhaled slowly through his mouth. Enough spying, he told himself.
He wasn’t any closer to Coruscant, but at least he was back where he
belonged, wedded to a starfighter, and prepared to show the enemy a
thing or two about space combat.
Ahead of him—spearhead to groups of needle-nosed pickets that
were screening the capital ships—slued hundreds of enemy craft.
Some were thirteen-year-old Vulture fighters with paired wings that
resembled seedpods; others were compact tri-fighter droids; and still
others were space-capable Geonosian twin-beaked Nantex
starfighters. Just now the lead ARC-170s were weaving through
permutations of close combat with the droid fighters, the glowing
pulses of energy beams turning local space into a web of devastation.
Not since Praesitlyn had he soared into such an enemy-rich
environment.
Target practice, he thought, allowing a grin.
He took his right hand from the control yoke to activate the longrange scanners. The threat-assessment screen displayed the
signatures and deployment of the Separatist capital vessels: Trade
Federation Lucrehulks and core ships; Techno Union Hardcells, with
their columnar thruster packages and egg-shaped fuselages;
Commerce Guild Diamond cruisers and Corporate Alliance Fantails;
frigates, gunboats, and communications ships featuring huge circular
transponders.
The whole Separatist parade.
Switching his comlink over to the battle net, Anakin hailed his
wingmate.
“I say we leave the small stuff to Odd Ball and the other pilots, and
go straight for the ones that matter.”
Accustomed to Anakin’s disregard for call signs, Obi-Wan
answered in kind.
“Anakin, there are approximately five hundred droids positioned
between Grievous and us. What’s more, the capital ships are too
heavily shielded.”
“Just follow my lead, Master.”
Obi-Wan sighed into the comlink microphone. “I’ll try. Master.”
Anakin scanned the threat-assessment display, committing to
memory vector lines of the closest enemy fighters. Then he reopened
a channel to R2-D2.
“Battle speed, Artoo!”
Again, the starfighter shot forward. Indicators on the console
redlined. Just short of the roiling fray, when he could sense the droid
ships drawing a bead on him, he shoved the yoke into a corner for a
pushover and streaked out of the maneuver with all weapons blazing.
Droids flared and flamed to all sides of him.
Wending through clouds of expanding fire, he locked down the
trigger of the laser cannons and made a second pass through the
enemy wave, destroying a dozen more fighters in a heartbeat. But the
tri-fighters were onto him now, eager for payback. A sunburst of
scarlet beams seared past the bubble canopy, and a fighter appeared
to starboard. An instant later, a second volley sizzled down from
overhead. R2-D2 loosed a series of urgent whistles and tweets as the
starfighter was rocked to its shields.
Blue lightning coruscated across the console, and droid fighters
appeared to port and starboard. More bolts found their mark,
throwing Anakin hard against the safety harness.
“Just what I needed,” he said, in appreciation.
Swerving hard to starboard, he caught the first ship with a sideslip
shot. The second fighter sheared off as quickly as it could from the
expanding fragmentation cloud. As it did, Anakin raced into its aft
wash and triggered the lasers.
A ball of fire, the droid careened into a flak-dazzled tri-fighter and
the two of them exploded.
Anakin checked the display to make certain that Obi-Wan was still
with him.
“Are you all right?”
“A bit toasted, but okay.”
“Stay with me.”
“Do I have a choice?”
“Always, Master.”
Deeper into the melee now, ARC-170s, V-wings, and droid fighters
were joined in a great cloverleaf of combat, chasing one another,
colliding into one another, twirling out of the fight with engines
smoking or wings blown away. Weapons themselves, the droids were
accurate with their bolts, but slower to recover, and easily confused
by random maneuvers. While at times this made for effortless kills,
there were just so many of them …
Anakin squared off with the enemy leader of the cloverleaf clash,
and began to harass it with laser bolts. Adapting to his tactics, ObiWan fell back; then leapt his starfighter into kill position and opened
up.
“Nice shot!” Anakin said when the wing leader vanished.
“Nice setup!”
Signaling Obi-Wan to follow, Anakin climbed out of the main
battle, veering tangent to it, and rocketed toward the nearest of the
Separatists’ needle-nosed picket ships. Loosing two missiles to draw
the picket’s attention, he yawed to port, pushed over, then came back
at the vessel with lasers.
“Run the hull! Target the shield generator!”
“Any closer and we’ll be inside the thing!”
“That’s the idea!”
Obi-Wan followed, unleashing with all cannons.
They were in the thick of the heaviest fighting now, where ranged
fire from the Republic capital ships was breaking against the particle
and ray shields of their targets. Blinding light pulsed behind the
canopy blast tinting. The picket Anakin had piqued with missiles was
under heavy bombardment. He grasped that a high-yield torpedo
would be too much for it, and rushed to deliver it.
The torpedo tore from between the starfighter’s cockpit-linked
fuselages and burned its way toward the picket.
The picket’s shield failed for an instant, and in that instant the
huge incoming turbolaser bolts did their worst. Struck broadside, the
picket burst like an overripe fruit, venting long plumes of
incandescence and spilling light and guts into space.
Anakin jinked away, whooping into the comlink.
“We’ve got a clear shot at Grievous!” he told Obi-Wan.
With its tapered bow and large outrigger fins, the general’s cruiser
resembled a classic-era Coruscant skyscraper laid on its side.
“This hardly seems the time to bait him, Anakin. Have you had a
look at those point-defense arrays?”
“When are you going to learn to trust me?”
“I do trust you! I just can’t keep up with you!”
“Fine. Then I’ll be right back.”
Anakin pushed the starfighter to its limits, paying out laser bolts
and missiles that exploded harmlessly against the great ship’s
deflector shield. He peeled away from the fiery wash, only to fall back
at the ship in predatory banks, breaking ultimately for its 200-metertall conning tower.
The cruiser’s in-close batteries came alive, chundering, gushing
enormous gouts of spun plasma at the pest that was attempting to
besiege it. Snap-rolling, Anakin slid the starfighter hard to port,
belly-up, and continued to fire.
Again he tried to harry the invulnerable bridge with bursts of his
lasers. And again the batteries of the colossal vessel tried but failed to
get him in target lock.
Anakin pictured Grievous standing stalwart behind the
transparisteel viewports.
“A taste of what’s coming when we meet in the flesh,” he growled.
Grievous’s reptilian eyes tracked the audacious maneuvers of the
yellow-and-gray starfighter that was attempting to strafe the bridge.
Firing with precision, anticipating the responses of the forward
batteries, taking chances even a clone wouldn’t take … the pilot could
only be a Jedi.
But a Jedi unafraid to call on his rage.
Grievous could see that in the pilot’s dauntless determination, his
abandon. He could sense it, even through the Invisible Hand’s
shimmering shields and the viewport’s transparisteel. Oh, to have
the lightsaber of that one dangling from his belt, he thought.
Anakin Skywalker.
Certainly it was him. And in the starfighter that was guarding
Anakin’s stern: Obi-Wan Kenobi.
Thorns in the Separatists’ side.
Elsewhere in the battle arena Republic forces were demonstrating
similar enthusiasm, atomizing droid fighters and punishing the
capital ships with long-range cannon fire. Grievous was confident
that, if pressed, he could turn the tide of battle, but that was not his
present mandate. His Sith Masters had ordered him to safeguard the
lives of the Council members—though, in fact, the Confederacy
needed none other than Lords Sidious and Tyranus.
He turned to watch the simulation playing above the tactical
console, then swung back to the viewports, recalling the ARC-170
pilots who had hounded Gunray’s shuttle only days earlier. He waved
for one of the droids.
“Alert our vessel commanders to stand by to receive revised battle
orders.”
“Yes, General,” the droid acknowledged in monotone.
“Raise the ship. Prepare to fire all guns on my command.”
There is no death; there is only the Force.
Obi-Wan wondered if he had ever witnessed a more lucid
demonstration of the Jedi axiom than Anakin’s Force-centered,
death-defying harassment of Grievous’s ship. His speck of a
starfighter all but nose-to-nose with the mammoth cruiser, leaving
Obi-Wan to deal with the vengeful droid fighters Anakin was either
ignorant of or deliberately disregarding.
“He really is going to be the death of me,” Obi-Wan mumbled.
But he was indifferent to his own fate, wondering instead: What if
Anakin should be killed?
Could he even be killed?
As the Chosen One, was he destined to fulfill both the title and the
prophecy? Was he immune to real harm, or—as someone born to
restore balance to the Force—did he require defenders to guide him
to that destiny? Was it Obi-Wan’s duty—more, the duty of all the
Jedi—to see to it that he survived at all costs?
Was that what Qui-Gon had intuited so many years earlier on
Tatooine, and had motivated him to attack with such resolve the Sith
who had revealed himself in that parched landscape?
Though the cruiser’s shield was removing the sting of Anakin’s
laser bolts, he could not be deterred from persevering. Even ObiWan’s repeated attempts to hail him through the battle net had had
no effect. But now the huge ship was beginning to climb and reorient
itself.
Obi-Wan thought for a moment that Grievous was actually going
to bring all forward guns to bear on Anakin. Instead, the cruiser
continued to rise until it was well above the plane of the ecliptic, with
its bow angled slightly Coreward.
Then it fired.
Not at the Republic battle group, nor at Belderone itself, but at the
convoy of evacuees and its escort starfighters.
Obi-Wan felt a great disturbance in the Force, as ship after ship
disintegrated or erupted in flames. Thousands of voices cried out,
and the battle and command nets grew shrill with shouts of dismay
and outrage.
The follow-up volley Obi-Wan waited for never arrived.
Tri-fighters and Vulture droids were suddenly slinking back to the
ships from which they had been disgorged. At the same time, the
entire Separatist fleet was turning tail. Of course Grievous realized
that his barbaric act had caught the Republic forces by surprise, but
he had nothing more in mind than escape into hyperspace. The
general had obviously made up his mind that Belderone simply
wasn’t worth the risk—not with so many defenseless Outer Rim
worlds still up for grabs.
“Anakin, the evacuees need our help!” Obi-Wan said.
“I’m coming, Master.”
Obi-Wan watched Anakin’s starfighter break off its futile pursuit of
the cruiser. Farther out, Separatist ships were disappearing from
sight as they made the jump to lightspeed.
“Vessels of the main fleet are safely away,” a droid reported to
Grievous as soon as the cruiser entered hyperspace. “Expected
arrival at the alternate rally point: ten standard hours.”
“Losses at Belderone?” Grievous said.
“Acceptable.”
Beyond the forward viewports, the smoky vortices of outraced
light.
Grievous ran the fingers of his clawlike hand down the bulkhead.
“Instruct my elite to meet me in the shuttle launching bay on
emergence from hyperspace,” he said to no droid in particular.
“When all ships have arrived at the rally point, advise Viceroy
Gunray that I will be paying him a visit.”
Trained well by Dooku, General Grievous was,” Yoda said. He and
Mace Windu were in Yoda’s chambers in the Jedi Temple, each atop
a meditation dais. “Entrapped, they strike at the weakest. Force us,
they do, to choose between saving lives and continuing the fight.”
Yoda recalled his duel with Dooku in the solar sailer’s docking bay
on Geonosis. Dooku bested, left with no alternative but to distract
and flee …
“Representatives from Belderone have expressed their gratitude to
the Senate,” Mace said. “Despite the losses.”
Yoda shook his head sadly. “More than ten thousand killed.
Twenty-seven Jedi.”
The muscles in Mace’s jaw bunched. “Billions have died in this
war. Belderone was saved, and, more important, we were able to
keep Grievous on the run.”
“Know where he jumped to, we do.”
“We’ll chase him to the ends of known space, if we have to.”
Yoda fell silent for a moment, then said: “Speak with the Supreme
Chancellor, we must.”
“Without apology,” Mace said bluntly. “Our deference to him has
to end.”
“With the war’s end, it will.” Yoda turned slightly to regard Mace.
“A terrible warning, Belderone is. Increasing, the power of the dark
side is. Rooted out, Sidious must be.”
Mace nodded gravely. “Rooted out and eliminated.”
General Grievous has left the docking bay,” a Trade Federation
lieutenant relayed to Gunray in his lavish quarters in the core ship’s
port-side command tower.
“Which docking bay?” Gunray said toward the comlink’s audio
pickup. “Below, or in the tower?”
“The general’s shuttle availed itself of the tower docking ring,
Viceroy.”
Gunray swung around to face Rune Haako. “That means he will be
here any moment!”
He turned to a large circular screen that displayed a real-time view
of the antechamber outside his suite. The Neimoidian guards
stationed there had also been alerted to Grievous’s arrival. Armed
with blaster rifles taller than they were, the four wore bulky torso
and lower-leg armor, and pot-shaped helmets that left their red eyes
and green faces exposed.
“It has to be the mechno-chair,” Gunray said, striding back and
forth in front of the screen.
“What did you tell him?” Haako asked.
Gunray came to a halt. “Immediately on being apprised by Shu
Mai of the Belderone rendezvous, I contacted Grievous, expressing
anger that he hadn’t informed me personally. I accused him of
purposely leaving me out of the command loop.”
Haako was horrified. “You said that to him?”
Gunray nodded. “He maintained that he had attempted to
communicate through the mechno-chair hyperwave transceiver. I
said that I had received no such transmission.”
“They’re coming!” Haako said, aiming a quivering finger at the
display screen.
Gunray saw that Grievous was accompanied by four of his elite
MagnaGuards. Fearsome bipedal battle droids built to exacting
specifications, they stood as tall as the general and were armed with
combat staffs tipped with electromagnetic pulse generators.
Armorweave capes fell diagonally across their broad-shouldered
bodies, swathing the crowns of their heads and lower faces.
Benefiting from Grievous’s own programming, as well as from the
instruction Grievous had received from Dooku, the elite were trained
in the Jedi arts, and more than a match for most.
The four Neimoidians stood their ground, bringing their rifles
across their chests in a gesture of warning.
Grievous’s elite didn’t even slow down. Mirroring the Neimoidians,
they raised their double-tipped electroshock batons, then swung
them forward with such speed and precision that Gunray’s sentinels
were literally swept off their feet, as if they were children.
Grievous glared into the lens of the holocam mounted outside the
hatch.
“Admit us, Viceroy. Or shall I instruct my elite to lay waste to
everything that stands between me and you?”
Haako spun on his heel and hurried for the suite’s rear hatch.
“Where are you going?” Gunray said. “Running will only make us
appear guilty!”
“We are guilty!” Haako threw over his shoulder.
“He doesn’t know that.”
“Viceroy!” Grievous rasped.
Haako stood in the open hatch. “He will.” And disappeared
through it.
Gunray paced for a moment, wringing his hands, then,
straightening robes and miter and pulling his shoulders back, he
pressed a fat finger to the hatch release.
The general swept into the suite, the four MagnaGuards in his
angry wake spreading out to both sides, ready for violence.
“What is the meaning of this intrusion?” Gunray said from the
center of the main room. “Your Masters will not tolerate such ill
treatment of me!”
Grievous glowered at him. “They will when they learn what you’ve
done.”
Gunray touched himself in the chest. “What are you talking about,
you … abomination. When Lord Sidious hears that you promised us
a world you could not deliver—”
Stepping forward, a MagnaGuard thrust his staff to within a
millimeter of Gunray’s face.
“Lord Sidious’s alloy puppet,” Gunray said, his voice quavering. “If
not for the Trade Federation, you would have no army to command.”
Grievous raised his right claw and pointed to Gunray. “The
mechno-chair. I want to see it.”
Gunray gulped. “In a fit of anger, I had it destroyed and purged
from the ship.”
“You’re lying. There was no problem with my transmission to you.
The chair relayed my message.”
“What are you suggesting?”
“The chair is no longer in your possession. It has somehow fallen
into enemy hands, and, through it, the Republic was able to learn of
my plan to attack Belderone.”
“You’re brain-dead.”
Grabbing Gunray by the neck, Grievous lifted him a meter off the
floor.
“Before I leave here, you will tell me everything I wish to know.”
Poor Gunray, Dooku thought. Pitiful creature …
But for having left the mechno-chair behind on Cato Neimoidia, he
deserved all the fear Grievous had put into him.
Secluded in his castle on Kaon, Dooku had just spoken with the
general and was pondering how best to handle the situation. While
the incident at Belderone wasn’t conclusive proof that the Republic
had managed to decrypt the Separatist code and intercept Grievous’s
transmission to Gunray, it was prudent to assume that this was the
case. Dooku had already ordered the general to refrain from using
the code for the time being. But the matter of the expropriated
hyperwave transceiver was cause for added concern. The very fact
that the Republic had tipped its hand at Belderone, declaring the
success of its eavesdropping, implied that the mechno-chair had
furnished more than intelligence. Clues to secrets that would
astonish even Grievous.
The general was not accustomed to losing in battle. Even when a
general among his own species, he had suffered few defeats. That
was originally what had brought him to the attention of Sidious.
After the Sith Lord had expressed interest in Grievous to Dooku,
Dooku, in turn, had expressed interest in Grievous to Chairman San
Hill, of the InterGalactic Banking Clan.
Poor Grievous, Dooku thought. Pitiful creature …
During the Huk War, and later, while in the employ of the IBC,
Grievous had survived numerous attempts on his life, so an
assassination attempt was ruled out almost immediately. Hill himself
had come up with the idea of a shuttle crash, though that, too,
presented risks.
What if Grievous should actually die in the crash?
Then the Separatists would simply have to look elsewhere for a
commander, Dooku had told Hill. But Grievous had survived—and
only too well. In fact, most of the life-threatening injuries he
sustained had occurred after he had been pulled from the flaming
shuttle wreck, and with great calculation.
When at last he had agreed to be rebuilt, promises were made that
no critical alterations would be made to his mind. But the
Geonosians had ways of modifying the mind without a patient ever
being aware that he had been tampered with. Grievous certainly
believed that he had always been the cold-blooded conqueror he was
now, when in truth his cruelty and prowess owed much to his
rebuilding.
Sidious and Dooku couldn’t have been more pleased with the
result. Dooku, especially, since he had no interest in commanding an
army of droids, and already had his hands full nursemaiding the likes
of Nute Gunray, Shu Mai, and the hive-minded others who
eventually would form the Council of Separatists.
Grievous had been a delight to train, as well. No need to coax him
to release his anger and rage, as Dooku had been forced to do during
the training of his so-called Dark Jedi disciples. The Geonosians had
arranged for Grievous to be nothing but anger and rage. And as to
the general’s combat skills, few, if any, Jedi would be capable of
defeating him. There had been moments during the extensive
combat sessions when even Dooku had been hard-pressed to outduel
the cyborg.
But then, Dooku had kept some secrets to himself.
Just in case.
Manipulation of the sort that had gone into the transformation of
Grievous went to the heart of what it meant to be a Sith—if, indeed,
the words heart and Sith could be used together. The essence of the
dark side lay in a willingness to use any means possible to arrive at a
desired end—which, in the case of Lord Sidious, meant a galaxy
brought under the dominion of a single, brilliant mind.
The current war had been the result of a thousand years of careful
planning by the Sith—generations of bequeathing knowledge of the
dark side from mentor to apprentice. Rarely more than two in each
generation, from Darth Bane forward, Master and apprentice would
devote themselves to harnessing the strength that flowed from the
dark side, and to making the most of every opportunity to allow
darkness to wax. Facilitating war, murder, corruption, injustice, and
avarice when- and wherever possible.
Analogous to introducing a covert malignancy to the body politic
of the Republic, then monitoring its spread from one organ to
another until the mass reached such size that it began to disrupt vital
systems …
The Sith had learned from their own internecine struggles that
systems were often brought down from within when power became
their reason for being. The greater the threat to that power, the
tighter the threatened would cling.
That had been the case with the Jedi Order.
For two hundred years before the coming of Darth Sidious the
power of the dark side had been gaining strength, and yet the Jedi
had made only minimal efforts to thwart it. The Sith were pleased by
the fact that the Jedi, too, had been allowed to grow so powerful,
because, in the end, their sense of entitlement would blind them to
what was occurring in their midst.
So, let them be placed on a pedestal. Let them grow soft and set in
their ways. Let them forget that good and evil coexist. Let them look
no farther than their vaunted Temple, so that they would fail to see
the proverbial forest for the trees. And, by all means, let them grow
possessive of the power they had gained, so that they might be that
much easier to topple.
Not that all of them were blind, of course. Many Jedi were aware
of the changes, the drift toward darkness. None, perhaps, more than
aged Yoda. But the Masters who made up the Jedi Council were
enslaved to the inevitability of that drift. Instead of attempting to get
to the root of the coming darkness, they merely did their best to
contain it. They waited for the Chosen One to be born, mistakenly
believing that only he or she would be capable of restoring balance.
Such was the danger of prophecy.
It was into such times that Dooku had been born, placed because
of a strong connection to the Force among an Order that had grown
complacent, self-involved, arrogant about the power they wielded in
the name of the Republic. Turning a blind eye to injustices the
Republic had little interest in eradicating, because of profitable deals
forged among those who held the reins of command.
While midi-chlorians determined to some degree a Jedi’s ability to
use the Force, other inherited characteristics also played a part—
notwithstanding the Temple’s best efforts to eradicate them. Having
hailed from nobility and great wealth, Dooku yearned for prestige.
Even as a youngster, he had been obsessed with learning all he could
about the Sith and the dark side of the Force. He had toed the Jedi
line; become the Temple’s most agile swordmaster and instructor.
And yet the makings of his eventual transformation had been there
from the start. Without the Jedi ever realizing it, Dooku had been as
disruptive to the Order as would be a young boy raised in slavery on
Tatooine.
His discontent had continued to grow and fester; his frustration
with the Republic Senate, with ineffectual Supreme Chancellor
Valorum, with the shortsightedness of the Jedi Council members
themselves. A Trade Federation blockade of Naboo, rumors of a
Chosen One found on a desert world, the death of Qui-Gon Jinn at
the hands of a Sith … How could the Council members not see what
was happening? How could they continue to claim that the dark side
obscured all?
Dooku had said as much to anyone who would listen. He wore his
discontent on the sleeve of his robes. Though they hadn’t enjoyed the
smoothest of student–teacher relationships, he and Yoda had spoken
openly of the portents. But Yoda was living proof of a conservatism
that came with extended life. Dooku’s true confidant had been
Master Sifo-Dyas, who, while also disturbed by what was occurring,
was too weak to take action.
The Battle of Naboo had revealed that the Sith were back in the
open, and that a Sith Lord was at work somewhere.
The Sith Lord: the one born with the power needed to take the
final step.
Dooku had given thought to seeking him out, perhaps killing him.
But even what little faith he placed in the prophecy was enough to
raise doubt that the death of a Sith could halt the advance of the dark
side.
Another would come, and another.
As it happened, there had been no need to hunt for Sidious, for it
was Sidious who had approached him. Sidious’s boldness surprised
him at first, but it hadn’t taken long for Dooku to become fascinated
by the Sith. Instead of a lightsaber duel to the death, there had been
much discussion, and a gradual understanding that their separate
visions for how the galaxy might be rescued from depravity were not
so different after all.
But partnership with a Sith didn’t make one a Sith.
As the Jedi arts had to be taught, so, too, did the power of the dark
side. And so began his long apprenticeship. The Jedi warned that
anger was the quickest path to the dark side, but anger was nothing
more than raw emotion. To know the dark side one had to be willing
to rise above all morality, to throw love and compassion aside, and to
do whatever was necessary to bring about the vision of a world
brought under control—even if that meant taking lives.
Dooku was an eager student, and yet Sidious had continued to
hold him at arm’s length. Perhaps he had been working with other
potential replacements for his earlier apprentice, the savage Darth
Maul, who, in fact, had been nothing more than a minion, like Asajj
Ventress and General Grievous. Sidious had recognized in Dooku the
makings of a true accomplice—an equal from the other camp, already
trained in the Jedi arts, a master duelist, a political visionary. But he
needed to gauge the depth of Dooku’s commitment.
One of your former confidants at the Jedi Temple has perceived
the coming change, Sidious had told him. This one has contacted a
group of cloners, regarding the creation of an army for the
Republic. The order for the army can stand, for we will be able to
make use of that army someday. But Master Sifo-Dyas cannot
stand, for the Jedi cannot learn about the army until we are
prepared to have them learn of it.
And so with the murder of Sifo-Dyas, Dooku had embraced the
dark side fully, and Sidious had conferred on him the title Darth
Tyranus. His final act before leaving the Jedi Order was to erase all
mentions of Kamino from the Jedi archives. Then, as Tyranus, he
had found Fett on Bogg 4; had instructed the Mandalorian to deliver
himself to Kamino; and had arranged for payments to be made to the
cloners through circuitous routes …
Ten years passed.
Under its new Supreme Chancellor, the Republic recovered
somewhat, then grew more corrupt and beset with problems than
before. As best they could, Sidious and Tyranus helped things along.
Sidious had the ability to see deep into the future, but there was
always the unexpected. With the power of the dark side, however,
came flexibility.
Having traced Fett to Kamino, Obi-Wan Kenobi had turned up on
Geonosis. All at once, here was Qui-Gon Jinn’s former Padawan,
right under Dooku’s nose. But when he had informed Sidious of ObiWan’s presence, Sidious had only said, Allow events to play out,
Darth Tyranus. For our plans are unfolding exactly as I have
foreseen. The Force is very much with us.
And now, a new wrinkle: as a result of Nute Gunray’s blunder at
Cato Neimoidia, the Republic and the Jedi had chanced on a possible
way to trace the whereabouts of Sidious and expose him.
The mechno-chair’s exceptional transceiver—and others like it—
had been created for Sidious by a host of beings, a few of whom were
still alive. And if agents of the Republic—or the Jedi, for that matter
—were clever and persistent enough, they could succeed in learning
more about Sidious than he would want anyone to learn …
He had to be informed, Dooku thought.
Or did he?
For a heartbeat he hesitated, imagining the power that could be
his.
Then he went directly to the hyperwave transmitter Sidious had
given him, and began his transmission.
Mace Windu couldn’t recall a visit to the Supreme Chancellor’s
chambers in the Senate Office Building when his attention hadn’t
been drawn to Palpatine’s curious and somehow unsettling collection
of quasi-religious statuary. On one occasion, picking up on Mace’s
interest, Palpatine had offered lengthy and enthusiastic accounts of
when and how he had come by some of the pieces. Acquired at an
auction on Commenor; procured after many years and at great
expense from a Corellian dealer in antiquities; salvaged from an
ancient temple discovered on a moon of the gas giant Yavin; a gift
from the Theed Council of Naboo; another gift from that world’s
Gungans …
Just now Mace’s eyes were on a small bronzium statue Palpatine
had once identified as Wapoe, the mythical Sistros demigod of
disguise.
“I’m relieved that you contacted me, Master Jedi,” the Supreme
Chancellor was saying from the far side of his expansive desk. “As I
was about to contact you on a matter of some gravity.”
“Then speak of your matter first, we will,” Yoda said.
He was seated for a change, atop a cushioned chair that made him
appear even smaller than he was. Mace was at Yoda’s left hand,
sitting with legs widely spread, forearms resting on his knees.
Palpatine touched his steepled fingers to his lower lip, then
inhaled and sat back in his throne of a chair. “This is rather
awkward, Master Yoda, but I suspect that the matter I have in mind
is the very one that brought you and Master Windu here. By that I
mean Belderone.”
Yoda compressed his lips. “Fail you, your intuition doesn’t. About
Belderone, much to say, we have.”
Palpatine smiled without showing his teeth. “Well, then, suppose I
begin by saying that I was most pleased to learn of our recent victory
there. I only wish I had been informed of your plans before the fact.”
“We had no time to corroborate the intelligence we received,”
Mace said without hesitation. “We thought it best to commit as few
Republic ships as could be spared. It was essentially a Jedi
operation.”
“A Jedi operation,” Palpatine said slowly. “And by all accounts you,
that is, the Jedi, were successful in routing General Grievous’s
forces.”
“A rout it was not,” Yoda said. “To hyperspace Grievous fled. But
protecting the Separatist leaders, he was.”
“I see. And now?”
Mace leaned forward. “Wait for him to resurface, and strike again.”
Palpatine regarded him. “Might I be informed of your intelligence
next time? Didn’t you and I have this discussion after Master Yoda
was thought to have been killed at Ithor?” Before Mace could
respond, he continued: “You see, the problem here is one of
appearances. While I can appreciate the need to keep secret some
intelligence, many in the Senate do not. In the instance of Belderone
—and largely because it constituted a Republic victory—I was able to
allay the fear of certain Senators that the Jedi are taking the war into
their own hands, and are no longer accountable for their actions.”
Mace’s nostrils flared. “We can’t allow the Senate to go on
dictating the course of the war.”
Yoda nodded, sagely. “Miring the Jedi in uncertainty, some of the
Senate’s decisions are.” He looked askance at Palpatine. “A matter of
appearances, this is.”
Mace made it emphatic. “We’re not rogues.”
Palpatine spread his hands in a gesture of appeasement. “Of
course you’re not. Nothing could be further from the truth. But, as I
say … Well, if nothing else, the Senate at least needs to believe that it
is being kept informed—particularly in light of the extraordinary
powers it has granted this office.” He sat straighter in the chair. “Not
a day passes that I am not subjected to suspicion, accusations,
suggestions of ulterior motive. And, I will tell you, the suspicions do
not end here, in this office. They extend to the role of the Jedi in the
war. Master Jedi, we cannot, under any circumstances, be perceived
as being in collusion.”
Yoda frowned. “In collusion we must be, if victory the goal
remains.”
Palpatine smiled tolerantly. “Master Yoda, far be it from me to
lecture someone of your vast experience on the nature of politics. But
the truth of the matter is that with the war now exiled to the Outer
Rim, we must be judicious about the campaigns we undertake, and
about the targets to which we assign our forces. If a lasting peace is
ever to be achieved when this madness concludes, each and every act
from this point forward must be handled with utmost delicacy.” He
shook his head. “Many worlds, loyal to the Republic, circumstance
forced us to sacrifice. Others that joined the Separatists may wish to
return to the Republic. These aren’t matters with which I wish to
burden the Jedi. But they are the province of this office, and I need to
place them first and foremost.”
“The lessons learned from a thousand years of serving the
Republic aren’t entirely lost on us,” Mace said strongly. “The Jedi
Council is fully aware of such concerns.”
Palpatine took the rebuke in stride. “Excellent. Then we can move
on to other matters.”
Mace and Yoda waited.
“May I inquire as to how the Jedi learned of Grievous’s plan to
attack Belderone?”
“A hyperwave transceiver that belonged to Viceroy Gunray was
seized at Cato Neimoidia,” Mace explained. “The device allowed
Intelligence to decipher the Separatist code. A message transmitted
by General Grievous to Viceroy Gunray regarding Belderone was
monitored, and we acted on it.”
Palpatine was staring at him in disbelief. “We have the ability to
listen in on Separatist transmissions?”
“Unlikely,” Yoda said. “After Belderone.”
Palpatine considered it, then frowned. “For Belderone you
forfeited the ability to continue monitoring the Separatists.” He took
a breath, and the frown ebbed. “Had I been included in this matter, I
would have made the same choice. But I must add, Master Jedi, that
I am greatly displeased about having been circumvented. Why wasn’t
I told? Am I to infer from this that you no longer trust me?”
“No,” Yoda almost barked. “But into this office, come and go many.
Our own counsel we kept.”
Palpatine’s face took on sudden color. “And yet you continue to
place full trust in those around you? Do you realize how some might
respond to that, when many of your Order have deliberately
absented themselves from the war, and some have even gone over to
the Separatist side?”
“A decade old, such reproaches are, Supreme Chancellor.”
“I fear you delude yourself in this instance, Master Yoda, if you
believe that the passage of time makes those ‘reproaches’ any less
valid to your critics.”
This is getting out of control, Mace thought. He calmed himself
before speaking.
“There’s a more important reason for your not being informed
about the transceiver.”
Now Palpatine waited.
“It contained a stored message—a message transmitted to Viceroy
Gunray from Darth Sidious.”
Palpatine’s broad forehead wrinkled in uncertainty. “Sidious. I
know the name …”
“Dooku’s Sith Master, Sidious is. Learned of him on Geonosis,
Master Kenobi did. But eluded us, proof of him has.”
“Now I recall,” Palpatine said. “Obi-Wan was told that this Sidious
had somehow infiltrated the Senate.”
“Dismissed that, we have. But lying about Sidious, Dooku wasn’t.”
Palpatine swiveled his chair toward the room’s immense curved
window, the panorama of Coruscant. “Another Sith.” Turning back to
Yoda, he said: “Forgive me, but why is this of such great concern?”
“Carefully balanced this war has been. Republic victories,
Separatist victories … In prolonging it, a part the Sith may play.”
Again, Palpatine paused to consider Yoda’s words. “I think I begin
to understand the reasons for your secrecy. The Jedi are attempting
to expose Sidious.”
“In pursuit of clues, we are.”
“Might the capture of Sidious end the war?”
“Hasten the end,” Mace said.
Palpatine nodded in finality. “Then I trust that you will accept my
apologies. Do whatever you must to hunt Sidious down.”
When the Xi Charrian said it was an asteroid mining operation, I
wasn’t picturing an actual asteroid,” Obi-Wan said from the copilot’s
seat of the Republic cruiser.
“It was TeeCee-Sixteen who told us that,” Anakin said. “Maybe
something was lost in translation.”
The protocol droid had been sent to Coruscant for further
debriefing by Republic Intelligence; R2-D2 was on Belderone, where
technicians were seeing to damages he had sustained during the
battle there. Obi-Wan and Anakin had the old white ship to
themselves, and had exchanged their Jedi robes for outfits more
suitable to itinerant spacers.
Named for the asteroid belt in which it was prominent, the Escarte
Commerce Guild facility orbited between massive, multimooned gas
giants in an otherwise uninhabited star system two hyperspace
jumps from Belderone, on the Rimward side of the Perlemian Trade
Route. Oblate when mining operations had commenced twenty years
earlier, Escarte was now a concave hemisphere, heavily cratered by
the forces of nature and the gargantuan labor droids of the
Commerce Guild. Satisfied that every bit of ore had been extracted
from Escarte, the guild had converted the asteroid’s consequent
quarries, tunnels, and shafts into processing centers and field offices.
State-of-the-art tractor beam technology allowed the guild to capture
small asteroids and draw them directly into the facility, rather than
have to use tugs or engage in on-site mining. In many ways Escarte
was the ore-mining equivalent of the Tibanna-gasmining facilities
that floated in the dense atmosphere of Bespin, far across the stars.
Unfriendly space, the belt was defended by Commerce Guild
corvettes and fleet patrol craft modeled on the Geonosian starfighter.
Regardless, Republic Intelligence had managed to insert one of its
agents onto Escarte. Obi-Wan and Anakin hadn’t been told when or
even if they were going to make contact with the agent, but moments
before leaving Belderone they had been informed that Thal K’sar—
the Bith artisan who allegedly had designed the hyperwave
transceiver and holoprojector for Gunray’s mechno-chair—had been
arrested, on charges yet to be learned.
An alert chime sounded from the cruiser’s instrument console.
“Escarte,” Anakin said. “Demanding that we identify ourselves and
state our intent.”
“We’re freelance merchants in search of work,” Obi-Wan reminded
him.
Anakin activated the comm and said as much into the microphone.
“Corellian cruiser,” a husky voice returned, “negative on your
request to dock. Escarte has no job openings. Suggest you try Ansion
or Ord Mantell.”
Obi-Wan’s gaze drifted to the viewport. Off to starboard, a corvette
was coming about.
“Intercept vector,” Anakin said. “Any last-minute instructions,
Master?”
“Yes: stick to the plan. Our best hope for getting close to K’sar is to
get ourselves arrested.”
Anakin grinned. “Shouldn’t be a problem. Hang on.”
Obi-Wan already was, and so was able to remain more or less
upright in the chair as Anakin firewalled the thrusters and threw the
cruiser into a hard turn—not away from the corvette, but aimed
directly toward it.
The console chimed another alert.
“They’re warning us away, Anakin.”
Anakin kept the cruiser on course. “Quick flyby. Our way of saying
we’re not happy about being turned away.”
“No lasers.”
“Promise. We’re just going to buzz them.”
Obi-Wan watched the corvette grow larger in the viewport. The
console continued to chime, in escalating alerts. An instant later, two
turbolaser beams streaked across the cruiser’s bow.
Obi-Wan clenched his hands on the chair armrests. “They’re not
amused.”
“We’ll just have to try harder.”
Dropping the cruiser’s nose, Anakin increased speed. He seemed
bent on maneuvering directly under the corvette, but at the last
moment he pulled back on the control yoke, taking the cruiser
through a spiraling, high-boost climb. A fusillade from the corvette’s
forward batteries narrowly missed clipping the ship’s tail.
“Enough plausibility,” Obi-Wan said. “Level out and signal that
we’re complying.”
“Master, you are not taking our assignment seriously enough. If we
make it too easy for them, they’ll suspect we’re up to something.”
Obi-Wan saw that two patrol craft were rushing in to join the
pursuit. With flashes of scarlet light racing alongside, Anakin
whipped the cruiser through a teeth-rattling bank and shot for the
thick of the asteroid belt.
“The only thing worse than being your wingmate is being your
passenger!”
Anakin had the ship tipped to one side, intent on weaving it
through a cluster of rocks, when a laser bolt struck the closest
asteroid. Rubble from the explosion peppered the cruiser’s shields,
but the console displays confirmed Obi-Wan’s hunch that no damage
had been done.
Anakin took a firm grip on the control yoke and yanked the cruiser
into a turn. The patrol craft clung doggedly, angling to outflank the
larger ship, but Anakin kept cheating the turn tighter and tighter,
forcing the fighters to break off. The cruiser had no sooner realigned
itself then it gave a sudden lurch, snapping Obi-Wan and Anakin
back into their seats, then forward into the console. Anakin reached
over his head to make adjustments, and the cruiser raced forward
once more, only to freeze, then tremble.
Obi-Wan scanned the displays. “Are we hit?”
“No.”
“Asteroid?”
“Not that, either.”
“Don’t tell me you’ve come to your senses and decided to
surrender?”
Anakin showed him a long-suffering look. “Tractor beam.”
“From Escarte? Impossible. We’re much too far away.”
“That’s what I thought.”
Anakin’s hands flew across the instruments, shutting down some
systems and activating others.
“Don’t try to fight it, Anakin. This ship won’t hold together.”
A deep shudder from the bowels of the cruiser reinforced his
words.
Anakin clenched his jaw, then let his hands fall to his sides.
“Look at it this way,” Obi-Wan said, as the cruiser was being drawn
toward the distant facility. “At least you made them work for it.”
Gentle with the cruiser, the tractor beam had deposited it in a
guild-made crater that was now a docking bay. Ordered out of the
ship, Obi-Wan and Anakin stood at the foot of the boarding ramp
with their hands clamped on top of their heads. Uniformed
Neimoidians and Gossams surrounded the cruiser, and a security
team comprising humans, Geonosians, and battle droids was
marching toward them.
“Not exactly the warm welcome we received on Charros Four,”
Obi-Wan said.
Anakin nodded slightly. “Almost makes me nostalgic for the Xi
Charrians.”
“Keep your hands where we can see them!” the human chief of the
security detail shouted as he stepped onto the landing platform.
“Make no sudden moves!”
“Such drama,” Anakin said.
“No mind tricks,” Obi-Wan cautioned.
“Spoilsport.”
The light-complected, blond security officer was as tall as Anakin
and wider in the shoulders. A Commerce Guild badge affixed to the
collar of his gray uniform showed him to be a captain in the Escarte
Guard. He brought the security detail to a halt when everyone was
still three meters from the boarding ramp. At his signal, the
Geonosians spread out to both sides, brandishing wide-muzzled
sonic blasters.
The captain looked Obi-Wan and Anakin up and down, then
circled them once, hands clasped behind his back. Eyeing the ship,
he said, “I haven’t seen one of these in a while. But judging by the
retrofitted cannons, I’d have to guess you’re not ambassadors of
goodwill.”
“Let’s just say we’ve been forced to adapt to the times,” Obi-Wan
said.
The captain scowled at him. “What’s your business in this sector?”
“We were hoping to find freelance work,” Anakin said.
“You were informed otherwise. Why create problems for
yourselves by harassing one of our corvettes?”
“We felt that you’d been impolite—when all we wanted was to
introduce ourselves.”
The captain almost laughed. “Then this has all been a
misunderstanding?”
“Exactly,” Obi-Wan said.
The captain shook his head in amusement. “In that case we’d be
glad to show you around—starting with the detention level!” He
swung to two other humans in the detail. “Stun-cuff these comedians
and search them for concealed weapons.”
“Can’t we simply pay a fine and be on our way?” Obi-Wan asked as
the magnetic cuffs snapped into place around his wrists.
“Tell it to the judiciary.”
Frisks completed, the two humans stepped away. “They’re clean.”
The captain nodded. “That’s one thing in their favor. Search the
ship and impound anything of value. And alert detention that I have
two for containment.” Drawing a blaster from his hip holster, he
motioned Obi-Wan and Anakin toward the turbolifts.
The crater docking bay was accessed by several corridors, some
unchanged since the days they had served as mining tunnels, others
reinforced by plasteel girders and dressed up with ferrocrete panels.
It was apparent also that some of the turbolifts were housed in
former mine shafts.
The captain indicated an unoccupied lift and followed Obi-Wan
and Anakin inside. When two Gossams hurried for the same lift, he
waved them away. As soon as the door closed, he lowered his weapon
and spoke with a sudden urgency.
“We have to make this quick.”
“You’re Travale,” Obi-Wan said, using the code name he had been
furnished.
“Things have gotten more complicated with the Bith. He’s slated
for execution.”
Anakin’s eyebrows met in a V. “What did he do, murder
someone?”
“Some sort of accounting error.”
“Execution seems a rather harsh penalty,” Obi-Wan said.
“Escarte Judiciary claims it wants to make an example of him. But
it’s clear the charges were trumped up.” Travale paused. “Could have
something to do with your being here to see him.”
Travale hadn’t been given the reason, but Obi-Wan nodded in
acknowledgment. “If he’s expecting to die, he may not feel inclined to
talk to us.”
“My thought, too,” Travale said. “But maybe if you could break him
out …”
“You could arrange that?” Anakin said.
“I can try.”
The turbolift car came to a rest and the door slid open.
“Welcome to the detention level,” Travale said, back in character,
and shoving Obi-Wan out into the anteroom beyond. Behind a
semicircle of consoles stood five surly nonhumans—tusked and balddomed Quara Aqualish—wearing Commerce Guild uniforms and
sporting heavy sidearms.
“Show our two guests to cell four-eight-one-six,” Travale told the
sergeant among them.
“Already occupied by the Bith—K’sar.”
“Misery loves company,” Travale said.
Executing a crisp about-face, he returned to the turbolift. Emerged
from the enclosure of display screens, a four-eyed Aqualish led ObiWan and Anakin into a narrow corridor lined with detention cells.
Thirty meters along he stopped to enter a code into a wall-mounted
touch pad, and the bloodstained door to 4816 slid open.
Square and squalid, it contained neither cots nor refresher.
The smell of waste was almost overpowering.
“Word of warning,” the Aqualish said in Basic, “the quality of the
cuisine is surpassed only by the cleanliness of the accommodations.”
“Then we’ll hope to be released before lunch,” Obi-Wan said.
Thal K’sar was slumped in a corner, his long-fingered hands cuffed
in front of him. Slender even for a Bith, he was well dressed and
seemingly unharmed. Obi-Wan recalled that he had been arrested
only the previous day.
K’sar glanced up, but didn’t return Obi-Wan’s nod of greeting.
“Some fix,” Anakin said loudly when the cell sealed. “Good job
back there.”
Obi-Wan played along. “You didn’t help matters any by flooring
that security guard.”
“Ah, she had it coming.”
Anakin ambled over to where K’sar was huddled.
“What landed you in here?” he asked.
Though surprised to hear his own language spoken by a human,
K’sar kept silent. When Anakin made a second attempt, the Bith said
in Basic, “It’s none of your concern. Please leave me alone.”
Anakin shrugged and joined Obi-Wan on the far side of the room.
“Patience,” Obi-Wan said quietly.
Backs pressed to the filthy wall, the two of them sank down onto
their haunches.
Less than a standard hour had passed when they heard voices in
the corridor. The door grated open, revealing Travale and two
Aqualish security officers. Without a word, the aliens standing to
either side of Travale grabbed him by the arms and hurled him
headlong into the cell.
Obi-Wan caught him before he hit the floor.
“Another unexpected development?”
Travale was cuffed, and rattled. “My cover’s blown,” he said
quietly. “Don’t know how, or by whom.”
Anakin glanced at Obi-Wan. “No coincidence.”
“Someone is onto us.” Obi-Wan left it at that.
“Now what?”
“Were you able to arrange anything?” Obi-Wan asked Travale.
He nodded. “Power failure. Brief, but more than enough time for
you to get out of here.”
“Us,” Anakin amended. “You’re coming along.”
“I appreciate that.” He frowned in uncertainty. “Hope I wasn’t
wrong in figuring that you two will be able to open the
door … manually, I mean.”
“We can open the door,” Obi-Wan assured him.
“How long before the power fails?” Anakin asked.
“An hour from now.” Travale glanced at K’sar. “What about him?”
Anakin stood up and crossed the room. “I know you’re not
interested in small talk, but we think we may have a way out of here.
Does that interest you?”
The Bith’s lidless black eyes grew considerably larger. “Yes. Yes!
Thank you.”
“Just be ready.”
“Take the tunnel to the left of the guard station,” Travale was
telling Obi-Wan when Anakin returned. “Keep taking lefts until you
reach a stairway, then follow that to the docking level.”
“You’re going a different way?” Anakin said.
“Someone has to deactivate the tractor beam, or your ship’s not
leaving. Two levels below this one there’s a power coupling station. I
know just enough to disable it temporarily.”
“You’re not going alone,” Obi-Wan said.
Anakin grinned at him. “I believe it’s your turn …”
Obi-Wan didn’t argue. “That means K’sar goes with you. Don’t
allow him out of your sight, Anakin.”
Travale nodded toward the cell block corridor. “We’ll still have the
guards to deal with.”
“Don’t worry about them,” Anakin said.
Spreading his hands, he snapped the cuffs from his wrists. ObiWan did the same, then snapped Travale’s open.
Travale smiled broadly. “I love a good plan.”
Anakin and Obi-Wan were standing by the door when the cell’s
grime-encrusted illuminator faltered and died. Obi-Wan shoved his
hands sideways through the air, and the door retracted.
Travale shook his head in wonderment. “It never ceases to amaze
me.”
Anakin swung to K’sar. “Now! Hurry!”
The four of them moved into the unlit hall.
“Emergency power should come on shortly,” Travale said.
Ahead of them they could hear the five guards toggling switches on
the console and speaking in excited voices. Anakin wasn’t halfway to
the anteroom when one of the guards appeared at the end of the
narrow corridor. The Aqualish’s huge eyes allowed him to see in the
dark, but not as well as the Bith, nor as well as the Jedi. Before the
guard could realize what was happening, his raised blaster was
soaring down the corridor into Anakin’s hand. A Force push from
Obi-Wan sent the Aqualish flailing back into the anteroom and
slamming into the turbolift wall.
The rest of the guards hurried out from behind the darkened
console to counterattack. By then Obi-Wan and Anakin were on
them, dropping them with punches, side kicks, Force pushes. Bodies
sailed across the anteroom, tumbled over one another, smashed into
display screens. One Aqualish managed to get off a shot, but the
blaster bolt missed anyone during its mad carom around the room.
The fracas was over almost before it began.
In the red glow of emergency lights, K’sar cast a dumbfounded
look around.
“You’re Jedi!”
“Two out of three,” Travale said.
“But … what are you doing here—on Escarte?”
Anakin pressed his forefinger to his lips with elaborate
seriousness. “Republic business.” Then into K’sar’s hands he pressed
the blaster he had summoned from the guard.
K’sar stared at the weapon. “But—”
“I won’t need it.”
“Here’s where we part company,” Travale said to Anakin.
“Remember: stay left until you reach the stairway.”
“Where are you sending him?” K’sar asked.
“Docking Bay Thirty-Six.”
The Bith nodded. “I know the way.”
Travale chuckled. “This just keeps getting better and better.” He
swung back to Anakin. “K’sar will also know the way to Docking Bay
Forty. That’s where we’ll be waiting for you. Escarte Control won’t be
able to bring the tractor beam back online immediately, and judging
by the way you fly, you shouldn’t have much trouble dodging the
patrol craft. But good luck, anyway.”
“Thanks, but there’s no such thing.”
As Travale and Obi-Wan were running off, Anakin noticed that one
of the turbolift cars was descending.
“Security detail coming to check on the guards,” K’sar said.
Anakin nodded toward the dark corridor they were supposed to
take. “Go!”
K’sar’s long legs propelled him at a fast clip. But instead of going
left as Travale had advised, he turned right at the first intersection.
Anakin grabbed him by the shoulder and spun him around. “This
isn’t the way we were told to go.”
“The captain’s a newcomer to Escarte,” the Bith said, short of
breath. “I’ve been here for fifteen years. I know every route through
this rock.”
Anakin regarded him in silence.
“Trust me, Jedi, I have nothing to gain by lying to you and
remaining here.”
Anakin tapped him into motion. Several minutes of running
brought them to a rickety stairway, which K’sar didn’t hesitate to
climb.
“I’d still like to know what you did to end up in detention,” Anakin
asked from behind K’sar.
“And I wish I could tell you,” he said. “My superior—a Gossam—
said I had made an accounting error that would cost the Commerce
Guild a small fortune.”
“You were always an exec?”
“I started out as a technician—design, installation, the whole
gamut. Gradually, I worked my way up.”
“Up, maybe. But you’re on the wrong side in this war. Your entire
species.”
K’sar stopped to catch his breath. “Clak’dor Seven had little
choice,” he said. “The Separatists were offering unrestricted access to
hyperspace routes, better deals on trade goods, no interference … As
for me, I was already working for the guild. One day it was business
as usual, the next—on the heels of what happened on Geonosis, at
any rate—the guild was suddenly at war with the Republic.” He
raised his gaze. “We go left at the top of the stairs.”
Anakin heard a note of indecision in his voice. “You don’t sound as
sure as you did.”
“I haven’t been in this area for a long while, but I’m certain we can
reach the docking level.”
The rock walls of the corridor into which they raced bore the scars
of the giant drills that had hollowed Escarte. Light and oxygen were
scant, and the uneven floor was slippery. Anakin clamped his right
arm around the Bith’s narrow waist to help him along.
“Wait, wait!” K’sar said suddenly.
“What’s wrong?”
K’sar eyes filled with dread. “I made a mistake! We shouldn’t have
come this way!”
Anakin prevented him from moving. “Too late to turn back.”
“We have to! You don’t understand—”
K’sar words were swallowed by the sound of servomotors and
hydraulics. Around a bend in the gloomy tunnel raced a dwarf spider
droid, its long-barreled blaster cannon already sweeping side to side,
in search of targets.
Someone’s coming,” Obi-Wan warned Travale.
They were standing on a narrow gantry that accessed the control
panel for Escarte’s number three tractor beam coupling station. Six
meters high, the tower rose from a circular platform that projected
from the wall of a deep air shaft. They’d had to wait for full power to
return to the area before seeing to the task of disabling the tractor
beam. Initially, Travale had made a few mistakes, but he had sorted
through his confusion and was almost done.
Obi-Wan peered around the corner of the tower in the direction of
the voices he had heard. Three Geonosian security guards were
approaching the coupling station from a corridor on the far side of
the shaft.
“Never a lightsaber when you need one,” Travale whispered. “Can
you divert them somehow?”
Obi-Wan considered his options, then made a flicking motion with
the fingers of his right hand. An unidentifiable sound issued from
deeper in the corridor the guards had taken. Whirling, the three
Geonosians hurried off to investigate.
Travale shook his head back and forth in appreciation of ObiWan’s skill. “It’s a wonder the war isn’t over yet.”
“Too few of us.”
Travale studied Obi-Wan for a moment. “Is that the reason?”
Obi-Wan touched Travale on the arm, and motioned with his
bearded chin to the tower. “No time to waste.”
The Jedi watched over Travale’s shoulder as he dialed the coupling
power feed to zero.
“These things are the future,” Travale said. “Fill a ship with enough
tractor beam arrays and you could prevent an enemy from jumping
to hyperspace.”
“There aren’t ships large enough.”
“There will be,” Travale said. “To ensure that another war doesn’t
happen.”
Mainstay of the Commerce Guild’s mining operations, the dwarf
spider droid was a hunter-killer. The spider didn’t stand much taller
than a Trade Federation battle droid, but it was agile and equipped
with two powerful blaster cannons. Perched at the juncture of four
splayed legs, the hemispherical body was dominated by two huge
circular photoreceptors, which appeared to be fixed on Anakin and
K’sar as the droid rushed in to make the kill.
Anakin threw K’sar to one side and rolled as the dwarf spider fired.
Two glaring bolts gouged a trench in the hewn floor of the tunnel,
and the report of the cannon resounded deafeningly from the walls.
The head pivoted, photoreceptors finding Anakin, and the weapon
discharged again.
Anakin flipped himself away. Calling on the Force, he swirled his
hands in front of him to prevent the intense heat from engulfing him.
Rolling once more, he tried to get underneath the droid’s striding
legs, but the spider anticipated him, skittered backward, and loosed
another burst.
Anakin leapt.
Propelled by the Force, as well as the force of the explosion, he
struck the arched ceiling and fell hard to the floor. Blacking out for a
moment, he awoke to find the droid charging toward him,
reorienting the smaller of its cannons to place him in the crosshairs.
Catapulting to his feet, he flew forward, intent on ripping the power
cells from beneath the droid’s dome. No less determined, the droid
countered by retreating and rearing up. Falling short of the mark,
Anakin curled his body, counting on momentum to carry him
forward.
The spider continued to retreat, then dropped back on all fours,
traversing its cannon.
Feigning a sidestep, Anakin hurled himself completely under the
droid, but still couldn’t find cover. He heard the sound of the spider’s
dome rotating, then the sound of the muzzle of the long cannon
hitting the scabrous wall. Realizing that it had entered a section of
the tunnel too narrow to allow for a half turn, the droid stamped its
legs in frustration, then began to back itself into the wider stretch.
Without a clear plan in mind, Anakin chased it, heard the dome
begin to pivot once more, then the sound of a hand blaster set on full
automatic.
Ten meters down the corridor, K’sar was on his feet, the heavy
weapon held in front of him in a two-handed grip, firing directly into
the spider’s bulging red photoreceptors and power cells. Confused,
the droid tried desperately to spin around, but there wasn’t room.
Loose rock calved from the walls as the barrel of the cannon struck
again and again. All the while, the Bith continued to advance,
emptying the blaster’s power cell. An electronic shriek tore from
somewhere inside the spider, and sparks began to geyser from its
perforated dome. The four legs danced in anger for a moment longer,
then stopped, and the tunnel began to fill with smoke. Finally the
droid collapsed, the tip of its cannon slamming into the floor at
K’sar’s feet.
Anakin eased around the smoking machine and gently removed
the blaster from the Bith’s shaking grip. The droid’s dome pinged as
it cooled; a steady susurration escaped the blaster’s gas chamber.
“How much farther?” Anakin asked after a moment.
“We’re close,” K’sar said in a daze. “Half a kilometer or so past the
bend.”
“Can you make it?”
K’sar nodded, and they hurried through the final stretch, emerging
from a tunnel opening at the rear of the docking bay. A hundred
meters away the cruiser was sitting just where the tractor beam had
left it. Few guards were about, and most of them were battle droids.
Anakin took a moment to study the disposition of the droids, then
turned to K’sar, who seemed to have recovered from the ordeal in the
tunnel.
“No matter what I do, I want you to head straight for the boarding
ramp. Don’t stop running until you’re inside the ship, understand?”
K’sar nodded.
Anakin leapt out of the corridor, deliberately calling attention to
himself to distract the droids from firing at K’sar. Evading blaster
bolts with perfectly timed jumps and rolls, he got close enough to the
droids to wave some of them into others, toppling them as if they had
been picked up by a strong wind. From one, he called a blaster rifle
into his own hands, and mowed down those that were still on their
feet.
Following K’sar up the boarding ramp, he rushed into the cockpit
and began to power up the cruiser’s defensive systems. Bolts from
the droids’ blasters ricocheted from the fuselage and transparisteel
panels. Traversing the cruiser’s fore and aft cannons, Anakin fired,
burying the droids under huge chunks of ferrocrete blown from the
walls and ceiling.
When the flight systems were online he left the cockpit to search
for K’sar, who was sitting on the floor of the main hold, panting.
“Why aren’t you raising the ship?” the Bith said. “Guild corvettes
are probably already on the way.”
Anakin stepped closer to him, his expression darkening visibly.
“You and I need to talk first. And either you answer my questions, or
I jettison you here, and let the Gossams do what they will with you.”
The Bith’s eyes expanded. “Talk? About what?”
“A hyperwave transceiver you designed fourteen years ago.”
“Fourteen years ago? I can barely remember last week.”
Anakin glared at him from beneath an angrily furrowed brow.
“Think harder.”
“Why are you doing this to me? I just saved your life!”
“Remind me to thank you later. Right now you’re going to tell me
about the transceiver. It would have been a special order. More than
the usual secrecy. You would have been well paid. You installed it in
a mechno-chair.”
K’sar started. His wrinkled mouth puckered and he stared at
Anakin in terror. “Now it all comes together—my arrest and
imprisonment, the death sentence! The transceiver … that’s what
brought you here.”
“Who placed the order?”
“I suspect you already know the answer.”
“How did he contact you?”
“Through my personal comlink. He needed someone of great skill.
Someone willing to follow his every instruction without question.
The designs he sent were like nothing I had ever seen. The end result
was almost … artistic.”
“Why did he allow you to live—afterward?”
“I was never sure. I knew I’d been useful. I thought he might
require additional devices, but I never heard from him again.”
“If you’re right about your arrest, that means he has been keeping
an eye on you. Tell me the rest and we might be able to keep you
from his long reach.”
“That’s everything!”
“You’re holding something back,” Anakin said in a flat, menacing
tone. “I can feel it.”
K’sar gulped, and clutched at his neck. “I built two of them!”
“Who received the second one? One of the Separatist leaders?”
Swallowing with difficulty, K’sar said: “It went to Sienar!”
Anakin blinked in surprise. “Raith Sienar?”
“To Sienar Advanced Projects. It was designed for some sort of
experimental spacecraft they were building.”
“Who was the craft meant for?”
“I don’t know—I swear, Jedi, I don’t.” K’sar paused, then added:
“But I knew the pilot Sienar hired to deliver the ship.”
“Knew?”
“I don’t know if she’s still alive. But I know where you could begin
to look.”
Obi-Wan and Travale negotiated the cofferdam that linked
Escarte’s air lock to a docking ring just forward of the cruiser’s tribarreled thruster fantail.
Stepping into the main hold, Travale gave a shout of joy.
“Good to be alive!”
Obi-Wan glanced at Thal K’sar, thinking the Bith might feel the
same. Instead, K’sar was curled up on the hold’s worn acceleration
couch. Obi-Wan hurried on to the cockpit and strapped into the
copilot’s seat.
“Any problems reaching the ship?”
“The usual close calls,” Anakin said evasively. “Obviously you were
successful at disabling the tractor beam.”
“Not a skill I expect to draw on again, but, yes, thanks to Travale.”
Anakin glanced at the console, waiting for the cofferdam telltale to
go off, then called on the thrusters to move the cruiser away from
Escarte. Off to port, Obi-Wan saw two Guild corvettes dead in space.
“And here I was certain we weren’t out of this yet.”
Anakin shrugged. “Anticlimactic.”
Obi-Wan regarded him for a moment. “K’sar seemed
rather … subdued. Were you able to question him?”
Anakin busied himself with the controls. “Briefly.”
“And?”
“We have a new lead.” Before Obi-Wan could reply, Anakin said:
“Hyperspace coordinates coming in.”
Banking widely, the cruiser left Escarte and sluggish light behind.
Coruscant had places one couldn’t persuade a droid air taxi driver
to take one, even with the promise of a free year of lubrication baths
at Industrial Automaton.
The labyrinth of dark back streets south of Corusca Circus.
Daring Way, where it crossed Vos Gesal in upper Uscru.
Hazad’s Skytunnel in the Manarai Uplift.
And just about anywhere in the sector known colloquially as “The
Works.”
Foot mat to the Senate District, with its New Architecture spires
and domes, its blade-thin obelisks that resembled oft-used candles
dipped in gleaming alloy, The Works had been a booming
manufacturing area until escalating costs had driven the production
of spacecraft parts, labor droids, and construction materials
offworld.
Kilometer after cheerless kilometer of flat-roofed factories and
assembly plants; towering cranes and enormous gantries; endless
stretches of pitted mag-lev tracks that might have been overgrown
with weeds if weeds grew on Coruscant; skyscraping clusters of
vacant corporate buildings with rocket-fin buttresses … For standard
centuries, the sector had been the destination for billions of
hardworking immigrants from the Inner Rim and the Colonies,
seeking employment and new lives in the Core. Now The Works was
a destination for fugitives from Nar Shaddaa who needed a hole to
crawl into. A Coruscanti might risk a visit to The Works if he had just
been laid off by the Bank of Aargau and was looking for someone to
disintegrate his former boss. Or perhaps when death sticks no longer
satisfied and a capsule of Crude was in order …
It was the gritty, toxic smoke that still belched from the stacks of
factories closed for generations that made for the crimson-and-gold
splendor of Coruscant’s sunsets, gawked at by the affluent habitués
of the Senate District’s Skysitter Restaurant.
The entire sector might have been demolished if it could be
determined with any certainty just who owned what. Rumors
persisted that hired assassins and crime syndicates had buried so
many bodies in The Works that it should be considered a cemetery.
And yet Dooku loved the place.
The antithesis of his native Serenno, The Works was very much a
home away from home for the human who had earned the title Darth
Tyranus.
One structure in particular—columnar in shape, round-topped,
propped by angular ramparts—rising from the defiled core of The
Works like a stake driven into its heart. Strong in the dark side—
made so by Darth Sidious—the building had been the place of
Dooku’s apprenticeship, just as it had served as a training ground for
Darth Maul before Dooku, and who knew who or how many other
Sith disciples before Maul.
During the ten years preceding the outbreak of the war—when
Count Dooku of Serenno was believed to have been peddling his
Separatist agenda to disenfranchised worlds in the Mid and Outer
Rims—he had, in fact, spent long periods of time in The Works,
coming and going at will, or as required of him by Darth Sidious.
Even in the three years since, he had been able to visit Coruscant
without fear of detection, thanks in part to unique countermeasures
the Geonosians had engineered into his interstellar sloop.
The modified Punworcca 116 rested on its slight landing gear in the
building’s vast docking space. With its needle-tipped bow carapaces
and the spherical cockpit module they gripped, the sloop was
typically Geonosian in design. Its signature sail, however, had been
obtained with Sidious’s help from a dealer in pre-Republic
antiquities in the Gree Enclave. Furled into the ventral carapace now
—seldom used any longer—it had been created by an ancient
spacefaring race that had taken to the grave the secrets of supralight
emission propulsion.
Having ordered the sloop’s FA-4 pilot droid to remain in the ball
cockpit, Dooku was walking some of the stiffness of the long voyage
out of his legs. His black trousers were tucked into black dress boots,
and his black tunic was cinched by a wide belt of costly leather.
Thrown back over his shoulders, the Serenno armorweave-lined cape
shimmered behind him. He made no efforts to disguise himself for
such trips to Coruscant. The silver hair, mustache, beard, and flaring
eyebrows that gave him the look of a stage magician were as
meticulously groomed as ever.
Normally measured, Dooku’s pace was rushed and somewhat
haphazard—evidence to anyone who knew him that the Count was
troubled. If asked, he might have admitted as much. Even so, in
moments when he could put aside the reasons for his visit, he
surveyed the docking bay with a certain fondness, recalling the years
he had spent under Sidious’s tutelage, learning the ways of the Sith,
practicing the dark arts, perfecting himself.
Mastering evil, Yoda would have said.
The problem was partly semantic, in that the Jedi Order had seen
to it that the dark side of the Force had become equated with evil.
But was shade more evil than stark sunlight? Recognizing that the
dark side was on the ascendant, the Jedi—in service to the Force—
should have known enough to embrace it, to ally themselves with it.
After all, it was all a matter of balance, and if the preservation of
balance required the dark side to be on top, then so be it.
With Dooku, Sidious hadn’t had to waste precious hours on
lightsaber technique, nor on ridding Dooku of ill habits born of a
lifetime spent in the Jedi Temple, for Dooku had long before rid
himself of those. Instead, Sidious had focused on giving Dooku what
had amounted to a crash course in tapping into the power of the dark
side—a mere taste of which had proved intoxicating. Enough to
convince Dooku that no course was left open to him but to abandon
the Order; more, that his entire life had been preparation for his
apprenticeship to Sidious.
That at long last he had found a true mentor.
The Sith saw no need to take on only young disciples, though they
often did. Sometimes the training went smoother with disciples who
had lived long enough to grow disillusioned or angry or vengeful. The
Jedi, by contrast, were shackled by compassion. Their penchant for
showing mercy, for granting forgiveness, for heeding the dictates of
conscience, prevented them from giving themselves over to the dark
side. From becoming as a force of nature itself, paranormally strong
and quick, capable of conjuring Sith lightning, of exteriorizing rage,
all without the need for the magic hand passes the Jedi were so fond
of employing.
The Sith understood that the elitism and mobsterism of the
Republic could be ended only by bringing the diverse beings of the
galaxy under the control of a single hand. The galaxy could only be
saved from itself by the imposition of order.
What fools the Jedi were not to see it. Blind to their own downfall,
the coming of their endtime.
What fools—
The sound of soft footfalls made Dooku turn.
From off to one side of the docking bay a figure approached.
Dressed in a hooded cloak of burgundy material, closed at the neck
by a distinctive clasp, and so soft and voluminous that it covered
everything but the lower portion of the figure’s face and his hands.
Rarely was that hood lowered, allowing the wearer to walk unnoticed
through the byways and plazas of Coruscant’s blurred underground,
just another recluse or religious initiate arrived in the Core from
some world beyond imagining.
Of his youth, Sidious had offered little these past thirteen years; of
his Master, Darth Plagueis, even less.
More than once it had occurred to Dooku that Sidious and Yoda
had certain qualities in common. Principally, that neither was
entirely what he appeared to be—that is, made frail by age, or by the
intensity required to master the Sith or Jedi arts.
On Geonosis, Yoda’s easy parrying and, indeed, handling of the
Sith lightning Dooku hurled at him had come as a surprise. Had
made him wonder if, on some level during the course of Yoda’s eighthundred-odd years, the Jedi Master hadn’t delved into the dark arts,
if only as a means of familiarizing himself with his perceived enemy.
And on Vjun, only months ago, Yoda himself had admitted as much.
Carry a darkness within me, I do, he had said. Yoda probably
believed that he had defeated Dooku on Geonosis. But in fact, Dooku
had only fled the fight to safeguard the plans he had been carrying—
the technical readouts to what would one day become the Ultimate
Weapon …
“Welcome, Darth Tyranus,” Sidious said as he drew nearer.
“Lord Sidious,” Dooku said, bowing slightly at the waist. “I spared
no haste in leaving Kaon.”
“And took a great risk you did, my apprentice.”
Whether by nature or design, Sidious’s words came slowly,
sibilantly.
“A calculated risk, my lord.”
“Do you fear that the Republic has become so adept at
eavesdropping that they can now listen in on our private
transmissions?”
“No, my lord. As I told you, the Republic has probably deciphered
the code we have been using to communicate with our … partners,
shall we say. But I am confident that the Intelligence division knew
nothing of our plans for dealing with the Bith at Escarte.”
“Then my instructions were carried out?”
“They were.”
“And still you have come here,” Sidious said.
“Some matters are best discussed in real time.”
Sidious nodded. “Then let us speak of these things in real time.”
They walked in silence to a balcony that overlooked the desolate
sprawl of The Works. In the far distance the glassy towers of the
Senate District disappeared into clouds. One of Dooku’s previous
visits had followed the assassination of a faithless Senator by Jedi
Knight Quinlan Vos. Duped by Dooku on several occasions, Vos had
managed to track Dooku to The Works, though he apparently hadn’t
perceived just how deeply the dark side had taken root there.
“I suspect that the planned disappearance of Thal K’sar did not go
according to plan,” Sidious said finally.
“Regretfully, my lord. He was taken into custody, but our guild
confederates at Escarte failed to act quickly enough. Hours from
execution, K’sar was rescued and spirited from the facility by a
Republic Intelligence agent, who had the help of two Jedi.”
Dooku had been able to count on one hand the number of times he
had seen Sidious angry.
Suddenly he needed two hands.
“I would hear more of this, Lord Tyranus,” Sidious said with
purposeful slowness.
“I have since learned that these same two Jedi recently visited the
Xi Char world of Charros Four.”
Well ahead of Dooku, Sidious said: “The engraver of the mechnochair …”
“The same.”
Sidious pondered it for a moment. “From Viceroy Gunray to the Xi
Char engraver to the Bith who implemented my designs for the
hyperwave transceiver and holoprojector …”
“The Jedi mean to expose you, my lord.”
“And what if they should?” Sidious snapped. “Do you think that
would bring an end to what I have set in motion?”
“No, my lord. But this is unexpected.”
Sidious eyed Dooku from beneath the hood of his cloak. “Yes. Yes,
it is, as you say, unexpected.” He returned his gaze to the far-off
towers. “Someday I may choose to reveal myself to the galaxy, but
not now. This war must be made to continue a while longer. There
are worlds and persons we still need to convert to our side.”
“I understand.”
“Tell me, who is conducting this … search?”
Dooku exhaled with purpose. “Skywalker and Kenobi.”
Sidious took a long moment to respond. “The so-called Chosen
One, and a Jedi with enough good fortune to almost make one
believe in luck.” Without turning from the view, he added: “I am
displeased by this turn of events, Lord Tyranus. Greatly displeased.”
Once Master and Padawan, Kenobi and Skywalker had become the
scourge of Dooku’s existence. On Geonosis he had deliberately
allowed them to pursue him—just as Sidious had instructed him to
do. Also as instructed, Dooku had made Kenobi aware of the
existence of Darth Sidious, as a means of confusing the Jedi Order by
telling them the truth. In the sloop’s docking bay he had
demonstrated his mastery to Kenobi and Skywalker—although
Skywalker hadn’t been as easily defeated the second time they had
dueled. Enraged, the young Jedi had proved a powerful opponent,
and Dooku suspected that he had grown only more powerful since
Geonosis.
Long have I watched young Skywalker, Sidious had once
admitted.
And all the more so of late.
“My lord, the Jedi may search for others who contributed to
fashioning the communications devices you distributed to Gunray,
myself, and others. Also, there is the matter of Grievous’s defeat at
Belderone.”
Sidious made a gesture accepting that defeat. “Do not trouble
yourself about Belderone. It may suit our ultimate purpose to have
the Republic believe that they have chased us from their precious
Core. As regards your concern for keeping secret my whereabouts, I
am moved. But here, too, I begin to see a way to engineer events in
our favor.” He paused to consider something, then said: “Yes, I begin
to see the blazes along the trail Skywalker and Kenobi will follow.”
Sidious turned to Dooku, grinning malevolently. “Their singlemindedness will deliver them into our hands, Lord Tyranus. We will
set our trap for them on Naos Three.”
Dooku allowed his skepticism to show. “As remote a world as can
be found in known space, my lord.”
“Nevertheless, Kenobi and young Skywalker will find their way to
it.”
Dooku decided to take it on faith. “What would you have me do?”
“Nothing more than make arrangements—for you are needed
elsewhere. Employ outsiders.”
Dooku nodded. “It is done.”
“One small addendum. See to it that Obi-Wan Kenobi ceases to be
an irritant.” Sidious sneered the name.
“He represents so forceful a threat to our plans?”
Sidious shook his head. “But Skywalker does. And
Kenobi … Kenobi has been as a father to him. Orphan Skywalker
once and for all, and he will shift.”
“Shift?”
“To the dark side.”
“An apprentice?”
Sidious gazed at him. “In good time, Lord Tyranus. All in good
time.”
Having suffered through all four hours of Palpatine’s State of the
Republic address to the Senate, interrupted dozens of times by
standing ovations—an archaic tradition not practiced since the era of
Supreme Chancellor Valorum Eixes—Bail Organa watched from the
backseat of the air taxi as a trio of assault cruisers lifted off into
Coruscant’s flame-orange sky, casting their wedge-shaped shadows
on the spired roof of the Jedi Temple.
Bail’s destination.
He instructed the droid pilot to set the taxi down on the Temple’s
northeast landing platform, where two Jedi younglings were waiting
for him. The opulence of the Temple’s wide corridors was lost on him
as he followed his escort to the room the Order used for public
meetings, rather than the circular chamber reserved for private
conclaves in the summit of the High Council spire.
A holorecording of Palpatine’s speech was running in the center of
the room when Bail was admitted. Around the holoprojector table sat
Council members Yoda, Mace Windu, Saesee Tiin, Ki-Adi-Mundi,
Shaak Ti, Stass Allie, Plo Koon, and Kit Fisto.
“And so it is with a heavy heart that I commit two hundred
thousand additional troopers to the Outer Rim sieges,” the
holoimage of the Supreme Chancellor was saying, “though in full
confidence that the end of this brutal conflict is now in sight. Cast
from the Core, expelled from the Inner Rim and Colonies, driven
from the Mid Rim, and soon to be exiled in the spiral arms, the
Confederacy will pay a dear price for what they have brought down
on our fair house.”
He paused for applause, which went on for far too long.
Droid cams buzzed around the Great Rotunda to highlight the
more well-known of the Palpatine-friendly factions then, coming full
circle, closed on Palpatine’s thirty-meter-tall podium to linger on the
two dozen human naval officers who were standing just below the
summit, clapping enthusiastically.
“A show of force, this is,” Yoda remarked.
Dressed in robes of magenta and forest green, Palpatine
continued.
“Some of you may question why my heart is heavy when my tidings
bring news of such long-awaited redress. The decision weighs on me
because I would sooner say: Enough is enough, let the Confederacy
—the Separatists—wither and die on their own in the Outer Rim. Let
us keep our best and brightest home; let us refrain from bringing
bloodshed to any more worlds, harm to our noble soldiers, our
trusted Jedi Knights.”
Yoda harrumphed.
“Sadly, though, I cannot decide with my heart alone. Because we
cannot allow the enemies of democracy to rest and recuperate. Like a
life-threatening growth taken hold in the body, they must be excised.
As a contagious disease, they must be eradicated. If not, our
children’s generation and generations to come will live under the
threat that those who brought chaos to the galaxy will find the
strength to regroup and attack anew.”
“Applause break,” Bail said—because he had been there.
The Jedi Masters stirred in their high-backed chairs but said
nothing.
“Lest my statements convey an impression that the hardest
decisions are behind us, let me hasten to add that much work
remains to be done. So much rebuilding; so much reordering … To
you, all of you, will I look for guidance in determining which worlds
we should welcome back into the Republic’s embrace, and which, if
any, should be kept at arm’s length, or shunned for the injuries they
have heaped upon us. Similarly will I look to you for guidance in
reshaping our Constitution to conform to the needs of the new
epoch.”
“What does he mean by that?” Mace Windu interjected.
“Finally will I look to you, all of you, to author a new spirit in
Coruscant, in the Core, throughout the star systems where the light
of democracy continues to shine, so that we can look forward to
another thousand years of peace, and another thousand beyond that,
and so on, until war itself is stamped from our just domain.”
“Had enough?” Stass Allie asked while the Senate broke into
extended applause. Tall, slender, and dark-complected, she wore a
Tholoth headdress similar in design to that worn by her immediate
predecessor on the Council, Adi Gallia. When no one objected, she
deactivated the holoprojector.
Turning to Bail, Yoda said, “Appreciate your visit, we do, Senator
Organa.”
“I just wanted all of you to know that, despite what the HoloNet
news might lead you to believe, not all of us were on our feet.”
“Aware of this, we are.”
Bail gestured broadly to the room’s triangular windows and shook
his head in dismay. “Coruscant is already in a celebratory mood. You
can practically taste it in the air.”
“Premature, any celebration is,” Yoda said ruefully.
Mace leaned forward in his chair. “What can Palpatine be thinking
—committing half of Coruscant’s home force to the Outer Rim
sieges?”
“Emboldened Palpatine is, by what we achieved at Belderone.”
“The Supreme Chancellor singles out Mygeeto, Saleucami, and
Felucia,” Plo Koon said from beneath the mask that supplied him
with life gases.
Ki-Adi-Mundi’s elongated head made a subtle nod. “A ‘triad of
evil,’ he labeled them.”
“Separatist bastions, they are,” Yoda said. “But so remote, so
insignificant.”
“A danger to the body of the Republic,” Bail said.
Mace ridiculed the idea. “When the body is damaged, it prioritizes.
It doesn’t rally its defenses to deal with a pinprick when the chest has
been holed by a blaster bolt.”
Bail glanced around the room. “Some of us are concerned that the
Supreme Chancellor has been persuaded to press these sieges as a
means of acquiring worlds by force. There are bills before the Senate
now that could grant him the authority to overrule local system
governments.”
Yoda compressed his lips in indignation. “A labyrinth of evil, this
war has become. But protect ourselves, we must. Safeguard the
traditions the Jedi have upheld for one thousand generations.”
Mace ran a hand over his shaven head. “We can only hope that
Obi-Wan and Anakin find their way to the source of this war before
it’s too late.”
With a slurping sound, Anakin’s right leg sank almost to the knee
in the muck that passed for Naos III’s main street. An equally
onomatopoeic sound accompanied Anakin’s reclaiming of the leg,
and expletives flew from his lips as he hopped off on his left foot
toward solid ground. Crossing his right leg over his left while
standing, he tried to shake some of the filth from his boot, then
pointed to a pinkish strand that refused to let go.
“What is that?” he asked in alarmed disgust, with breath clouds
punctuating his every word.
Reluctantly, Obi-Wan leaned in to peer at the slick boot, not
wanting to get too close.
“It could be something alive, or something that was once alive, or
something that came from something alive.”
“Well, whatever it is, it’s going to have to catch a ride on someone
else.”
Obi-Wan straightened and shoved his hands deeper into the
sleeves of his robe. “I warned you there are worse places than
Tatooine.”
Lining both sides of the puddled street were low-slung prefab
buildings, their alloy roofs capped with crystalline snow and bearded
with thick icicles. Pieces of a collapsed skyway had been moved to
one side of the street, left to marinate in a puddle much like the one
Anakin had inadvertently waded into, and fashioned by areas of
radiant heating that still functioned beneath the mostly ruined
ceramacrete paving.
Anakin began stomping his boot on the solid ice. Ultimately the
clingy, unidentifiable pink thing decided that it had had enough and
flew off into a snowdrift.
“Worse places than Tatooine,” he mumbled. “And, what, you feel
we need to visit every last one of them? When are we going to be
allowed to return to Coruscant?”
“Blame Thal K’sar. He was the one who suggested we should start
here.”
Anakin gazed around. “I just can’t help thinking the next place will
be worse.”
They both fell silent for a moment, then said in unison: “Almost
makes me nostalgic for Escarte.”
Anakin winced. “You know it’s time to end the partnership when
that happens. In fact, I could see you and Yoda teaming up. You
share the same fondness for caution and lectures.”
“Yes, we’re two of a kind, old Yoda and me.”
They continued their slog toward what seemed to be the heart of
the place.
For most of its short year the moon known as Naos III was a frigid
little orb with days that never seemed to end. Indigenous herbivores
and carnivores had been hunted to extinction early on by colonists
from Rodia and Ryloth, lured by the hope of discovering rich veins of
ryll spice in Naos III’s volcanically heated cave systems. The
creatures one saw most often now were bovine rycrits and woollierthan-normal banthas.
The moon’s continued habitation owed to a pink-fleshed delicacy
fished from the ice-covered rivers that plunged turbulent and roaring
from a surround of nearly sheer mountains. Known as the Naos
sharptooth, the fish spawned only in the coldest months, was
shipped offworld, flash-frozen, and sold at exorbitant prices in
eateries from Mon Calamari to Corellia. Still, few locals banked
enough credits to buy passage off Naos III, preferring instead to
return their meager earnings to Naos III Mercantile, which oversaw
the sharptooth industry and owned nearly every store, hotel,
gambling parlor, and cantina.
The dispirited humanoids who had colonized the moon had never
bothered to award a name to their principal population center, so it,
too, was known as Naos III. Visitors expecting to find a typical
spaceport found instead a cluster of fortified hilltops, interconnected
by bridges that spanned a delta of waterways. As befitted a place with
such a dearth of creativity, the moon had attracted nomads and
spacers of dubious character, eager either to lose or reinvent
themselves. While Rodians and Lethan Twi’leks comprised the
majority, humans and other humanoids were well represented. A few
wealthy sportfishers arrived each year, but Naos III was simply too
remote and too lacking in infrastructure to support a tourist trade.
Despite the fact that the moon seemed a perfect place for a redcomplected Twi’lek to hide, Obi-Wan doubted that Fa’ale Leh would
be found here. To begin with, she would have certainly changed her
name by now, possibly even the color of her complexion. More
important, Naos III didn’t offer much in the way of job opportunities
for a former spicerunner—unless Leh was one of the death-defying
few who piloted loads of flash-frozen sharptooths to the Tion or
Coreward on the Perlemian.
According to K’sar, Leh had been in the business of transporting
shipments of spice from Ryloth to worlds in Hutt space when Sienar
had hired her to deliver the experimental spacecraft for which K’sar
had constructed a transceiver identical to the one he had affixed to
Gunray’s mechno-chair.
To Obi-Wan’s mind the ship in question could only be the
modified star courier that had belonged to the Sith he had killed on
Naboo, and had been confiscated by the Republic after the battle
there. Flight, weapons, and communications systems had selfdestructed when Republic Intelligence agents had bungled an
attempt to enter the courier, but, unknown to many, its burned-out
carcass still sat in a clandestine docking bay in Theed. It had long
been assumed that the tattooed Zabrak Sith had performed the
modifications, but information supplied by K’sar suggested that
Raith Sienar’s Advanced Projects Laboratory had been responsible
not only for building the ship, but also for implementing Darth
Sidious’s designs.
Obi-Wan and Anakin might have gone directly to the source—to
Raith Sienar—had Supreme Chancellor Palpatine not vetoed the
idea.
The Republic’s other major supplier of weapons, Kuat Drive Yards,
was known to have contributed to both sides during the war. Under
its subsidiary, Rothana Heavy Engineering—the builders of the
Acclamator-class assault ships, as well as the AT-TE walkers—KDY
had also supplied the Confederacy with the Storm Fleet, which had
been “the Terror of the Perlemian” until retired from service with the
help of Obi-Wan and Anakin.
With snow falling harder in Naos III, the two stopped to get their
bearings. Obi-Wan gestured to a nearby cantina. “This has to be the
fifteenth we’ve passed.”
“On this street,” Anakin said. “If we stop for a drink in each one,
we’ll be drunk before we reach the bridge.”
“With any luck. Still, they’re likely to be our best source of
information.”
“As opposed to just looking up her name in the local comm
directory.”
“And a lot more fun.”
Anakin grinned. “Fine with me. Where do you want to start?”
Completing a circle, Obi-Wan pointed to a cantina diagonally
across from them. The Desperate Pilot.
Four hours later, half drunk and near frozen, they entered the final
cantina before the bridge. Brushing snow from the shoulders of their
cloaks and lowering the hoods, they scanned the patrons crowding
the bar and occupying nearly every table.
“Not a lot to do in Naos Three when you’re not fishing,” Anakin
said.
“I’ve the distinct impression that some drinking goes on even
during work hours.”
Replacing two Rodians who stumbled away from the curved bar,
they ordered drinks.
Anakin sipped from his glass. “Ten cantinas, as many Lethan
females, and every one of them claims to have been born onworld. I’d
say we’re in for a long stay.”
“K’sar didn’t supply you with anything else to go on—scars,
tattooed lekku, anything?”
Anakin shook his head. “Nothing.” When Obi-Wan signaled for the
human bartender, he added: “You order one more Twi’lek appetizer,
I promise I’m going to cut your arm off.”
Obi-Wan laughed. “I found the izzy-mold at the last place to be
very flavorful.”
Anakin took another sip. “And speaking of arms.”
“Were we?”
“We were. At least I think we were. Anyway, remember in the
Outlander Club when you went off to get a drink? Did you have an
inkling that Zam Wessel would follow you?”
“On the contrary. I knew she would follow you.”
“Implying that shapeshifters have a special fondness for me?”
“The way you were strutting around, what female could help
herself?” Mimicking Anakin’s voice, Obi-Wan said: “ ‘Jedi
business.’ ”
“Then you admit it—you were using me as bait.”
“A privilege that comes with being a Master. You have more than
repaid me in kind, in any case.”
Anakin raised his glass. “A toast to that.”
Seeing the bartender approach, Obi-Wan placed a sizable credit
chip under his empty glass and slid it forward. “Another drink. And
the rest is for you.”
An athletic man with red hair that fell almost to his waist, the
bartender eyed the credit chip. “Rather large remuneration for such a
rudimentary libation. Perhaps you’d permit me to concoct something
a trifle more flavorsome.”
“What I’d actually prefer is a bit of information.”
“Now, how did I guess.”
“We’re looking for a Lethan female,” Anakin said.
“Who isn’t.”
Obi-Wan shook his head. “Strictly business.”
“That’s what it often is with them. I suggest you try the Palace
Hotel.”
“You don’t understand.”
“Oh, I think I do.”
“Look,” Anakin said, “this one probably isn’t a … masseuse.”
“Or a dancer,” Obi-Wan thought to add.
“Then what would she be doing on Naos Three?”
“She used to be a pilot—with a taste for spice.”
Obi-Wan watched the bartender closely. “She would have arrived
on Naos Three within the past ten or so years.”
The bartender’s eyes narrowed. “Why didn’t you say so to begin
with? You mean Genne.”
“The name we know her by is Fa’ale Leh.”
“My friends, on Naos Three a name is nothing more than a
convenient handle.”
“But you do know her,” Obi-Wan said.
“I do.”
“Then you know where she can be found.”
The bartender jerked a thumb. “Upstairs. Room seven. She said
you should go right up.”
Anakin and Obi-Wan traded confused glances.
“She’s expecting us?” Obi-Wan said.
The bartender heaved his massive shoulders in a shrug. “She didn’t
say who she was expecting. Just that if anyone came looking for her,
I should send them up.”
They canceled the drink order and walked to the foot of a long
flight of stairs.
“Jedi mind trick?” Anakin asked.
“If it was, I wasn’t aware of performing it.”
“Ten drinks will do that to you.”
“Yes, and maybe it was the Twi’lek izzy-mold. What seems
infinitely more likely is that we’re about to walk into a trap.”
“So we should be on guard.”
“Yes, Anakin, we should be on guard.”
Obi-Wan led the way up the stairs and rapped his hand on room
seven’s green plastoid door.
“Door’s unlocked,” a voice said in Basic from within.
They made certain that their lightsabers were in easy reach, but
left them affixed to their belts and concealed. Obi-Wan hit the doorrelease stud, then followed Anakin into the chill room.
Wearing trousers, boots, and an insulated jacket, Genne—perhaps
Fa’ale Leh—was lounging on a narrow bed, her back and lekku
against the headboard, long legs extended and crossed at the ankle.
Beside her on a small table stood a half-full bottle of what Obi-Wan
guessed was the local rocket-fuel homebrew.
Reaching for two clearly unwashed glasses, she said: “Fix you a
drink?”
“We’re already at the legal limit,” Anakin said, vigilant.
The remark made her smile. “Naos Three doesn’t have a legal
limit, kid.” She took a healthy swallow from her own glass, eyeing
them over the rim. “I have to say, you’re not what I expected.”
“Was that surprise or disappointment?” Anakin asked Obi-Wan.
“Who were you expecting?” Obi-Wan said.
“Your classic rough-and-tumble types. Black Sun lackeys, bounty
hunters. You two … You look more like lost Jedi.” She paused, then
said: “Maybe that’s exactly what you are. Jedi have been known to
outpunish even the punishers.”
“Only when necessary,” Anakin said.
She shrugged absently. “You want to do it here, or are you going to
buy me a last meal?”
“Do what here?” Obi-Wan said.
“Kill me, of course.”
Anakin took a forward step. “There’s always that possibility.”
She glanced from him to Obi-Wan. “Bad Jedi. Good Jedi.”
“We want to talk to you about a star courier you piloted for Sienar
Advanced Projects.”
She nodded at Obi-Wan. “Of course you do. A round of questions
and answers, then a blaster—no, a lightsaber to the side of the head.”
“Then you are Fa’ale Leh.”
“Who told you where to find me? Had to be Thal K’sar, am I right?
He’s the only one still alive. That betraying little Bith—”
“Tell us about the courier,” Anakin said, cutting her off.
She smiled in apparent recollection. “An extraordinary ship—a
work of genius. But I knew going in, it was a job that would come
back to haunt me. And so it has.”
Obi-Wan looked around the room. “You’ve been in hiding here for
more than ten years.”
“No, I came for the beaches.” She motioned in dismissal. “You
know, they killed the engineers, the mechanics, just about everyone
who worked on that craft. But I knew. I made the delivery, grabbed
what was due me, and I was away. Not far enough, though. They
tracked me to Ryloth, Nar Shaddaa, half the starforsaken worlds in
the Tingel Arm. I had my share of close calls. I could show you the
scars.”
“No need,” Obi-Wan said as Fa’ale was bringing her left head-tail
over her shoulder.
She threw back another drink. “So who sent you—Sienar? Or was it
the one the courier was built for?”
“Who was it built for?” Anakin said.
She regarded him for a moment. “That’s the funny thing. Sienar—
Raith Sienar himself—told me it was for a Jedi. But the guy I handed
the yoke over to—he was no Jedi. Oh, he had a lightsaber and all,
but … I don’t know, there was something off about him.”
Obi-Wan nodded. “We’ve had dealings with him.”
“Where did you deliver it?” Anakin pressed.
“Well, to Coruscant, of course.”
Obi-Wan glanced at the ceiling.
An instant before it blew inward—raining plastoid rafters, icecovered roof panels, ceiling tiles, and two heavily armed
Trandoshans—he had rushed to the bed and overturned it, dumping
Fa’ale Leh, foam mattresses, and bedcovers onto the cold floor.
In hand and activated, Anakin’s lightsaber was already a streak of
blue light, deflecting blaster bolts and parrying swings of a vibro-ax
in the meaty hands of a red-skinned Falleen who had burst through
the door. Behind the Falleen came two humans who, in their
eagerness to race into the room, had wedged themselves in the door
frame.
Whirling, Obi-Wan called his lightsaber from his belt and leapt to
the doorway, his blade slicing both hands off one of the humans. An
agonized howl pierced the frigid air as the man sank to his knees.
Unstuck, the second one fell forward, directly onto Obi-Wan’s blade.
The smell of burned flesh filled the room, swirling about with smoke
from the explosive that had taken out three square meters of roof,
and big wet snowflakes that were drifting through the opening.
Off to Obi-Wan’s left Anakin stood unmoving in the center of the
room, holding his own against the two reptilian aliens and the
wielder of the vibro-ax. Parried bolts flew directly through the thin
walls, rousing shrieks from Fa’ale’s neighbors to both sides. Doors
opened and slammed, and footfalls pounded on the hallway floor.
Pivoting on his left foot, the Falleen swung the vibro-ax at ObiWan’s head. Ducking the swing, Obi-Wan got underneath the blade
and just managed to nick the Falleen in the left thigh.
The strike only fueled the humanoid’s rage. Raising the ax over his
head, he rushed forward, intent on splitting Obi-Wan down the
middle. A backflip carried Obi-Wan out of the blade’s path, but
Fa’ale’s bedside table wasn’t as fortunate. Cleaved, each half table fell
to the floor, launching the Twi’lek’s bottle of firewater clear across
the room and square into the face of the larger of the two
Trandoshans. Screaming in anger, the alien raised a clawed hand to
his bleeding brow ridge, even while his other hand continued to
trigger bolts at Anakin. As the bolts began to go wide, Anakin raised
his left hand, pushing it through the air in the Trandoshan’s
direction and blowing him backward through the room’s only
window.
Determined to make the most of Anakin’s split attention, the
reptiloid’s partner risked a lunge forward.
Obi-Wan tracked the flight of the alien’s head across the room, out
the door, and into the hallway, where someone loosed a
bloodcurdling screech. The Falleen, finding himself on his own with
the two Jedi, extended the ax in front of him and began to whirl.
Anakin backed away from the circling blade, then dived forward,
sliding across the wet floor on his belly with his lightsaber held out in
front of him and amputating the Falleen’s legs at the knees. Shorter
by half a meter but no less enraged, the humanoid sent the vibro-ax
flying straight for Obi-Wan, then drew from his hip holster a large
blaster and began firing.
In midflight from the vibrating blade, Obi-Wan watched Anakin
rid the Falleen of blaster and hand, and thrust his lightsaber directly
into the Falleen’s chest. Whatever torso armor the humanoid was
wearing beneath his jacket gave the energy blade pause, but heat
from the lightsaber set fire to the Falleen’s bandolier of explosive
rounds.
Backing away from the lightsaber on the cauterized stumps of his
legs, the Falleen began swatting at the growing flames in mounting
panic, then turned and executed a perfect front dive out the window
—only to explode short of the snowdrift that might have been his
destination.
The room fell suddenly silent, except for the sizzle of huge
snowflakes hitting the lightsabers.
Obi-Wan shouted: “Get her out of here!”
Deactivating his blade, Anakin pulled Fa’ale out from under the
mattresses and bedding, and yanked her to her feet.
Wobbling drunkenly, she took in the ruined room.
“You two seem like decent folk—even for Jedi. Sorry you have to
get mixed up in this.”
Catching sight of a bottle that had somehow survived the violence,
she started for it. When Anakin tightened his hold on her, she balled
her hands and hammered at his chest and upper arms.
“Stop trying to be a hero, kid! I’m tired of running. It’s over—for all
of us.”
“Not till we say it is,” Anakin said.
She sagged in his grip. “That’s the problem. That’s why we’re in a
war to begin with.”
Anakin began to drag her toward the door.
“Right on time,” Obi-Wan said from the window. “Six more that I
can see.” A blaster bolt destroyed what was left of the window frame.
Anakin hauled Fa’ale to her feet once more and planted himself
face-to-face with her. “You’ve outwitted assassins for ten years. You
have a way out of here.” He shook her forcefully. “Where?”
She remained still for a moment, then shut her eyes and nodded.
Obi-Wan and Anakin followed her out the door to a utility closet at
the end of the hall. Concealed behind a false rear wall, two shiny
poles dropped into darkness. Fa’ale took hold of one of the poles and
vanished from sight. Anakin went next. Through the closed door,
Obi-Wan could hear a crowd of beings race past the closet, heading
for the Twi’lek’s room. Gripping the pole with hands and feet, he let
gravity take over.
The descent was longer than expected. Instead of ending up in the
basement of the cantina, the poles ran completely through the hill on
which that portion of Naos III had been built, all the way to the river
itself. The bottom of the poles disappeared into thick ice. In dim
natural light Obi-Wan saw that he was in a cavern that had become
an inlet for the river. Close to the base of the poles sat three surfaceeffect sleds of the sort the locals used for ice fishing, outfitted with
powerful-looking engines and pairs of long skis.
“I’m too drunk to drive,” Fa’ale was saying.
Anakin had already straddled the machine’s narrow seat, and was
studying the controls. “You leave that to me,” he told her. With the
flip of a switch, the speeder’s engine coughed to life, then began to
purr loudly in the hollow of the cave.
Obi-Wan mounted a second sled, while Fa’ale was positioning
herself behind Anakin.
“That one, then that one,” Anakin said, pointing out the ignition
switch and the warmer. Demonstrating, he added: “Thrusters, pitch
control, steer like this.”
Obi-Wan was instantly confused.
“Like this?”
“Like this, like this!” Anakin emphasized, demonstrating again,
then indicating another set of switches on the control panel of ObiWan’s machine. “Repulsorlift. But strictly for handling small ice
mounds, frozen debris, that sort of thing. This isn’t a conventional
speeder—or even a swoop.”
“Do you remember where we parked the cruiser?”
“I don’t even remember landing. But the field can’t be far off.”
“Downriver,” Fa’ale said. “Swing south around the hillock, go
under the bridge, then west around the next hillock. Under two more
bridges, slalom south again, and we’re there.”
Obi-Wan stared at her. “I’ll follow you two.”
They roared from the mouth of the cavern and out onto the glacial
river.
Blaster bolts began to sear into the ice around them before they
made the first bridge. Glancing over his shoulder, Obi-Wan saw three
sleds gaining on them from upriver.
On the bridge, two beings bundled up in cold-weather gear were
drawing a bead on him with a pintle-mounted repeating blaster.
The star that warmed Naos III was a white blur, low on the horizon.
Ominous clouds obscured the mountains to Obi-Wan’s right.
Snow was falling harder.
Tearing into it as fast as the sled would carry him, he felt as if he
had run smack into a blizzard. The lovely, crystalline flakes would
have been like pellets against his face and hands if not for the Force.
Even so, he could barely see, and the ice—gray, white, and sometimes
blue—was nowhere near as smooth as he had thought it would be.
Pebbly where surface water had thawed and refrozen countless
times; mounded up over debris trapped during the freeze; pocked by
fishing holes; heaped high with ice that had filled the holes …
Matters weren’t helped any by the fact that he was being shot at.
Bolts from the repeating blaster on the bridge had him weaving all
over the river, slaloming around ice dams and leaping small mounds.
The repulsorlift would have allowed him to fly over the obstacles—as
Anakin was doing, farther downriver—but Obi-Wan just couldn’t get
the hang of it. More to the point, engaging the repulsorlift required
using two hands, and just now he had none to spare. His left was
gripped on the control bar/throttle; his right, tight on the hilt of his
ignited lightsaber, as he fended off bolts from above and behind.
For a moment he was back on Muunilinst, jousting with Durge’s
speeder-freak lancer droids.
Except for the snow.
A vacillating roar in his right ear told him that one of the pursuit
sleds had caught up with him. Out of the corner of his streaming eye,
Obi-Wan saw the sled’s human pilot bend low over the control bars
to provide his Rodian rider with the clearance he needed to send a
blaster bolt through Obi-Wan’s head. Braking, Obi-Wan allowed the
sled to come alongside more quickly than the Rodian had planned.
The rider’s first shot raced past Obi-Wan’s eyes; the second, he
deflected slightly downward, straight into the sled’s engine.
The machine exploded instantly, flinging pilot and rider head over
heels in opposite directions.
Quickly, however, a second sled was catching up.
This one carried a pilot only, but a more skillful one. Twisting the
throttle, the pilot drove his sled into Obi-Wan’s, trying to send it
spinning out of control or, better still, into the trunk of a massive tree
that was protruding acutely from the thick ice. Narrowly missing the
latter, Obi-Wan went into a sideways skid. Overcorrecting, he added
spin to his slide and couldn’t resume his course until the sled had
whipped through half a dozen counter rotations. By then his crashhelmeted pursuer was well positioned to ram him a second time, but
Obi-Wan was ready for him. Turning sharply, he steered into the
pursuit sled, hanging on through the jarring collision, then directing
a Force push at the rebounding pilot.
The sled shot forward as if supercharged, with the pilot all but
dangling from the control bars. Speeding up the face of a hummock,
the craft went airborne, then ballistic, plummeting into a thinly icedover fishing hole at an angle that took machine and rider both deep
under solid ice.
Water geysered into the air, drenching Obi-Wan as he raced past.
The third sled was still clinging to his tail, and blaster bolts were
whizzing past his ears. Up ahead, he saw Anakin and Fa’ale lean their
sled through a sweeping turn to the south, between two of Naos III’s
many hills. Lethal hyphens of light streaked down from the bridge
that linked the hills, but not one found Anakin or Fa’ale.
Unable to replicate Anakin’s deft turns, Obi-Wan was falling
farther behind with each quarter kilometer, and was now making
himself an easy target for the assassins on the bridge. With no hope
of negotiating the hail of fire, he maneuvered the sled through a long
turn away from the span. But no sooner did he emerge from his half
circle than he found himself on a collision course with the last of the
pursuit sleds.
The inevitability of a head-on crash left him no choice but to
abandon his machine for what was going to be a very long slide on
the ice. But just short of his leap, a bolt in the jagged line the bridge
gunners were stitching along the river caught the pilot of the
onrushing machine in the chest, hurling him into the air. Twisting
the throttle, Obi-Wan swerved around the pilotless sled and
continued to race upriver, out of range of the blasters.
To his right a clamor built over the hill, and the shadow of
something large and swift fell over him. A repeating blaster clacked
repeatedly, fracturing the ice directly in his path and opening a wide,
surging breach of agitated water.
Uncertain he could leap the gap even if he wanted to try, Obi-Wan
applied the brakes—hard!
The sled was ten meters from the ice-chunked fissure when a
metal claw dropped over him, snapping shut and plucking him from
the seat. Wrenched from his hand, his lightsaber flew onto the ice,
and the sled sailed off into the frothing water.
“Stars’ end,” Obi-Wan muttered.
Suspended on a swaying cable, the claw began to ascend toward
the open belly of a graceless snow skiff.
Red hands clamped around Anakin’s waist, Fa’ale whooped and
shouted, clearly enjoying herself. Even through the daze of too many
drinks—or more likely because of them.
“You missed your calling, Jedi,” she shouted into his right ear.
“You could have been a champion Podracer!”
“Been there, done that,” Anakin said over his shoulder.
It was then that he caught sight of Obi-Wan being lifted from his
sled. Bringing brakes and thrusters to bear, Anakin powered the sled
through a fast 180 and shot back upriver, under the bridge they had
just left behind, dodging the unrelenting fire of hand blasters.
“Sharptooth collector,” Fa’ale explained when she saw the snow
skiff. “Gathers catch, so the fishers won’t have to ferry their loads
into the city. That’s what I do here—my job, such as it is.”
The claw that had Obi-Wan in its grip was halfway to the skiff.
“I don’t see any way of reaching him in time,” Fa’ale said.
“Get ready to take the control bars!” Anakin said. Fa’ale’s hands
clutched his robe. “Where are you planning to go?”
“Up.”
Pouring on all speed, Anakin steered the sled up the side of the hill
that supported one half of the bridge. At the zenith of the climb, he
engaged the repulsorlift. Then, leaping from the now rocketing sled,
he called on the Force to propel himself toward the swaying cage.
The pilots of the skiff saw him coming, and banked hard to
starboard, but not soon enough to prevent Anakin from latching onto
the claw. A Rodian in the copilot’s chair cracked open the door and
began firing down at his moving target.
“I had a feeling you’d show up,” Obi-Wan said from inside the
claw.
A lucky shot from above hit the cage and ricocheted.
“Hang on, Master! This isn’t going to be pretty.”
Obi-Wan heard the snap-hiss of Anakin’s lightsaber. Peering
through the metal fingers of the claw, he saw what was coming.
“Anakin, wait—”
But there was no stopping him.
As the claw came within reach of the cargo hold, Anakin swung his
lightsaber and sliced open the floor of the skiff’s cockpit. Sparks and
smoke poured from the rend, and almost immediately the craft slued
to starboard. Passing within a meter of one of the bridge towers, it
began to twirl toward the hillside.
An instant before the crash, Anakin severed the claw cable, and the
cage plummeted, striking the slippery ground and racing down to the
frozen river, out onto the ice, spinning crazily, with Obi-Wan
bouncing around inside and Anakin Force-fastened to the outside
through all the unpredictable pitches and tumbles. The skiff crashed
into the hillside. By the time the claw came to a rest on the far side of
the river, the two Jedi were so covered in snow they looked like
wampas.
Anakin’s lightsaber made short work of the fingers of the claw.
Obi-Wan scrambled out, spitting snow, and shaking like a hound.
“Where’s Fa’ale?”
Anakin scanned the hillsides. The assassins on the bridge had
packed up and fled. Ultimately, he pointed toward the opposite bank
of the river, where a sled was wedged between two mounds of ice.
When they reached her, Fa’ale was laying facedown a few meters
from the machine, which had been holed by blasterfire. Gently
turning her over, Anakin saw that one bolt had amputated the
Twi’lek’s right lekku. Her eyes blinked open, focusing on him as he
cradled her in his arms.
“Don’t tell me,” she said weakly. “I’m going to live, right?”
“Sorry to be the bearer of bad news.”
“A week in bacta and you’ll be good as new,” Obi-Wan said.
Fa’ale sighed. “I won’t hold it against you. You did your best to get
me killed.” She gazed around. “Shouldn’t we be looking for cover?”
“They’re gone,” Anakin said.
Fa’ale shook her head. “After all these years, they finally—”
“I don’t think so,” Obi-Wan interrupted. “Someone more
important than Raith Sienar doesn’t want us to learn too much about
the star courier.”
“Then I had better tell you the rest—about Coruscant, I mean.”
Anakin raised her up. “Where did you deliver the ship?”
“To an old building in the industrial quarter, west of the Senate.
An area called The Works.”
Macrobinoculars pressed to his eyes, Mace studied the distant
building top to bottom, his gaze lingering on broken windows,
fissured ledges, canted balconies.
Central to a complex of half a dozen structures, the building was
more than three centuries old and going to ruin. For two-thirds of its
towering height it was an unadorned pillar with a rounded summit.
Support for the superstructure was afforded by a circular base,
reinforced by massive fins. Where the superstructure and the sloped
tops of the buttresses met, the building was fenestrated by windows
and antiquated gear-toothed docking gates. Many of the permaglass
panels and skylights were intact, but time and corrosion had done
their worst to the vertical hatches of the docking gates.
An investigation was under way to determine who had raised the
building, and who owned it—although, judging by its location and
prominence in The Works, it appeared to have served as corporate
headquarters for the factories and assembly plants that surrounded
it.
Mace and his team of Jedi, clone commandos, and Intelligence
analysts were a kilometer east of the structure, in an area of squat,
peak-roofed foundries, lorded over by smoke-belching permacrete
stacks. A more dispiriting place this side of Eriadu or Korriban would
have been hard to find, Mace told himself. Five hours spent here
could take five years off someone’s life. He could feel the damage
with every breath he took, every grimy surface he touched, every
vagrant-poisoned whiff that wafted his way. The acids in the air were
fast digesting everything, but not quickly enough for some.
Ambitious developers and urban renewalists had deliberately
introduced stone mites, duracrete slugs, and conduit worms to aid
and abet the caustic rain, without heed for the risk such vermin
posed to the nearby skyscrapers of the Senate District.
All in all, the perfect environment for a Sith Lord.
“Probe remotes are away, General Windu,” the ARC reported.
Mace trained the macrobinoculars on the flock of meter-wide
spherical droids that were maneuvering with purposeful unevenness
toward the building.
The Senate Intelligence Oversight Committee had attempted to
interdict the use of commandos and probe droids. In the minds of
the committee members, the idea that a Separatist stronghold could
exist on Coruscant was absurd. Fortunately—and admittedly
unexpectedly—Supreme Chancellor Palpatine had overruled the
committee, and Mace had been allowed to compile a dream team
that included not only ARC commander Valiant and Captain Dyne of
Republic Intelligence, but also Jedi Master Shaak Ti and several
capable Padawans.
“No indications that the probes are being targeted,” the ARC
updated.
Mace watched the black spheres begin to drift through shattered
windows and into areas of the superstructure where the building’s
façade had disintegrated and the bones of its plasteel skeleton were
exposed.
Moment of truth, he thought.
The Lethan pilot Obi-Wan and Anakin had searched out on Naos
III hadn’t been able to furnish anything more than a portrait of the
building to which she had delivered the star courier. A product of
Sienar Advanced Projects Laboratory, the craft had been modified—
perhaps unwittingly by Sienar itself—for the Sith who had killed QuiGon Jinn. The pilot had been provided with landing coordinates on
Coruscant, but, in fact, the courier itself had homed in on those. Paid
in full for her services, she had been taxied to Westport, and had left
for Ryloth soon after. The physical description of the courier’s
destination hadn’t given the Jedi much to go on. Though more
horizontal than most areas of equatorial Coruscant, The Works
sprawled for hundreds of square kilometers and contained
thousands of buildings that could have fit the description.
A break hadn’t come until Jedi Master Tholme had recalled a
detail from the debriefing of his former Padawan, Quinlan Vos. As
part of Vos’s covert mission to penetrate Count Dooku’s inner circle
of dark side apprentices, Vos had been tasked with assassinating a
duplicitous Senator, named Viento. Immediately following the
assassination—and a brutal duel with Master K’Kruhk—Vos had met
briefly with Dooku in The Works. There, Dooku had informed his
would-be protégé that Vos had been incorrect in assuming that
Viento was a Sith, and had again denied that he himself answered to
any Master.
At the time, no one had paid much attention to Vos’s remarks,
because Vos seemed to have been seduced by the dark side and lost
to the Order. The rendezvous was considered to have been only that:
an out-of-the-way meeting place. Of greater interest to the Jedi and
Republic Intelligence was the fact that Dooku had managed to arrive
at and depart Coruscant without detection.
“Holoimages of the interior coming in,” Valiant said.
Mace lowered the macrobinoculars and shifted his gaze to the field
holoprojector. Dazzled by diagonal lines of static, the 3-D images
were of forlorn rooms, stretches of dark corridor, vast empty spaces.
“The building appears to be completely abandoned, General. No
signs of droids or living beings—other than varieties common to
similar manufacturing slums.”
“Abandoned, perhaps, but not forgotten,” Captain Dyne said from
behind Valiant. “The building’s live. It has power and illumination.”
“Doesn’t mean much,” Mace said. “Many structures in this district
were self-powered, often by dangerous, highly unstable fuels.” He
gestured broadly. “They’re still belching smoke.”
Dyne nodded. “But this one shows periodic and recent use of
power.”
Mace turned to Valiant. “All right, Commander. Give the goahead.”
From behind and to both sides of the observation post, LAATs
lifted off into the smoke-filled sky, doorway gunners traversing their
repeating blasters and commandos standing ready to deploy from
the gunship’s troop bay. Elsewhere, AT-TEs and other mobile
artillery vehicles began to lumber across the debris-filled urbanscape
toward the target.
Valiant turned to the troopers who made up Aurek Team.
“The building is a free-strike zone. You are to consider anyone we
find inside to be hostile.” He slammed a fresh power pack into his
short-stocked blaster. “Troopers: find, fix, finish!”
No matter how often he heard it, the grunting, communal response
to the ARC’s rallying cry continued to disturb Mace on some level.
Although it was probably no different from what the clone troopers
heard when the Jedi said to one another, May the Force be with you.
He swung and waved a signal to Shaak Ti.
“I’ll ride with Aurek Team. You have Bacta.”
As beautiful as a flower, as deadly as a viper, Shaak Ti was the Jedi
Master one wanted by one’s side in chaotic circumstances. Graced
with the ability to move quickly through crowds or tight spots, she
was often the first to wade into close-quarter engagements, her
striped montrals and lengthy head-tail alert to distances, her blue
lightsaber quick to find its mark. She had proved instrumental in the
defense of Kamino and Brentaal IV, and Mace was glad to have her
with him now.
Aurek Team’s gunship was already packed with commandos and
Padawans by the time he clambered inside. Lifting off, the LAAT/i
aimed straight for the summit of the building. The strategy was to
work from the top down, in the hope of flushing hostiles out through
the lowest levels, where infantry and artillery units were already
taking up firing positions around the buttressed base. The entire area
was undermined with tunnels that had been used for transporting
workers, droids, and materials. While it wasn’t possible to monitor
every entrance and egress, many of the principal tunnels that opened
on the building’s sub-basements had been outfitted with sensors
capable of detecting droids or flesh-and-bloods.
No functioning docking bay large enough to accommodate a
gunship had been discovered. The commandos had advocated
blowing a gaping hole in the side of the superstructure, but engineers
feared that an explosion of the strength required could very well
collapse the entire structure. Instead the LAAT/i carried the team to
the largest of the blown-out windows below the summit, and hovered
there while everyone was inserted.
Leaping the gap, Mace activated his lightsaber and instructed the
Padawans to follow suit.
Weapons raised to their chests, the commandos spread out in fireand-maneuver squads and began to move deeper into the building,
checking out each room and alcove before declaring any level secure.
Mace’s blade glowed amethyst in the gloom. Stretching out with the
Force, he could feel the presence of the dark side. The only
explanation for Quinlan Vos not having felt it was that he, too, had
gone dark.
Yoda had warned Mace that the dark side might cloud his mind to
certain rooms and passageways—places that the Sith Lords didn’t
want Mace to discover—but he felt alert in all ways. Besides, that was
what the commandos were for.
They worked their way down and down, without encountering
resistance or finding anything of interest.
“Quiet as a tomb, General,” Valiant said when the top ten levels
had been secured.
Mace studied the 3-D map displayed by the ARC’s wrist gauntlet
projector.
“Inform Bacta Team that we will rally with them in designated
sector three.”
Valiant was about to speak when his comlink toned.
“Commander, this is Bacta Team leader,” a voice said. “We have a
functioning docking gate on level six that shows evidence of recent
use. And, sir, wait until you get a look at the landing zone.”
The floor that served as a landing area was scarcely large enough
for a gunship, but it gleamed as if scrubbed and polished daily by
custodial droids. Parallel to the long sides of the rectangle were
banks of slender blue illuminators.
“Everyone stay exactly where you are,” Captain Dyne said when
Mace and the rest of Aurek Team appeared at the mouth of a
corridor that intersected the docking bay at its lengthwise
centerpoint.
Deployed in a circle formation, Shaak Ti and the Padawans who
had entered with Bacta were clustered in the middle of the floor.
Thirty meters to Mace’s right, Dyne and two other Intelligence
officers were interpreting the data being sent to them by several
probe droids meandering with design throughout the room, some of
them misting the floor with a highly volatile substance. The welllubricated vertical docking gate was open, revealing an oval of
blackened sky.
“A Huppla Pasa Tisc sloop occupied this docking bay less than two
standard weeks ago,” Dyne said, loud enough for everyone to hear.
“The arrangement of its landing gear and aft boarding ramp match
the footprint of the Punworcca 116–class that launched from
Geonosis during the battle there.”
“Dooku’s ship,” Mace said.
“A reasonable supposition, Master Windu,” Dyne said loudly. After
several moments of gazing at the monitor screens of his equipment
and conferring with his associates, he added: “The floor reveals
traces of two beings who were here contemporaneous with the
sloop.”
Green light from one of the drifting droids played across the alloy
floor panels. Dyne directed the droid to concentrate on certain areas,
and studied the data again.
“The first being exited the sloop and walked to this point.” He
indicated an area close to the open gate. “Taking into consideration
trace impressions and the length of the being’s stride, I would hazard
that being one stands one hundred and ninety-five centimeters in
height, and was wearing boots.”
It was Dooku! Mace thought.
The droid focused its lights on another area, and Dyne continued.
“Here, being one met with being two, lighter in weight, perhaps
shorter in stature, and wearing—” Dyne consulted what Mace
assumed to be some sort of database. “—what can best be described
as soft-soled footwear or slippers. This unknown being came from
the direction of the building’s east turbolifts, and
accompanied … Dooku—for all intents and purposes—to a balconied
niche above the docking gate. Following the same route, the pair
returned to the docking bay and separated: Dooku to his ship; our
unknown quarry, presumably to the turbolifts.”
Tasking the probe droids to track the prints of the second being,
Dyne began to trail them, waving for Mace, Shaak Ti, and the
commandos to follow.
“Single file behind me,” Dyne cautioned. “No straying out of line.”
Mace and Shaak Ti took the point, with the Padawans and
commandos strung out behind. By the time the two Jedi Masters
caught up with Dyne and his droids, the Intelligence analyst was
standing at the door to a dated turbolift.
“Verified,” Dyne said, grinning in self-satisfaction. “Being two used
the turbolift.”
Turning to the wall, he pressed his gloved right hand to the call
stud. When the summoned car appeared, he affixed a scanner to the
control pad inside.
“The car’s memory tells us that it arrived from sub-basement two.
If we fail to discover evidence of our unknown quarry there, we’ll
have to work our way back up, one level at a time, until we do.”
The turbolift was just roomy enough for Dyne, his associates,
Mace, Shaak Ti, the two team commanders, and two probe droids.
Comlinking troopers outside the building, Valiant ordered them to
make their way to sub-basement two, but forewarned them to stay
clear of the east turbolift and any nearby corridors or tunnels.
The probe droids were first to exit the car when it stopped, misting
the corridor in both directions. One of the droids hadn’t gone five
meters before it stopped in midflight and began playing its detection
lights across the floor.
“Footprints,” Dyne said with enthusiasm. “We’re still on track.”
Stepping carefully from the car, he followed the probe droids to the
entrance of a wide tunnel. After the droids had disappeared inside
and returned, Dyne swung to Mace, who was waiting with everyone
else at the base of the turbolift.
“The prints end here. From this point on the unknown used a
vehicle—certainly a repulsorlift of some sort, although the droids
aren’t detecting any phantom emissions.”
Mace and Shaak Ti joined Dyne and his teammates at the tunnel
entrance.
Shaak Ti peered into the darkness. “Where does it lead?”
Dyne consulted a holomap. “If we can trust a map that’s older than
any of us, it connects to tunnels all over The Works—to adjacent
buildings, to the foundries, to a onetime landing field … There must
be a hundred branches.”
“Forget the branches,” Mace said. “What’s at the far end of this
one?”
Dyne called up a series of displays and studied them in silence. At
last, he said: “The principal tunnel leads all the way to the western
limit of the Senate District.”
Mace walked two meters into the darkness, and ran his hand down
the tunnel’s tiled wall.
Hundreds of Senators are now under the influence of a Sith Lord
called Darth Sidious, Dooku had told Obi-Wan on Geonosis.
Turning to face Shaak Ti and the clone commanders, Mace said:
“We’re going to need more troops.”
In the Supreme Chancellor’s Senate Office Building chambers, Yoda
sat staring across the desk at Palpatine, silhouetted against the long
window that overlooked western Coruscant. How many Supreme
Chancellors had he sat with in this office and others like it? he asked
himself. Half a hundred now. But why with this one did discussion so
often skirt the edge of confrontation—especially when the topic
turned to the Force. As ineffectual a leader as he was, Finis Valorum
had tried to comport himself as if he placed the Force above all. With
Palpatine, the Force was not placed last. It wasn’t even on the
agenda.
“I understand your concerns entirely, Master Yoda,” he was saying.
“More important, I am sympathetic to them. But the Outer Rim
sieges must continue. Despite what you may think—and
notwithstanding the extraordinary powers the Senate has deemed fit
to bestow on me these past five years—I am one voice in a welter. At
long last the Senate is galvanized to end this destructive conflict, and
it will not permit me to stand in the way.”
“Exhort me, you need not, Supreme Chancellor,” Yoda said.
Palpatine smiled dryly. “I apologize if I sounded sermonizing.”
“Galvanized by your State of the Republic address, the Senate
was.”
“My address was a reflection of the spirit of the times, Master
Yoda. What’s more, I spoke from my heart.”
“Doubt you, I do not. But too soon, your encouragements came.
Celebrates imminent victory, Coruscant does, when far from ended
the war is.”
Palpatine’s frown contained a hint of warning, of malice. “After
three years of fear, Coruscant craves relief.”
“Agree with you, I do. But how from the seizure of Outer Rim
worlds is relief sustained? Too many new fronts, the Senate urges us
to open. Too dispersed the Jedi are, to serve effectively. A reasonable
strategy, we lack.”
“My military advisers would not be pleased to hear you categorize
their strategy as irrational.”
“Need to hear it, they do. Say it to them, I will.”
Palpatine paused to consider the remark, then leveled a hard gaze.
“Master Yoda, forgive my frankness, but if the Jedi are indeed too
widely scattered to coordinate the sieges, then the burden will have
to fall to my naval commanders.”
Yoda compressed his lips and shook his head. “Answer foremost to
the Jedi, our troopers do. Forged an alliance with them, we have.
Forged in fire, this fidelity has been.”
Palpatine sat upright, as if struck. “I’m certain I misconstrue your
meaning, but you almost make it sound as if our army was created
for the Jedi.”
“Not true,” Yoda snapped. “For the Republic, and none other.”
Appeased, Palpatine said: “Then perhaps the clones can be trained
to respond to others, as well as they respond to the Jedi.”
Yoda made a glum face. “Trained the troopers can be. But wrong
this strategy remains.”
“May I ask that you think back to Geonosis? Do you not agree that
we erred then by not pursuing the Separatists?”
“Unprepared, we were. New, the army was.”
“Granted. But we are prepared now. We have the Confederacy on
the run from the inner systems, and I will not allow us to repeat the
mistake we made at Geonosis.”
“No, a different mistake we make now.”
Palpatine interlocked his fingers. “This is the wisdom of the
Council?”
“It is.”
“Then you will challenge the Senate’s decision?”
Yoda shook his head. “Sworn by oath to uphold you, we are.”
Palpatine spread his hands. “That does not instill confidence,
Master Yoda. If it’s nothing more than an oath, then you are dutybound to reconsider.”
“Reconsidered we have, Supreme Chancellor.”
“You imply no threat, I trust.”
“No threat.”
Palpatine forced a fatigued exhale. “As I’ve told you on many
occasions, I do not have the luxury of seeing this world through the
Force. I see only the real world.”
“No problem there would be, if the ‘real world,’ all there was.”
“Unfortunately, we who are not attuned to the Force have that on
Jedi authority only.”
Yoda wagged his forefinger at Palpatine. “To end this war, more
we will have to do than defeat Grievous and his army of war
machines. More we will have to do than seize remote worlds.”
“These Sith to whom you keep referring.” Palpatine fell silent in
thought, then said: “When you were believed killed at Ithor, Master
Windu said as much to me.”
“More attentive to his concerns, were you?”
Palpatine regarded him. “A skilled duelist you are.”
“When need be, Supreme Chancellor.”
“You never fully described what went on between you and Count
Dooku on Vjun. Was he at all inclined to return to the Order—to the
side of the Republic?”
Yoda allowed his sadness to show. “From the dark path, no
returning there is. Forever, the direction of your life it dominates.”
“That may make Dooku difficult to rehabilitate.”
Yoda raised his gaze. “Captured, he will never be. Die fighting, he
will.”
“This Darth Sidious, as well—should Dooku be found and killed?”
Yoda’s eyes fidgeted. “Difficult to say. Deprived of an apprentice,
Sidious may withdraw—to preserve the Sith.”
“One person is all that’s required to preserve the Sith traditions?”
“Traditions they are not. The dark side, it is.”
“Then what if you should find Sidious first, and kill him? Would
Dooku’s power increase?”
“Only Dooku’s determination. Different it will be, because a Sith
late he has become.” Yoda shook his head. “Hard to know if Dooku a
true Sith is, or simply with the power of the dark side infatuated.”
“And General Grievous?”
Yoda made a gesture of dismissal. “More machine than alive,
Grievous is—though more dangerous for it. But without Dooku’s or
Sidious’s leadership, collapse the Separatists will. Bound together by
the Sith they are. Mortared by the dark side of the Force.”
Palpatine leaned forward with interest. “Then the Council is of the
opinion that we must kill the leadership—that this war is more a
battle within the Force?”
“United we are in that matter.”
“You are persuasive, Master Yoda. You have my word that I will
bear this conversation in mind when I meet with the Senate to
discuss our campaigns.”
“Relieved, I am, Supreme Chancellor.”
Palpatine reclined in his chair. “Tell me, how goes the hunt for
Darth Sidious?”
Yoda leaned forward for emphasis. “Coming closer to him, are we.”
In a forward hold of Grievous’s flagship, Dooku watched the cyborg
general duel with his elite MagnaGuards, three of his trophy
lightsabers in constant motion, parrying thrusts of the guards’ pulseweaponed staffs, slicing the recycled air a hairbreadth from the
expressionless faces of his opponents, incapacitating arm and leg
servos when he could. Grievous was a force to be reckoned with, to
be sure, but Dooku deplored his habit of collecting lightsabers. It had
merely bothered him that Ventress and lesser combatants such as
the bounty hunter Aurra Sing had adopted the foul practice.
Grievous’s habit struck Dooku as the worst kind of profanation. Even
so, he was not about to discourage the practice. The more Jedi that
could be dispatched, the better.
The only aspect of Grievous’s technique that vexed him more was
the general’s penchant for using four blades. Two was bad enough—
in the form they had been used by Darth Maul, or in Anakin
Skywalker’s sad attempt to employ the technique on Geonosis.
But three?
What was to become of elegance and gallantry if a duelist couldn’t
make do with one blade?
Well, what had become of elegance and gallantry, in any case?
Grievous was fast, and so were his IG 100-series sparring partners.
They had the advantage of size and brute strength. They executed
moves almost faster than the human eye could follow. Their thrusts
and lunges demonstrated a singular lack of hesitancy. Once
committed to a maneuver, they never faltered. They never stopped to
recalculate their actions. Their weapons went exactly where they
meant them to go. And they always aimed for points beyond their
opponents in order to slice clear through.
Dooku had taught Grievous well, and Grievous had taught his elite
well. Coupled with Dooku’s coaching, their programming in the
seven classic forms of lightsaber dueling—in the Jedi arts—made
them lethal opponents. But they were not invincible, not even
Grievous, because they could be confused by unpredictability, and
they had no understanding of finesse. A player of dejarik could
memorize all the classic openings and countermoves, and still not be
a master of the game. Defeat often came at the hands of less
experienced players who knew nothing about the traditional
strategies. A professional fighter, a combat artist, could be defeated
by a cantina brawler who knew nothing about form but everything
about ending a conflict quickly, without a thought to winning
gracefully or elegantly.
Enslavement to form opened one to defeat by the unforeseen.
This was often the failing of trained duelists, and it would be the
failing of the Jedi Order.
Given that elegance, gallantry, and enchantment were gone from
the galaxy, it was only fitting that the Order’s days were numbered;
that the fire that had been the Jedi was guttering and dying out. As
with the corrupt Republic itself, the Order’s time had come. The
noble Jedi, bound to the Force, sworn to uphold peace and justice,
were seldom seen as heroes or saviors any longer, but more often as
bullies or mobsters.
Still, it was sad that it had fallen to Dooku to help usher them out.
The conversation he had had with Yoda on dreary Vjun was never
far from his thoughts these days. For all his flair with words, all his
Force-given personal power, Yoda was nothing more than an old
one, unwilling to embrace anything new, indisposed to see any way
but his own. Yet how terrible not simply to fade away but to expire in
full knowledge that the galaxy had tipped inexorably and at long last
to the dark side, to the Sith, and might remain so for as long as the
Jedi themselves had ruled.
The unforeseen …
Grievous and his guards were dancing. Going through their
programmed motions.
An Ataro attack answered by Shii-Cho; Soresu answered by Lusma …
Dooku couldn’t suffer another moment of it.
“No, no, stop, stop,” he yelled, coming to his feet and striding to
the middle of the training circle, his arms extended to both sides.
When he was certain that he had their attention, he swung to
Grievous. “Power moves served you well on Hypori against Jedi such
as Daakman Barrek and Tarr Seir. But I pity you should you have to
face off against any of the Council Masters.” He called into hand his
courtly, curve-handled lightsaber and drew a rapid X in the air—a
Makashi flourish. “Do I need to demonstrate what responses you can
expect from Cin Drallig or Obi-Wan Kenobi? From Mace Windu or,
stars help you, Yoda?”
He flicked his blade quickly, ridding two of the guards of their
staffs, then placing the glowing tip a millimeter from Grievous’s
death-helmeted visage. “Finesse. Artfulness. Economy. Otherwise,
my friend, I fear that you will end up beyond the repair of even the
Geonosians. Do you take my meaning?”
His vertically slit eyes unfathomable, Grievous nodded.
“I take your meaning, my lord.”
Dooku withdrew his blade. “Again, then. With some measure of
polish, if I’m not asking for too much.”
Dooku seated himself and watched them go at it.
Hopeless, he thought.
But he knew that he was partly to blame. He had made the same
mistake with Grievous that he had made with Ventress, by allowing
her to fill herself with hate, as if hate could substitute for dispassion.
Even the most hateful could be defeated. Even the most angry. There
should be no emotion in killing, no self, only the act. When he should
have been helping Ventress rid herself of self, he had instead
permitted her to grow impassioned. Sidious had once confessed that
he had erred similarly in his training of Darth Maul. Ventress and
Maul had been driven by a desire to excel—to be the best—instead of
merely allowing themselves to be pure instruments of the dark side.
The Jedi knew this about the Force: that the best of them were
nothing more than instruments.
Dooku grew troubled.
Was Sidious thinking the same of him now? Thinking: This is
where I failed poor Dooku. Pitiful creature …
It was entirely possible, considering how wrong things had gone
on Naos III. Standard days earlier, Dooku had sent Sidious a coded
transmission that was as much apology as explanation, and had yet
to hear from him.
He watched Grievous disarm two of the MagnaGuards.
In fact, Grievous was all instrument.
And Dooku. What was Count Dooku of Serenno?
He glanced at the hold’s holoprojector table a moment before a
blue holoimage of Sidious appeared above it.
My time is at hand, he told himself as he centered himself proudly
on the transmission grid, Grievous behind him, down on one knee,
with head lowered.
“My lord,” he said, bowing slightly at the waist. “I’ve been waiting.”
“There have been matters that warranted my close attention, Lord
Tyranus.”
“Born, no doubt, of my failure at Naos Three. The ones I sent had
every opportunity to kill Kenobi, Skywalker, and the Twi’lek pilot.
Instead, they decided to attempt their capture, to extract additional
funds from me, as well as to bolster their reputations.”
Sidious was dismissive. “Such is the way of bounty hunters. I
should have foreseen this.”
Dooku blinked. Was this an admission of failure on Sidious’s part?
Was Sidious’s upper lip twitching, or was it nothing more than noise
in the transmission?
“The Force is strong in Skywalker,” Sidious went on.
“Yes, my lord. Very strong. Next time I will deal with the Jedi
personally.”
“Yes, that time is drawing near, Lord Tyranus. But first we need to
provide the Jedi with something that distracts them from hunting
me.”
Sidious’s upper lip was definitely twitching. Was this worry?
Worry from someone fond of saying that things were going precisely
as planned?
“What has happened, my lord?”
“The Twi’lek’s information led them to our rendezvous on
Coruscant,” Sidious said in a scurrilous voice.
Dooku was stunned. “Is there a greater danger?”
“They think they have my scent, Lord Tyranus, and perhaps they
do.”
“Can you leave Coruscant, my lord?”
From parsecs distant, Sidious stared at him. “Leave Coruscant?”
“For a time, my lord. Surely we can find some way.”
Sidious fell silent for a long moment, then said: “Perhaps, Lord
Tyranus. Perhaps.”
“If not, then I will come to you.”
Sidious shook his head. “That won’t be necessary. I told you that
their search for me would benefit us before too long, and thanks to
you I begin to see a way.”
“What is thy bidding, Master?” Grievous asked from behind
Dooku.
Sidious turned slightly toward Grievous, but continued to speak to
Dooku. “The Jedi have divided their forces. We must do the same. I
will deal with the ones on Coruscant. I need you to deal with the
rest.”
“My fleet stands ready, Master,” Grievous said, still without raising
his gaze from the grid.
“The Republic is monitoring you?” Sidious asked the general.
“Yes, Master.”
“Can you divide the fleet—judiciously?”
“It can be done, Master.”
“Good, good. Then move however many ships are needed to crush
and occupy Tythe.”
Again Dooku was stunned. So, too, was Grievous.
“Is that wise, Master,” the general asked carefully, “after what
happened at Belderone?”
Sidious adopted a faint grin. “More than wise, General. Inspired.”
“But Tythe, my lord,” Dooku said with equal care. “Less a world
than a corpse.”
“It has some strategic value, does it not, General?”
“As a jump point, Master. But a dubious prize, regardless, when far
better targets exist.”
“It may prove costly to us, my lord. The Republic will almost
certainly flatten it,” Dooku said.
“Not if the Jedi are convinced that it must be retaken rather than
destroyed.”
Confusion wrinkled Dooku’s forehead. “How will we convince
them?”
“We won’t have to, Lord Tyranus. Their own investigations will
lead them to that conclusion. Moreover, Kenobi and Skywalker will
oversee the counterattack.”
“Indeed, my lord?”
“They will not pass up an opportunity to capture Count Dooku.”
Dooku saw Grievous’s armorplast head elevate in surprise. “What
leads you to believe that the Republic will not simply flatten me at
this point?”
“The Jedi are predictable, Lord Tyranus. I needn’t tell you this.
Look what they risked on Cato Neimoidia in an effort to capture
Viceroy Gunray. They are obsessed with bringing their enemies to
justice, instead of merely administering justice themselves.”
“It is their way.”
“Then you don’t mind serving as bait to lure them there?”
Dooku inclined his head. “As ever, I am at your disposal, my lord.”
Sidious grinned once more. “Hold Kenobi and Skywalker, Lord
Tyranus. Entertain them. Play to their weakness. Demonstrate your
mastery, as you have on previous occasions.”
Grievous made a meaningful sound. “I will do the same with their
warships, Master.”
“No, General,” Sidious cut in. “I have something else in mind for
you and the rest of the fleet. But tell me, can you tuck your charges
somewhere safe for the time being?”
“The planet Utapau comes to mind, Lord Sidious.”
“I will leave that to you.”
“And when I have seen to that, Master?”
“General, I’m certain you recall the plans we discussed some time
ago, regarding the final stage of the war.”
“Regarding Coruscant.”
“Regarding Coruscant, yes.” Sidious paused, then said: “We must
accelerate those plans. Prepare, General, for what will be your finest
hour.”
Fa’ale is doing fine,” Anakin said as he approached Obi-Wan
jauntily. “Two more days of bacta and she’ll be on her feet. She says
she’s through with Naos Three, though. She might even remain here
on Belderone.”
Obi-Wan looked at him askance. “Your relationship with females is
an interesting one. The more jeopardy they’re in, the more you worry
about them. And the more you worry about them, the more they
worry about you.”
Anakin frowned. “You’re basing this on, what, exactly?”
Obi-Wan looked away. “HoloNet gossip.”
Anakin stepped deliberately into Obi-Wan’s gaze. “Something’s
wrong. What is it?”
Obi-Wan sighed. “We won’t be returning to Coruscant.”
They were in a visitors’ lounge in the largest of the MedStars
orbiting Belderone. For four standard days they had been awaiting
instructions from the Jedi Council and visiting the medical ward to
check on Fa’ale’s progress, and the strain of so much inactivity was
beginning to show.
Anakin was staring dumbfounded at Obi-Wan.
“Hear me out before you go critical. Mace and Shaak Ti were able
to locate the building in The Works. Not surprisingly, it turns out to
have been the same one where Quinlan Vos met with Dooku last
year. Once inside, Mace’s team discovered more than we could have
even hoped for—evidence of a more recent visit by Dooku, and of the
person he apparently went to Coruscant to see.”
“Sidious?”
“Possibly. Even if it wasn’t, it’s likely that Dooku has other
confederates on Coruscant, and tracking them down could eventually
lead us to Sidious. Other evidence has come to light, as well.
Intelligence discovered that the building belonged to a corporation
called LiMerge Power, which was believed to have been involved in
the manufacture and distribution of prohibited weapons during Finis
Valorum’s term as Supreme Chancellor. It was rumored at the time
that LiMerge was responsible for funding acts of piracy directed
against Trade Federation vessels in the Outer Rim. And it was those
acts of piracy that led ultimately to the Trade Federation being
granted the right to defend their vessels with battle droids.”
“Are you telling me that LiMerge might have been in league with
the Sith?”
“Why not? At Naboo, the Trade Federation was in league with
Sidious. The entire Confederacy is in league with him now.”
Anakin shrugged impatiently. “I still don’t understand how this
keeps us from returning to Coruscant.”
“I’ve just been informed that the Separatists have attacked a
Republic garrison base on Tythe, and occupied the planet.”
“Who cares? I mean, I’m sorry for any troopers we lost, but Tythe
is a wasteland.”
“Exactly,” Obi-Wan said. “But before it became a wasteland, it was
headquarters for LiMerge Power.”
Anakin mulled it over for a moment. “Another attempt by Sidious
to erase the trail we’ve been following?”
Obi-Wan ran his hand over his mouth. “The Council was able to
convince Palpatine of the need to retake Tythe, and he has
authorized a full battle group to divert there. It seems he is finally
willing to follow Master Yoda’s advice about concentrating on
dismantling the Confederacy leadership.”
“Grievous is on Tythe?”
Obi-Wan grinned. “Better: Dooku is there.”
Anakin turned his back to Obi-Wan. His face was flushed when he
finally swung around. “Not good enough.”
Obi-Wan blinked. “Not good enough?”
“The search for Sidious began with us. We discovered the first
clues. If he’s thought to be on Coruscant, then we’re the ones who
should be there to capture him.”
“Anakin, Mace and Shaak Ti are more than capable of seeing to
that—if Sidious is even there.”
Anakin was shaking his head. “Not as easily as … we could. Sidious
is a Sith Lord!”
Obi-Wan took a moment to respond. “The way I remember it, we
didn’t fare all that well against Dooku.”
“All that’s changed!” Anakin said, becoming angrier as he spoke.
“I’m stronger than I was. You’re stronger. Together, we can defeat
any Sith.”
“Anakin, is this really about capturing Sidious?”
“Of course it is. We deserve the honor.”
“Honor? Since when did this war become a contest for first place?
If you’re thinking that the capture of Sidious will earn you a place on
the Council—”
“I don’t care about the Council! I’m telling you we need to return
to Coruscant. People are counting us.”
“What people?”
“The … people of Coruscant.”
Obi-Wan inhaled slowly. “Why don’t I believe you?”
“I don’t know, Master? Suppose you tell me?”
Obi-Wan narrowed his eyes. “Don’t turn this into a game. There’s
something else at work here. Have you had a vision I should know
about?”
Anakin started to reply, bit back whatever it was he had in mind to
say, and began again. “The truth is … I want to be home. We’ve been
out here longer than anyone—trooper or Jedi.”
“That’s what you get for being so good at what you do,” Obi-Wan
said, hoping to lighten the mood.
“I’m tired of it, Master. I want to be home.”
Obi-Wan studied him. “You miss the Temple so much? The food?
The lights of Coruscant?”
“Yes.”
“Yes, to what?”
“All of it.”
“Then your protests have nothing to do with capturing Sidious.”
“No. They do.”
“Well, which is it—home or Sidious?”
“Why can’t it be both?”
Obi-Wan fell silent, as if struck by a sudden suspicion. “Anakin, is
it Padmé?”
Anakin rolled his eyes. “Here you go again.”
“Well, is it?”
Anakin compressed his lips, then said, “I won’t lie to you and say
that I don’t miss her.”
Obi-Wan frowned sympathetically. “You can’t afford to miss her in
that way.”
“And exactly why is that, Master?”
“Because you cannot be married to both.”
“Who said anything about marriage? She’s a friend. I miss her as a
friend!”
“You would forgo your destiny for Padmé?”
Anakin’s brows beetled in anger. “I never claimed to be the Chosen
One. That was Qui-Gon. Even the Council doesn’t believe it anymore,
so why should you?”
“Because I think you believe it,” Obi-Wan said calmly. “I think you
know in your heart that you’re meant for something extraordinary.”
“And you, Master. What does your heart tell you you’re meant
for?”
“Infinite sadness,” Obi-Wan said, even while smiling.
Anakin regarded him. “If you believe in destiny, then everything
we do becomes part of that destiny—whether we go to Tythe or we
return to Coruscant.”
“You may be right. I don’t have the answer. I wish I did.”
“Then where does that leave us?”
Obi-Wan rested his hands on Anakin’s shoulders. “Speak with
Palpatine. Maybe he’ll see something in this that I’ve missed.”
Fifty meters ahead of Mace in the tunnel, Shaak Ti held up her
hand, motioning for him to stop. Angling his purple blade to the
floor, Mace turned to relay the signal to the commandos behind him.
Shaak Ti’s whisper reached him through the Force: Movement
ahead.
She gestured to the mouth of an intersecting tunnel just beyond
where she stood, her profile limned blue by the glow of her raised
lightsaber. Faint light spilled from the opening, as if someone with a
handheld luma was approaching on foot.
Mace waved a signal to Commander Valiant, whose team moved
forward stealthily, hugging the walls, their T-visor helmets allowing
them to see in the dark.
Normally the probe droids would have the point, playing their
lights and sensors across the dusty floor and tiled walls, sending data
to Dyne and his team of analysts. Mace and Shaak Ti would ride in
separate speeders behind the agents, intermingled with those of the
commandos. Occasionally, however, the Jedi would assume the lead
on foot for a couple of kilometers, usually in response to some
anomaly discovered by the droids. Ventilation, such as it was, came
courtesy of ancient blowers that did little more than drag in the sooty
air from above, and illumination was provided by what the team
brought with them.
They were deep below an area of The Works called the Grungeon
Block. Encompassing twenty square kilometers, the block had
originally been a production center for Serv-O-Droid, Huvicko, and
Nebula Manufacturing, but it had fallen on hard times when its three
principal clients had declared bankruptcy. Unable to attract new
businesses, the developers who owned the Grungeon had allowed
stratts and other vermin to overrun the stamping plants, and cashed
out.
In the days since the raid, Mace’s team had searched nearly every
nook and cranny of the confusion of tunnels and shafts that
undermined the Grungeon and similar assembly areas. Ten
kilometers into the tunnel that led to the LiMerge building’s subbasement, a shaft had been found, leading to a deeper, older tunnel
that also ran east toward the Senate District. In appearance the
parallel tunnels were similar, save for the fact that the floor of the
older one hosted an ancient mag-lev rail. The probe droids had
discovered places along the rail where the accumulated decades of
dust and debris had been blown away by the rapid passage of a
repulsorlift vehicle of some sort. With no other clues to go on, the
team had made the mag-lev tunnel the focus of the investigation.
Still, Mace felt that the team was on the right track.
An extensive search of the LiMerge building had revealed the
remains of several Trang Robotics Duelist Elite droids that had been
reduced to durasteel pieces by a lightsaber. Only Sidious, Dooku, or
Sidious’s previous apprentice could have performed the
amputations.
And there was more.
Shortly before Dooku had left the Jedi Order to return to his native
Serenno—during the period when he had taken the title Count and
had first gone public with his discontents about the Republic—he had
been known to frequent a tavern called the Golden Cuff, which had
been a watering hole for Senators, lobbyists, and aides. Analysts at
the Temple were going through files of security cam holoimages
thirteen years old, hoping to find images of Dooku and anyone he
may have met with repeatedly.
Thus far, no images of Dooku had surfaced in the recordings that
had survived. Even if images of Dooku’s tavern mates did surface, the
Jedi had no means of identifying any of them as Darth Sidious, but
the images could provide an additional starting point for further
investigation.
By now Mace could hear movement and soft voices ahead.
Hardly a good tactic for hostiles intent on springing an ambush,
but one never knew. He stretched out with his feelings, alert for
diversions or clues he might have overlooked—obscured by the dark
side, or owing to his own neglect.
Standing nearby, Valiant looked to Mace for the go signal.
When Mace nodded, Valiant said: “Light it up!”
Weapons raised, gas and fragmentation grenades enabled, the
commandos sprinted into the intersecting tunnel, firing tracer bolts
into the gloom.
Tight on their heels, Mace heard Valiant yell: “Down on the floor!
Don’t move! I said, don’t move!”
More fire erupted, then several commando voices were shouting:
“Stay still! Down on your faces! Hands up—all four of them!”
All four of them? Mace thought.
Edging through the commandos, he reached Valiant, whose
BlasTech was aimed at a cowering crowd of thirty or so four-armed
insectoid aliens, who were babbling in some language other than
Basic, or speaking it with an accent so thick as to make their words
unintelligible.
“Lower your weapons,” Mace told the commandos. “And someone
bring that interpreter droid forward!”
Mace’s command was relayed down the line, and a moment later a
highly polished silver protocol droid tottered into the tunnel,
muttering to itself.
“I don’t understand how I’ve gone from serving the Separatists to
serving the Republic. Did I undergo a partial memory wipe?”
“Consider yourself lucky,” one of the commandos said. “Now
you’re on the side of the good guys.”
“Good guys, bad guys … who can tell anymore? What’s more, you
won’t be so quick to say that should someone compel you to shift
loyalties at a moment’s notice.”
“Droid!” Mace shouted.
“I do have a name, sir.”
Mace glanced at Valiant.
“TeeCee something or other,” the ARC said.
“Fine,” Mace said, grabbing hold of TC-16 and pointing him in the
direction of the terrified aliens. “See if you can make sense of what
these folk are saying.”
The droid listened to the babbling, responded in kind, and turned
to face Mace. “They are Unets, General. Speaking their native
language, which is called Une.”
Mace regarded the huddled, shivering group. “What are they doing
down here?”
TC-16 listened, then said: “They say that they haven’t the slightest
idea where they are, General. They arrived on Coruscant in a
shipping container that was air-dropped at a decrepit landing
platform some twenty kilometers from here. The personage who was
to have guided them into the depths of the Uscru Sector stole all their
credits and abandoned them in The Works.”
“Undocumented refugees,” Valiant said.
Mace frowned. The tunnels beneath the Grungeon Block held
countless surprises.
“They almost got themselves killed.”
“Apparently that’s nothing new for them,” TC-16 said. “Their
planet fell to the Separatists, the freighter they originally took
passage on was attacked by pirates, several of them—”
“That’s enough,” Mace said. “Assure them that they’re not going to
be harmed, and that we’ll see to it they reach a refugee camp.” He
nodded to Valiant, who in turn told two of his troopers to carry out
Mace’s command.
“Talk about your corridor ghouls,” Dyne said, eyeing the aliens as
he approached Mace.
“Squatters, death stick runners, lost droids, now undocumented
refugees …”
“Next it’ll be Cthons,” Dyne said, referring to the flesh-eating
humanoids believed by many Coruscanti to inhabit the world’s
underground.
Shaak Ti joined them. “These corridors are highways for people
who want to enter central Coruscant illegally.”
Dyne sighed in disappointment. “Our chances for picking up
Sidious’s trail decrease with each person who passes.”
“How far are we from the Senate District?” Shaak Ti asked.
“Within a couple of kilometers,” Dyne said. “We might think about
going directly to the buildings LiMerge Power once owned in the city
core, and see if we can’t work our way toward The Works from
those.”
Mace considered the idea, then shook his head.
“Not yet.”
Mace waved everyone back into motion, then fell into step with
Shaak Ti.
“Wild gundark chase?”
She nodded. “Only because our quarry is aware that we’re closing
in on him. He failed to silence the ones Obi-Wan and Anakin
searched out, and by now he knows that we’ve discovered his and
Dooku’s den. It’s unlikely he will wait around for us to surprise him.”
“That’s true. But there’s much to gain from simply identifying him.
If not here, then by means of something Obi-Wan and Anakin
discover on Tythe.”
“Assuming there’s anything left after Dooku sterilizes the place.
From everything we’ve seen, Sidious and Dooku don’t make many
mistakes.”
They walked in silence for a long while. They were a kilometer
closer to the outlying areas of the Senate District when Dyne called to
them from behind.
Mace saw that the Intelligence analysts and commandos were
gathered some twenty meters away. He and Shaak Ti had been so
engrossed in their private thoughts that neither of them had noticed
the probe droids stopping to investigate something. Joining the
others, the Jedi watched the droids hover with clear purpose in front
of a large niche in the tunnel wall.
Dyne’s handheld sensor needed only a moment to discover a small
control panel that operated the niche’s sliding door.
The door concealed the entrance to a narrow, dimly lit corridor.
And all but hiding in plain sight: a repulsorlift speeder bike,
semicircular in design, with an arc of a concentric seat and a single
steering handle.
Mace and Shaak Ti traded astonished looks.
“How did we miss seeing this?” she asked.
Mace’s brow furrowed. “The answer is in the question.”
As big as life, Palpatine’s holoimage spoke from atop a projector
table in a private comlink lounge aboard the medical frigate. With
R2-D2 standing off to one side of the transmission grid, Anakin hung
on the Supreme Chancellor’s every word.
“Of course, the Council doesn’t understand,” Palpatine said.
“Surely you don’t find that surprising.”
“They reject every suggestion I make—on principle, I’m beginning
to think.”
“It’s obvious that you’re upset, Anakin, but you must be patient.
Your time will come.”
“When, sir?”
Palpatine smiled lightly. “I can’t see into the future, my boy.”
Anakin’s face contorted. “What if I told you that I could?”
“I would believe you,” Palpatine said without pause. “Tell me what
you see.”
“Coruscant.”
“Are we in danger?”
“I’m not certain. I just feel that I need to be there.”
Palpatine gazed away from the holocam. “I suppose I could invent
some pretext …” His gaze returned to Anakin. “But is that wise?”
“I’m not the wise one. Ask anybody.”
“What does Master Kenobi say?”
“He’s the one who suggested I contact you,” Anakin said sharply.
“Really? But what does he think you should do?”
Anakin blew out his breath. “Obi-Wan is under the illusion that I
can’t deny my destiny—no matter what I do.”
“Your former Master is wiser than you think, Anakin.”
“Yes, yes, and he is the only Jedi in a thousand years to have killed
a Sith.”
Palpatine spread his hands. “That alone has to count for
something. Though I’m at a loss to know precisely what.”
“Obi-Wan is wise. But he has no heart, sir. He sees everything in
terms of the Force.”
“If you want advice about the Force, you must look to him, because
I’m of no help.”
“That’s exactly what I don’t want. I live in the Force, but I also live
in the real world. I came from … the real world. Just as you said, I
had the advantage of a normal childhood. Well, sort of.”
Palpatine waited until he was certain Anakin was finished. “My
boy, I don’t know that it’s healthy to have a foot in each world. Soon
you may have to make a choice.”
Anakin nodded. “I’m ready.”
Palpatine smiled again. “But back to the matter at hand. It sounds
to me as if the recapture of Tythe could prove very important toward
ending the war. I don’t understand all of it. The Jedi Council is being
very secretive with me.”
Anakin fought the temptation to reveal everything about the
search for Darth Sidious. He glanced at R2-D2, as if expecting
commiseration, but the astromech only swiveled his dome, his
processor status indicator flashing from blue to red.
Finally Anakin said: “I don’t know what to do, sir.”
Palpatine adopted a sympathetic expression. “It’s decided. I shall
prevail upon the Council to order you back to the Core. No one needs
further proof of how intrepid you are, or how committed you are to
defeating our enemies.”
In time you will learn to trust your feelings; then you will be
invincible.
Palpatine’s advice to him, three years earlier.
“No,” Anakin said in a rush. “No. Thank you, sir, but … I’m needed
on Tythe. Dooku is there.”
I’m sorry, Padmé. I’m so, so sorry. I miss you so much—
“Yes,” Palpatine was saying. “Dooku is the key to everything just
now. Despite all our victories in the inner systems … Do you suspect
he and General Grievous may have some secret strategy?”
“If they do, Obi-Wan and I will defeat them before they can
implement it.”
“The Republic counts on it.”
“Safeguard Coruscant, sir. Safeguard everyone there.”
“I will, my boy. And rest assured that I will call on you if I need
you.”
Obi-Wan was in the MedStar’s docking bay, waiting for the shuttle
that would take him to the light cruiser Integrity. His arms were
folded across his chest, and his small rucksack was sitting on the
deck.
“Did you get through to him?” he asked as Anakin and R2-D2
approached.
“Well, I spoke to him.”
“That’s what I meant. And?”
Anakin averted his gaze. “We both decided that my place is here,
Master.” He sounded on the verge of tears.
Obi-Wan merely nodded. “For a moment I thought you were going
to leave it to me to retake Tythe.”
Anakin looked at him. “I know better than that.”
“You don’t think I’m capable?” Obi-Wan asked around a forming
grin.
“I know you’d be willing to die trying.”
“There is no trying—”
“Yes, there is,” Anakin cut him off. “And you’re living proof of it.”
Obi-Wan smiled, then glanced out the hold’s magcon
transparency. “The shuttle’s coming.”
Anakin’s eyes tracked the approaching light. “I’m as ready as I’ll
ever be.” He still wasn’t smiling.
Obi-Wan closed his hand around Anakin’s upper right arm.
“Anakin, let’s get Dooku and end this.”
Anakin swallowed and nodded. “If it’s meant to be, Master.”
With assistance from the probe droids, the discolored panels at the
end of the corridor unlocked and parted. Brown robe swirling behind
him and lightsaber in hand, Mace barreled through the doorway,
with Shaak Ti and the commandos close behind.
By rote the troopers spread out, quickly and efficiently, but also
unnecessarily.
“Surprise,” Shaak Ti said flatly. “Another corridor.”
“Another corridor closer,” Mace said, determined to put a good
spin on it.
The tunnel the team had followed from the hidden niche had led
them through a maze of twists, turns, forks, steep climbs, and
sudden drops. For stretches the dark corridor had been wide enough
to contain a speeder; then it grew so narrow that everyone had had to
edge through. For two kilometers, walls, ceiling, and floor were damp
from water that had trickled down through Coruscant’s layered
surface. There, the prints of their prey had disappeared, but the
probe droids had managed to pick up the trail farther along. Some of
the prints were so recent and well preserved that Dyne had been able
to calculate the human’s slipper size.
Human.
That much the droids had determined from smudged fingerprints
found on the speeder bike’s steering grip and cushioned seat. The
repulsorlift machine had also provided the droids with fibers, hairs,
and other detritus. Slowly, a portrait of Dooku’s unknown
confederate was being compiled.
His eyes fixed on the display screen of his data processor, Captain
Dyne ambled toward Mace and Shaak Ti.
“Master Jedi, our search is about to take us to a whole new level.”
Mace looked around the tunnel for signs of a concealed turbolift or
staircase.
“Up or down?” Shaak Ti asked, equally bewildered.
Dyne glanced up, blinking at her. “I didn’t mean ‘new level’ in the
literal sense.” He indicated the hovering probe droids, which were
eager to have the team follow them east. “If the prints lead us far
enough, we’re going to end up in the sub-basements of 500
Republica.”
Mace tracked the droids as they moved deeper into the corridor.
Five Hundred Republica: home to thousands of Coruscant’s
wealthiest Senators, celebrities, shipping magnates, and media
tycoons.
And one of them, very possibly a Sith Lord.
There was little the Confederacy or the Republic could add to the
damage LiMerge Power had inflicted on Tythe generations earlier.
From deep space, the surface—glimpsed through a pall of ash-gray
clouds—looked as if it had been licked by a flare from its primary, or
had had a brush with an enormous meteor. But Tythe’s scars owed to
none of that. The planet had been spared everything but LiMerge
itself, whose attempts to exploit Tythe’s abundant deposits of natural
plasma had invoked a cataclysm of global proportions.
The three drifting hulks that had been Republic cruisers might
have been caught up in the cataclysm but were, in fact, casualties of
the Separatist attack, which had come swiftly and without quarter.
Nimbused by what vacuum had drawn from their interiors, the
scorched and lanced trio lazed midway between opposing battle
groups of Separatist and Republic vessels.
“Just once I wish we could repay Dooku and Grievous in kind,”
Anakin said over the tactical net, as Red Squadron dropped from the
belly of the Integrity and rocketed toward Tythe.
“The fact that we don’t is what keeps us centered in the Force,”
Obi-Wan said.
Anakin grunted. “There’ll come a time when they’ll have to answer
to us personally, and it will be the Force that guides our blades.”
The two starfighters were flying abreast, almost wingtip-towingtip, astromech droids R2-D2 and R4-P17 in their respective
sockets. Tythe’s rubicund star was at their backs, and the ships that
made up the Separatist flotilla were strung menacingly above the
planet’s northern hemisphere.
With Tythe’s brood of moons clustered in a two-hundred-degree
arc, the Separatists had worked quickly to strew mines at several
hyperspace jump points, leaving the Republic ships with only a
narrow window in which to revert to realspace. Trade Federation,
Techno Union, and Commerce Guild capital ships occupied the apex
of that window, deployed from north pole to equator above Tythe’s
bright side, with wings of droid fighters boiling into space to the fore
of the arrayed vessels.
To minimize their profiles, the Republic ships—widely
dispositioned, like a group of predatory fish—had their triangular
bows pointed toward the planet. Red and other squadrons were
streaking forward, but well short of engaging the vanguard Vultures
and tri-fighters.
“Prepare to break hard to starboard,” Anakin said over the net to
the entire squadron. “Watch your countdown displays. On my mark,
ten seconds to break …”
Obi-Wan kept his eyes on the counter at the bottom of the
instrument panel’s tactical display screen. At the zero mark, he
yanked the yoke to one side and peeled away for clear space.
Behind the squadrons of V-wings and Jedi and ARC-170
starfighters, the Republic battle group broke to port, drenching the
distant Separatist ships with furious broadsides. Blinding payloads of
spun plasma hurtled through space, detonating against the shields of
the enemy vessels, atomizing any droid fighters unlucky enough to
have been caught in the way.
The Separatist ships absorbed the first hits without flinching.
Vessels that sustained damage began to drift to the rear. Then the
battle group responded with an equally ferocious barrage.
Turbolasers silenced, the Republic ships had already broken
formation. Small suns flared in their midst and blue energy capered
over their shielded hulls. No sooner did the barrage end than the
starfighter squadrons regrouped, accelerating in an effort to reach
the big enemy ships before their cannons or shields could repower.
The droid fighters swooped in to meet them halfway, and the tight
formations observed by both sides dissolved into dozens of separate
skirmishes. Those Republic starfighters that managed to steal
through the chaos drew into tight clusters and continued their fiery
advance. The rest became embroiled in swift attacks and evasive
maneuvers. Local space became a scrawl of scarlet lines and white
spirals, punctuated by expanding explosions. Craft of both camps
came apart, tumbling and spinning from the arena, wingless or in
flames.
“They’re being shot to pieces,” Red Seven said over the net.
“They know their job,” Anakin responded.
That job was to buy Red Squadron enough time to skirt the main
action and race down Tythe’s gravity well.
A burst-transmission from survivors of the assault on the
Republic’s small base had confirmed Dooku’s presence on the
surface. But on the possibility that Tythe was a calculated diversion,
Palpatine’s naval command staff had agreed to committing only a
single battle group from the Outer Rim fleet. In the view of those
same naval commanders, invasion was senseless; a Base Delta Zero
attack, justified. In the end it was decided that saturation
bombardment, augmented by limited starfighter engagement, would
send Dooku fleeing, in keeping with the Republic’s strategy to force
the Separatists deeper into the galaxy’s spiral arms.
The Jedi had insisted nevertheless that an attempt be made to take
Dooku alive.
Obi-Wan and Anakin didn’t need to be reminded of what had
happened only weeks earlier on Cato Neimoidia when they had gone
after Viceroy Gunray, but they were not about to forgo a chance to
capture the Sith Lord.
Red Squadron’s intended insertion point was twenty degrees south
of Tythe’s north pole, where the Separatist line was most dispersed.
With droid fighters still pouring from the curving arms of Trade
Federation Lucrehulks, and the recoiling barrels of Commerce Guild
cannons filling local space with storms of unleashed energy, Anakin
led the starfighters on a weaving course through the heart of the
enemy fleet.
“No signature for Grievous’s cruiser,” he said to Obi-Wan. “None
of the ships of the Separatist leadership are here.”
Obi-Wan glanced at the wire-frame display of his threatassessment screen. “All the more reason to believe that Dooku was
ordered here by Sidious.”
“Then where’s everyone else?”
Obi-Wan was troubled by the thought, but didn’t admit to it.
“Dooku will know,” he started to say, when the starfighter’s
proximity scanners stammered a warning. “Techno Union starship is
veering to intercept us.”
“Droid fighters are away and locking on,” Red Three added.
Obi-Wan acknowledged. “Angle shields. We can out-fly them.”
“We’ll end up too far off course,” Anakin said.
“We’re almost at the insertion point,” Obi-Wan said.
“That starship isn’t just going to move aside. Form up on me. We’ll
show them how well we improvise.”
There was no time to argue the point. Rolling to port, Obi-Wan fell
in behind Anakin and fired his thrusters. Trailing behind, Red
Squadron accelerated and banked for the narrow-waisted vessel.
“Ready proton torpedoes,” Anakin said. “Sow them just above the
fuel cells.”
Point-defense turbolasers sought the starfighters as they fell on the
ship, needling space with outpourings of gaudy energy. Corkscrewing
missiles claimed Red Ten and Red Twelve, both of which
disappeared in angry blossoms of fire. Sensing its sudden
vulnerability, the huge vessel launched additional droid fighters. In
the instant it lowered its shields to route power to the sublight drives,
Red Squadron attacked.
Tight on Anakin, the ten remaining starfighters yawed for the
waist of the ship, just forward of its cluster of cylindrical fuel cells.
Dropping his craft to within one hundred meters of the pinched hull,
Anakin began to hug the surface, surging onto a course that would
whip Red Squadron through a tight circle around the forward ends of
the fuel cells.
“Torpedoes away!” he said at the halfway mark.
Obi-Wan triggered the launchers and watched two torpedoes burn
toward the target. Behind him, the rest of Red Squadron did the
same. Hits began to score, fire and gas fountaining from breaches in
the ship’s dark hull.
The disabling run completed, Anakin boosted for Tythe.
“She’s finished!”
In single file, Red Squadron followed.
Almost instantly the punctured vessel exploded, stunning the
fleeing starfighters with a wave of force. Red Nine disappeared at the
edge of the roiling detonation zone, and Red Seven wheeled off into
the void with both wings sheared away.
Obi-Wan regained control of his craft and once more attached
himself to Anakin’s six.
“Insertion point in fifteen seconds,” Anakin updated. “Dial inertial
compensators to maximum. All power to the ablative shields.
Deceleration burn on my mark …”
Obi-Wan clamped his hands on the violently shaking yoke as Red
Squadron ripped into Tythe’s plundered atmosphere. He thought his
teeth might rattle out of his jaws and drop into his lap; eyes and ears
might implode from the pressure; chest might cave in and crush his
heart.
Light flashed behind him; streaked past the cockpit.
Half a dozen droid fighters were chasing them down the well.
Not having to concern themselves with endangering living
systems, the Vultures should have been able to descend even more
rapidly and more acutely than the starfighters. But as the heat of
entry built in the ships, survival protocols began to kick in, tasking
the fighters to adjust the angle of their descents. For some of the
droids it was already too late. Single contrails became particle
showers as gravity summoned the broken fighters to their doom.
Punching through the blankets of clouds at suicidal velocity, ObiWan’s starfighter went into a roll. Pinwheeling before his eyes, Tythe
was a kaleidoscopic furor of white and brown, smeared occasionally
with striations of blue-green.
Anakin’s voice grew loud in his ears. “Nose up! Nose up!”
With effort, Obi-Wan leveled out of his plummet, his stomach
lurching up into his throat. Reaching forward, he engaged the
starfighter’s topographic sensors. The ship was dropping toward ice
floes and bergs. Then, far below, peninsulas of rocky islands came
into view. The surging waves of a dead gray ocean. The denuded shelf
of a continent. Barren land fissured by dry, sinuous riverbeds, and
mounded by brown hills strewn with toppled trees.
A ruined world.
“Head count,” he said into his helmet microphone.
Five voices responded. Reds Eight and Eleven were lost.
“Locking in target coordinates,” Anakin said.
Red Squadron flew just above the contours of land that had once
been as lush as the area surrounding Theed, on Naboo. Now a desert,
save for areas where exotic species of vegetation thrived in lakes of
red-brown water, their jagged shorelines crusted yellow and black.
Also like Naboo, Tythe had once mined plasma in sufficient
quantities to ship offworld. But greed had driven LiMerge Power to
experiment with dangerous methods for keeping the ionized gas
under adequate heat. A chain reaction set in motion by nuclear fuels
had destroyed facilities throughout Tythe’s northern hemisphere and
had left the planet uninhabitable for a generation.
“Target facility is ten kilometers west,” Anakin said. “We should be
hearing from artillery soon enough.”
Soaring from the edge of a high plateau, the six starfighters
dropped into a broad valley, disturbingly reminiscent of Geonosis,
right down to the berthed starships and war machines spread across
the floor.
Hailfire droids wheeled out to greet them with volleys of surfaceto-air missiles. Turbolaser cannons affixed to Trade Federation
landing ships cut the gray-yellow sky to ribbons. STAPs lifted into
the air, and squads of infantry droids hurried for armed skimmers.
Unequipped to defend itself against the onslaught, tattered Red
Squadron banked broadly to the north, evading plasma beams and
flak from exploding heat seekers. Anakin and Obi-Wan paid out the
last of their proton torpedoes in futile attempts to save Reds Three,
Four, and Five. Bursts from their laser cannons crippled two enemy
speeders and countless droid fighters, sending them crashing into
the contaminated terrain. R4-P17 howled as Obi-Wan twisted the
starfighter through violent airbursts and superheated clouds of
billowing smoke.
Red Six vanished.
When they had juked their way through the worst of it, Anakin
came alongside Obi-Wan.
It was just the two of them now.
“Point three-oh,” Anakin said. “On the landing platform.”
Obi-Wan gazed out the right side of the cockpit at what had been
an enormous plasma-generating facility. Fractured containment
domes and adjacent roofless structures revealed toppled extraction
shafts, exploded activators, and tumbled walkways. In the center of
the complex stood an elevated square of corroded ferrocrete,
crowded with enemy fighter craft and bearing a single Geonosian
fantail of distinctive design.
“Dooku’s sloop.”
The words had scarcely left Obi-Wan’s mouth when battle droids
began to gush from the facility and out onto the landing platform.
Bolts from the droids’ blasters clawed at the pair of prowling
starfighters.
“I guess we’re not going in through the front door,” Obi-Wan said.
“There’s another way,” Anakin said, as they were emerging from
their flyby. “We go in through the north dome.”
Obi-Wan looked over his left shoulder at the partially collapsed
hemisphere. The lid that had once topped the plasma containment
structure was long gone, and the resultant circular opening was large
enough for a starfighter to thread.
Obi-Wan had misgivings, nevertheless.
“What about residual radiation inside the dome?”
“Radiation?” Anakin laughed. “The maneuver alone will probably
kill us!”
With its fifty-three skydocks, hundreds of private turbolifts, arrays
of hidden security armaments, and towering atria, 500 Republica
was a world unto itself. Containing more technology than many
Outer Rim worlds and more residents than some, the sky-piercing
structure was the unrivaled gem of the Senate District, and the
elegant cynosure of the district’s prestigious Ambassadorial Sector.
What had begun as a stately building in the classic style had, over
the course of centuries, become a veritable mountain of steps and
setbacks—some with flat roofs, others as gently rounded as
shoulders, and still others as massive as any structure in the district.
Up and up they climbed, profuse, organic, in seeming competition
for Coruscant’s sunlight, culminating in a graceful crown, banded
with penthouses and topped by a lithe spire. Gilded by the rising sun,
its head in the clouds, buttressed by the towers that had allowed it to
outgrow all its neighbors, 500 Republica was the lofty vantage from
which a privileged few could actually gaze down on Coruscant.
Which was precisely why the building had become the landmark
the galaxy’s disenfranchised pointed to when they spoke of
Coruscant’s disproportionate wealth and elitism. Why 500 Republica
was viewed by many as more emblematic of the bloated, indulgent
Senate than the Senate’s own squat mushroom of a home.
Mace could feel the oppressive weight of the structure bearing
down on him as the team entered 500 Republica’s level-one subbasement—square kilometers of supportive ferrocrete and durasteel,
crammed with whining, whirring machines that kept the tower
stable, aloft, secure, climate-controlled, and supplied with water and
power. As deep as it was, the sub-basement was still a hundred
meters above Coruscant’s true underground, and twice that above
the original surface of the planet.
The team had had to wait hours for Republica security to grant
them permission to enter and carry on with the investigation. For a
time, Mace had considered appealing to Palpatine for permission,
since the Supreme Chancellor had an upper-level suite in the
building. For company, the probe droids had scores of custodial and
maintenance droids, but the trail to Sidious had gone cold.
Lost among countless footprints that covered the floor.
“Unless we can find prints that say otherwise, there’s no guarantee
our quarry gained entrance to the sub-basement from Five Hundred
Republica itself,” Dyne pronounced, switching his handheld
processor to standby mode. “He may have entered from the tunnels
that connect to the east or west skydocks.”
“In other words, he could have arrived here from just about
anywhere on Coruscant,” Shaak Ti said.
Dyne nodded. “Presumably.”
Mace gazed down the tunnel the team had taken.
“Could we have missed something along the way?”
“The droids wouldn’t.”
Mace gestured to the smudged and stained ferrocrete floor. “Why
would the prints suddenly end right here?”
Dyne compressed his lips and shook his head. “Maybe someone
carried him here by repulsorlift. Unless you’re suggesting he
levitated across the floor.” He thought about it for a long moment,
then said: “All right, for the sake of argument, let’s say that he did
levitate here.”
“There’ll be prints at his starting point,” Mace said.
Dyne scanned the sub-basement, pursed his lips, and blew out his
breath. “We’re going to need a lot more probe droids.”
“How many more?” Mace said.
“A lot.”
“How long to bring them here and search this entire level?”
“With all this machinery, the skydock access tunnels, the waste
and supply turbolifts … I couldn’t begin to guess. What’s more, we’re
going to need additional security clearance to search the tunnels.”
“You’ll have whatever clearance you need,” Shaak Ti promised.
Mace glanced around. “You’ll have to run imaging scans of the
partitions and the exterior walls.”
“That could require several weeks,” Dyne said cautiously.
“Then the sooner we begin, the better.”
Dyne took a comlink from his belt and was about to activate it
when the floor began to tremble.
“A quake?” Mace asked Shaak Ti.
She shook her head. “I’m not sure—”
A second jolt shook the sub-basement, strong enough to dust the
team with loose ferrocrete from the high ceiling.
“Feels like something rammed the building,” Dyne said.
It wouldn’t be the first time an intoxicated or exhausted driver had
veered from one of the free-travel skylanes and plowed into the side
of a building, Mace told himself. And yet—
The next shudder was accompanied by the distant sound of a
powerful explosion. Lights in the sub-basement faded momentarily,
then returned to full illumination, sending the custodial and
maintenance droids into frantic activity.
Also at a far remove, klaxons and sirens blared.
“My comlink isn’t working,” Dyne said, jabbing at the device’s
frequency search control with his forefinger.
“We’re tiers below midlevel,” Shaak Ti said.
Dyne shook his head. “That shouldn’t matter. Not in here.”
Stretching out with the Force, Mace sensed danger, frenzy, pain,
and death. “Where’s the nearest exit?”
Dyne pointed to his left. “The tunnel to the east skydock.”
Mace’s thoughts swirled. He turned to Valiant. “Commander,
Shaak Ti and I will need half your squad. You and the rest of your
team will assist Captain Dyne with the search. Keep me informed of
your progress.”
“What about me, sir?”
Mace looked at TC-16, then at Dyne. “The droid stays with you.”
Flanked by commandos, Mace and Shaak Ti raced off. The tunnel
to the east skydock shook as they hurried through mixed-species
crowds of frightened pedestrians heading toward and away from 500
Republica. Ahead of them loomed a square of dim sunlight, almost
aquatic in quality, typical of the lower reaches of Coruscant’s urban
canyons.
On the huge quadrangular skydock, humans, humanoids, and
aliens were crouched behind parked limos, taxis, and private yachts,
or hurrying for the entrance to the upper-level mag-lev platform.
Shouts and screams punctuated the drone of overhead traffic. Panic
gripped the free-travel skylanes. Taxis and transports were swerving
in all directions, careening into one another and the sides of
buildings, making desperate rooftop and plaza landings.
Higher, a plunging vehicle—a boxy cargo ship, engulfed in flames
—came streaking through a horizontal autonavigation lane,
surrendering some of its velocity to a violent collision with a public
transport pod before continuing its fiery plunge toward the bottom of
the canyon.
Mace tracked the ill-fated ship for a moment, then tilted his head
back and put the edge of his hand to his brow. Distant buildings
shimmered, as if miraged by heat.
The district’s defensive shield had been raised!
Higher still, something was wrong with the flickering sky. Light
flared behind stratified clouds, and thunder of a kind reverberated
from the summits of the taller buildings. Far to the south,
Coruscant’s pale blue mantle was hashed into triangles and slivers by
white contrails.
In their oblate pools of white skin, Shaak Ti’s eyes were wide when
she looked at Mace.
“An attack,” she said in stunned disbelief.
Comlink already in hand, Mace activated the Jedi Temple
frequency and held the device to his ear.
“Nothing but noise.”
“The deflector shield,” Shaak Ti said.
She craned her neck, striped montrals and head-tail quivering. “Or
could they be jamming transmissions?”
Mace’s nostrils flared. “Crowd control!” he told the commandos.
To Shaak Ti, he said: “Find Palpatine. See to it he’s conveyed to
safety. I’ll send backup.”
In the ruined archive hall of LiMerge Power’s plasma facility, Count
Dooku waited for Kenobi and Skywalker to arrive. The room was
enormous by any standard, thirty meters high and three times that in
circumference. Dooku could imagine it when it had hummed with
life and activity, before the catastrophe. Still, that it had remained
intact was a testament to its builders. And with its curved walls of
holobooks and data storage disks—irradiated beyond salvage—he
accepted that some might believe that secrets of the most sinister
sort were concealed here.
Jedi like Kenobi and Skywalker, who wanted to believe as much.
Despite their gullibility, they were nothing if not tenacious and—
dare he admit it?—exceptional.
In the risks they undertook.
In how deluded they were—about so many things.
In their unabashed zeal to capture him they had actually piloted
their starfighters straight through the roof of the largest of the
facility’s containment domes, and had managed to survive. Such
superhuman feats were almost enough to convince Dooku that they
still had the Force with them.
If only they weren’t so naïve and easily manipulated.
Once again, Darth Sidious had divined the actions they would take
well in advance of their own deciding. The talent had less to do with
being able to peer into the future than with having access to streams
of possibilities. Sidious wasn’t unerring. He could be surprised or
taken off his guard—as at Geonosis, as in the case of Gunray’s
mechno-chair—but not for long. His mastery of the dark side of the
Force endowed him with the power to decipher the currents that
comprised the future, and to comprehend that while those currents
were manifold, they were not boundless.
Such mastery was one of the skills that distinguished Sidious from
Yoda, who believed the future was so much in motion it could not be
read with any clarity—especially during times when the dark side was
on the ascendant. But how could Yoda be expected to see the whole
picture with one eye closed?
Deliberately closed.
The Jedi accepted as a matter of faith that embracing the dark side
meant cutting themselves off from the light, when in fact the dark
side opened one to the full range of the Force.
There was, after all, only the Force.
It was unfortunate for the Jedi that they believed the Force was
theirs alone to use and honor. That sense of entitlement was evident
in the way Kenobi and Skywalker called on the Force in their fervor
to confront him: opening doors with waves of their hands, clearing
obstacles from their path with similar gestures, moving with what
appeared to be numinous speed and agility, flourishing their blue
blades as if they were powered by the will of the Force itself …
While at the same time oblivious.
Dooku took a moment to set in place his compact welcoming
device, then hurried through a series of decontamination chambers
into the facility’s control room, which overlooked the rear of the
archive hall and the vast space enclosed by the containment dome
itself. There he activated a second small holoprojector and positioned
himself for the holocam. Owing to interference, images of the archive
hall were nowhere near as clear as he might have wished, and the
audio feed was worse. It was more important, though, that Kenobi
and Skywalker be able to see him than he them.
At long last the two Jedi rushed headlong into the hall, only to stop
upon spying his life-sized holoimage emanating from the compact
holoprojector he had left behind.
“Dooku!” young Skywalker said, as if his tone of voice should
suffice to send shivers down the backbones of his opponents. “Show
yourself!”
Rooms distant, Dooku merely spread his hands in a gesture of
greeting, and aimed his words at the holo-projector’s microphone.
“Stand not amazed, young Jedi. Is this not the way you had your first
glimpse of Lord Sidious?”
Instead of replying, Kenobi touched Skywalker on the arm, and the
two of them began to scan the hall, no doubt in an attempt to locate
him through the Force.
“You won’t find me, Jedi—”
“We know you’re here, Dooku,” Kenobi said suddenly—and with
irksome audio distortion. “We can sense you.”
Dooku sighed in disappointment. They weren’t hearing him.
Worse, the video feed was also becoming hopelessly corrupted. More
through the Force than the holocam feed he saw them moving
toward the very doorway he had taken to reach the control room.
Exceptional, he thought.
Despite his mastery of the Quey’tek technique for hiding oneself in
the Force, they had located him! Ah, well then, time to entertain
them, in observance of Sidious’s wishes.
Plucking his comlink from his belt, Dooku’s right thumb leapt
across the small touch pad.
Heralded by the sound of metallic footfalls, fifty infantry droids
crowded into the archive hall through two opposing doorways,
perpendicular to the one through which the Jedi had entered.
“—beginning to … things almost as much … I hate sand,”
Skywalker was saying to his former mentor as he raised his
lightsaber over one shoulder.
Kenobi spread his legs and brought his blade directly in front of
him. “Then … sweep up.”
Touched by their camaraderie, Dooku smiled to himself. Darth
Sidious had his work cut out for him if he ever expected to turn
Skywalker to the dark side.
He thumbed a final comlink key.
And with that, the droids leveled their blaster rifles at the Jedi and
opened fire.
Yoda surrendered himself to the current of the Force. Sometimes,
when the current was swift and steadfast, he could see through the
eyes of his fellow Jedi, almost as if they were the Temple’s remote
sensors. And sometimes when the current was especially forceful,
when it surged as if descending from great heights, he could hear the
voice of Qui-Gon Jinn, as clearly as if he were still alive.
Master Yoda, he might say, we still have much to learn. The Force
remains a code only partially deciphered. But another key has been
found. We will become stronger than we have ever been …
Today was not one of those days. Today the current was
interrupted by eddies and whirlpools, hydraulic traps whose roar
overpowered the voices Yoda sought to hear. Today the current was
not pellucid, but muddied by red soil eroded from distant shores,
treacherous with obstacles, tainted.
Though he was scarcely aware of it, his eyelids were squeezed
tight, his eyeballs dancing beneath as if incapable of focusing on any
one thing. He had an image of himself drawing aside a veil only to
find another, and another beyond that.
The dark side frustrated his every effort to see clearly.
The experience was still something new to him.
Even though he’d had centuries to grow accustomed to foreboding,
he had lived far longer without it. The dark side never completely
disappeared—it scratched at the surface like an insect crawling
across a transparisteel panel—and he had been able to sense its
incremental increases in strength when the Jedi erred, or when the
Republic erred, and soon the two were hand in hand.
Drawn into the mistakes of the Republic, the Jedi had been. But
knowingly, and sometimes with full complicity. Allowed the dark
side to take root, the Jedi had. Allowed arrogance to infect the
Order, the Jedi had. A priority, holding on to power had become.
Inflated by their own conquests, the Jedi became.
Some Jedi believed that Yoda wasn’t aware of these things, or that
he hadn’t done enough to stem the tide of the dark side. Some
believed that the Council had acted improperly or, worse, ineptly.
What they failed to understand was that, once rooted, the growth of
the dark side was inexorable, and could only be reversed by the one
born to restore balance.
Yoda was not that one.
Aged, experienced, diplomatic, informative, brilliant with a
lightsaber … Yes, all of these things. And not unacquainted with the
power of the dark side. For that reason he understood just how
dangerous this new Sith Lord was. He hadn’t had a sense of that
danger until he had fought Dooku on Geonosis.
Then he understood.
In self-exile for a thousand years, the Sith had not merely been
waiting for an appropriate time to reemerge and exact revenge, but
for the birth of one strong enough to embrace the dark side fully and
become its dedicated instrument. This was Sidious: powerful enough
to hide in plain sight. Powerful enough to instruct his apprentice,
Dooku, to expose him, and still remain hidden from the Jedi.
And as arrogant as the Jedi. Convinced that his way was the one
and only way.
Did he know about Skywalker?
Surely he did. What better way to ensure total victory than by
killing or corrupting the Chosen One? Even if not that One, someone
so strong in midi-chlorians … Someone birthed by the Force itself,
Qui-Gon would have said—never a doubt that Anakin’s mother might
have been lying.
The boy had no father.
None I choose to remember. None I would honor with that title.
The Sith were aware of Skywalker. How would he react when they
tried finally to ensnare him?
Yoda’s eyes snapped open. A disturbance in the Force—of such
magnitude that he had been hurled from the current.
At his thought command, the window shutters in his quarters
opened, and he gazed out on Coruscant, over the plain of The Works
and beyond. Something was wrong with the sky. Behind gathered
clouds turned red and gold by noxious smoke: a lightstorm. Pulsing
light, brighter than the waning rays of Coruscant’s sun. Movement,
as well; outside Coruscant’s busy envelope, not seen but sensed.
An attack.
The Sith Lord’s response to his being chased? Was it possible?
He perceived Mace running down corridors in the Temple; then
turned as Mace rushed through the doorway. At the same instant, a
flaming Republic ship streaked past the Temple’s crowning spires
and crashed violently in the heart of The Works.
“Tiin, Koon, Ki-Adi-Mundi, and some of the others are on their
way up the well,” Mace said. “I sent Stass Allie to assist Shaak Ti in
guarding Chancellor Palpatine.”
Yoda nodded sagely. “Well trained the Supreme Chancellor’s Red
Guards are. But display due concern for his safety, the Jedi must.”
“Reports from naval command are garbled,” Mace continued. “It’s
clear that the attack caught the home fleet by surprise. Groups of
Separatist ships managed to penetrate the envelope before the fleet
had time to engage. Now, by all accounts, our vessels are holding the
line.”
Yoda adopted an expression that mixed anger and bafflement.
“Monitoring hyperspace reversion points, our commanders weren’t?”
Mace’s eyes narrowed. “The Separatist fleet jumped from the Deep
Core.”
“Secret, those routes were. Known to us and few others.” Yoda
looked at Mace. “Unrestricted access to the archives, Dooku had.
Access enough to erase all mentions of Kamino. Access enough to
learn of explorations in the Deep Core.”
Mace went to the window wall and stared at the sky. “Dooku isn’t
leading this attack. Obi-Wan confirmed that he is on Tythe.”
“Revealed, the importance of Tythe is. To draw into the Outer Rim
additional Jedi.”
“Maybe Palpatine will heed the Council’s warnings next time.”
“Improbable. But as you say: perhaps.”
Mace swung back to Yoda. “It’s Grievous. But he can’t be planning
to occupy Coruscant. There aren’t enough battle droids in the entire
galaxy for that.”
“Desperate he is,” Yoda said, more to himself.
“It’s not in his programming.”
Yoda looked up. “Not Grievous—Sidious.”
Mace took a moment to answer. “If that’s true, then we’re closer to
finding him than we thought. Still, he can’t believe we’d call off the
search now.”
“Demoralize Coruscant, Grievous will. Harry those who live in the
heights and who wield power. Send them fleeing for safer havens, the
attack will. Disrupt the Senate.”
Mace paced in front of the windows. “This will only encourage
Palpatine to triple the size of the clone army, construct more and
more starships and fighters, strike at more worlds. With the Senate
crippled, no one will oppose him.”
“Modulate, this war does. Recall every available Jedi, we must.”
“The HoloNet is down,” Mace said. “Surface communications are
distorted by the defensive shields.”
Yoda nodded. “Use the beacon, we will.”
In the wake of the erratic and mostly unintelligible messages that
had reached 500 Republica regarding the Separatists’ surprise
attack, Dyne had considered the sub-basement to be the safest place
on Coruscant. But now that the team had discovered a possible finish
to the long trail they had followed from The Works, the building’s
vast underground seemed the most dangerous place to be.
With a battle raging in space, and notwithstanding Mace Windu’s
command to the contrary, Dyne had been tempted to suspend the
search for Sidious’s lair and report back to the Intelligence division,
as he had ordered the other analysts to do. But as ARC commander
Valiant had pointed out, the search team’s objective was as
important to the war as the actions of the ships that were protecting
Coruscant.
So, while the team waited for Intelligence to deliver additional
probe droids, a search of the sub-basement had begun—admittedly
superficial and somewhat desultory, but only in response to the
seeming impossibility of the task. Electronically tethered to the
probe droids, Dyne and the commandos had performed imagings of
some of the partitions and walls, and investigated numerous unlit
hollows and recesses. The basement became a kind of microcosm for
the entire war, with everyone on the team contributing separate
skills.
Only the interpreter droid, TC-16, was at a loss for something to
do.
Five Hundred Republica hadn’t sustained any follow-up jolts.
Dyne had learned that the initial jolts had owed not to
bombardment, but to the fall of ships destroyed at the edge of space.
With thousands of cargo and passenger vessels arriving at Coruscant
at any given moment, he could scarcely imagine the chaos upside.
Secondary shocks that had rocked the huge building had been traced
to the firing of plasma weapons concealed in 500 Republica’s cake of
a crown.
Several hours into the cursory search, Dyne had been struck by the
possibility that certain Coruscanti—perhaps the Sith Lord himself—
could be helping to coordinate the attack. With HoloNet
transmissions jammed and surface communications sabotaged by
the defensive shields, he had theorized that the probe droids might
be able to home in on exchanges occurring on eccentric frequencies.
He was as astonished as anyone when the hovering probe droids
had led the team right back to where they had begun the search:
where the footprints of their as-yet-unidentified quarry ended.
The source of the unusual frequency was determined to be directly
beneath them. The droids had discovered further that the ferrocrete
floor panel thought to have been the end of the trail was actually a
movable platform, not unlike a turbolift, but powered hydraulically
rather than by antigrav repulsor. The search for a hidden control
panel, such as had been detected at the niche, hadn’t come to
anything. But by broadcasting sounds—both within and outside the
range of human hearing—the probe droids had ultimately conjured a
response from the platform.
Following what had sounded like a debate, the probe droids had
chirped and bleated at the panel a second time. Issuing a resolved
click, the panel had descended a couple of centimeters, then come to
a halt.
Dyne recalled wondering where the platform’s shaft could lead.
Unlike many of Coruscant’s tallest buildings, 500 Republica did
not rely on the support of earlier structures for its foundation, but
was solid almost all the way down to bedrock. Or at least was thought
to be. This far below Coruscant’s civilized crust, there remained areas
as unfamiliar as the surfaces of some distant worlds.
Dyne had decided to contact Mace Windu at the Jedi Temple for
advice on how to proceed. But when his repeated attempts failed, he
and Valiant had made a command decision to carry on without the
Jedi.
Ground imaging scans had already shown the shaft to be fifty
meters deep. Four meters in diameter, the panel was large enough to
accommodate the entire team, including the interpreter droid.
Definitely the most dangerous place to be, Dyne thought as he
wedged himself among the commandos.
The probe droids chirped instructions to the panel, and it began to
drop.
Slower than would have been the case had it answered to a
repulsorlift.
The wall of the circular shaft was ancient ceramacrete, cracked and
stained in places.
“If anyone’s down here,” Dyne said to Valiant, “they’re probably
aware we’re on the way.”
The commandos didn’t need to be told. Weapons enabled, they
hurried to firing positions the moment the platform came to a rest.
Ribboned with conduits and crowded with ancient machinery, the
dismal space bore some resemblance to the tunnels and rooms they
had passed through and explored since leaving The Works. But this
one, Dyne told himself, was an archaeologist’s dream. Probably a
maintenance node for buildings that had stood here in Coruscant’s
dim past.
Twenty meters ahead of them, flickering light lanced from around
the edges of a large metal door.
Dyne sent the droids to investigate, then studied the processor’s
data screen.
“One flesh-and-blood behind the door,” he whispered to Valiant.
“Readings also indicate the presence of droids.” He looked at the
ARC. “It’s your call, Commander.”
Valiant regarded the door. “We’ve come this far. I say we go in like
we own the place.”
Dyne’s heart began to race. “Find, fix, finish.”
In what had served as the archive room for LiMerge Power’s plasma
facility, droid parts were piling up so fast and so high that Obi-Wan
and Anakin could scarcely see Dooku’s wavering holoimage any
longer.
The business of destroying infantry droids—for that’s precisely
what the confrontation had come down to—was beginning to take a
toll on Obi-Wan. The decapitations and amputations were no longer
as surgical as they had been when Dooku had first unleashed the
droids. The slices that halved his spindly opponents and the thrusts
that pierced chest plastrons had lost some of their initial accuracy.
Neither he nor Anakin was relying on lightsabers only. Calling on
the Force, they hurled whatever could be lifted from the floor or
yanked from the walls. Force-pushing four droids to the floor,
hewing half a dozen more with his flashing blade, Anakin leapt from
Obi-Wan’s side, landed on the head of a perplexed droid, and began
to race toward the far side of the hall, using other heads as steppingstones.
But for every droid either of them destroyed, five more would
appear, creating an impenetrable barrier between them and the
doorway through which Dooku had certainly disappeared moments
before they had arrived.
“Dooku!” Anakin snarled through clenched teeth. “I will kill you!”
“Control your rage, Anakin,” Obi-Wan managed to say between
breaths. “Don’t give him the satisfaction.”
Anakin shot him a worrisome scowl. “Can’t have me becoming too
powerful, now, can we, Master?”
Before Obi-Wan could reply, twenty battle droids hurried into the
room through the door behind him. Whirling, he deflected their first
barrage, then fought his way to cover behind a heap of dismembered
droids, where Anakin joined him.
In the hope that Dooku was listening from afar, he shouted:
“Whatever happens here, Dooku, your Confederacy is finished! The
Republic has all of you on the run—even your master, Sidious.”
More droids appeared.
To Dooku, this was nothing more than a game, Obi-Wan told
himself. But if it was a demonstration of Force ability Dooku wanted,
then Anakin was still more than willing to provide it.
“Dooku!” he howled.
With such force and wrath that the ceiling of the vast hall began to
collapse.
Hurry, Threepio,” Padmé said over her shoulder. “Unless you want
the Senate to be your final resting place.”
The protocol droid hastened his pace. “I assure you, Mistress, I’m
moving as quickly as my limbs permit. Oh, curse my metal body! I’ll
become entombed here!”
The broad, ornate hallways leading from the Great Rotunda were
packed with Senators, their aides, staff members, and droids, many
laden with armloads of documents and data disks, and in some cases
expensive gifts received from appreciative lobbyists. Blue-robed
Senate Guards and helmeted clone troopers were doing their best to
oversee the evacuation, but, what with the warbling sirens and flying
rumors, alarm was beginning to yield to panic.
“How could this happen?” a Sullustan was posing to the Gotal next
to him. “How?”
To all sides of her—among Bith, Gran, Wookiees, Rodians—Padmé
heard the same question being asked.
How could Coruscant be invaded?
She wondered, as well. But she had more to worry about than
Coruscant.
Where is Anakin?
She reached for him in her thoughts, with her heart.
I need you. Come back to me—quickly!
Grievous’s strike was impeccably timed. Many delegates who
might not have been on Coruscant had come to hear Palpatine’s State
of the Republic address, and had remained onworld to attend the
endless parties that followed. In light of the surprise attack,
Palpatine’s reassurances seemed even more woefully premature now
than when he had uttered them. And despite the fact that the
Supreme Chancellor’s optimistic remarks had been echoed
throughout the Great Rotunda, Padmé couldn’t help notice that
many of her peers were surrounded by cadres of bodyguards, or
sporting body armor, jet packs, or other emergency escape devices.
Clearly Palpatine had failed to lull everyone into complacency.
Thirteen years earlier Padmé could have claimed to be one of the
few dignitaries whose homeworld had succumbed to an invasion and
occupation. Targeted by the Trade Federation, Naboo had fallen to
the Neimoidians; her parents and advisers were arrested and jailed.
Now she was just one of thousands of Senators whose worlds had
been similarly invaded and ransacked. Regardless, she refused to
accept that Coruscant could fall to the Confederacy—even with the
home fleet reduced to half its former strength. Word of mouth had it
that buildings in the Ambassadorial Sector had been toppled, that
battle droids were surging through Loijin Plaza, that midlevel
skylanes overflowed with Geonosian Fanblades and droid
fighters … Even if the rumors proved true, Padmé was convinced that
Palpatine would find some way to drive Grievous from the Core—
again.
Perhaps he would recall battle groups participating in the Outer
Rim sieges.
That meant that Anakin would be recalled.
She chided herself for being selfish. But didn’t she have the right?
Hadn’t she earned the right?
Just this once?
Thus far, the Senate Building was unscathed. Nevertheless,
Homeworld Security felt it prudent to move everyone to the shelters
deep beneath the hemisphere and the enormous plaza that fronted it.
With most of the autonavigation lanes congested, it wasn’t as if
anyone could flee Coruscant. And there was always the likelihood
that Grievous would single out civilian targets, as he had done on
countless occasions.
Jostled by the surging crowd, Padmé collided with a Gran delegate
who fixed his trio of eyestalks on her.
“And you originally opposed the Military Creation Act,” he barked.
“What do you say now?”
There was really no answer. Besides, she had been on the receiving
end of similar reproofs since the start of the war. Typically voiced by
those who failed to grasp that her concern was for the Constitution,
not for the ultimate fate of the free-trade zones.
She heard her name called, and turned to see Bail Organa and Mon
Mothma angling toward where she and C-3PO were momentarily
hampered. With them were two female Jedi—Masters Shaak Ti and
Stass Allie.
“Have you seen the Chancellor?” Bail asked when he could.
She shook her head. “He’s probably in the holding office.”
“We were just there,” Shaak Ti said. “The office is empty. Even his
guards are gone.”
“They must have escorted him to the shelters,” Padmé said.
Bail glanced at something over her shoulder and raised his hand
over his head to call attention to himself. “Mas Amedda,” he
explained for Padmé’s benefit. “He’ll know where to find the
Chancellor.”
The tall, horned, gray-complected Chagrian fairly shouldered his
way through the crowd.
“The Supreme Chancellor had no meetings scheduled until later
today,” he said in answer to Bail’s question. “I assume he is in his
residence.”
“Five Hundred Republica,” Shaak Ti muttered to herself in
seeming frustration. “I was just there.”
Amedda gazed down at her in sudden concern. “And the
Chancellor wasn’t?”
“I wasn’t looking for him then,” the Jedi started to say, then
allowed her words to trail off. “Master Allie and I will check the
Senate Office Building and Republica.” She glanced at Padmé, Bail,
and the others. “Where are you going?”
“Wherever we’re directed to go,” Bail said.
“The turbolifts to the shelters are overwhelmed,” Stass Allie said.
“It’ll be hours before the Senate is evacuated. My skimmer is at the
plaza’s northwest landing platform. You can pilot that directly to the
shelters.”
“Won’t you and Shaak Ti need it?” Padmé asked.
“We’ll use the speeder bike I arrived on,” Shaak Ti said.
“We appreciate the gesture,” Bail said. “But I heard that the front
plaza is cordoned off.”
Stass Allie took his arm. “We’ll escort you.”
Troopers stationed in the corridor opened a path for the group,
and before long they reached the doorways to the main plaza. There,
however, a commando blocked their path.
“You can’t exit this way,” the commando told Bail.
“They’re with us,” Shaak Ti said.
Waving signals to several of his white-armored comrades, the
commando stood aside and allowed Padmé’s group to pass. The sky
above the statue-studded plaza was crowded with gunships and
personnel carriers. AT-TEs and other mobile artillery pieces had
already been deployed.
The Jedi led Padmé, C-3PO, Bail, and Mon Mothma to the openroofed skimmer. The speeder bike was parked alongside. Shaak Ti
swung one leg over the seat and started the engine. Stass Allie settled
in behind her.
“Good luck,” she said.
The Senators and the droid watched the two Jedi race off in the
direction of the Senate Office Building; then, with Bail piloting, they
boarded the oval-shaped Flash skimmer and dropped down into the
wide canyon below the plaza.
Free-travel traffic was thick even there, but Bail’s skill got them
through the worst of it and on course for the shelter entrances, which
were just below the main skydocks of the Senate Medcenter.
Without warning, two beams of scarlet light stabbed at them from
somewhere above the dome of the Senate.
“Vulture droids!” Bail said.
Padmé clutched on to C-3PO as Bail veered away from the plasma
bolts. The pod-winged droid fighter that had fired was one of several
that were strafing vehicles, landing platforms, and buildings in the
canyon. Republic gunships were in close pursuit, unleashing with
powerful wingtip cannons.
Padmé’s mouth fell open in astonishment. This was something she
had never expected to witness on Coruscant.
Bail was doing everything he could to keep clear of blaster bolts,
plasma, and flak, but so was every other driver, and collisions quickly
became part of the obstacle course. Dropping the skimmer lower
still, Bail began to head for the nearest shelter entrance, as friendly
and unfriendly fire ranged closer.
A flash of intense light blinded Padmé momentarily. The skimmer
tipped harshly, almost spilling its occupants into midair. Smoke
poured from the starboard turbine nacelle, and the small craft went
into a shallow dive.
“Hold tight!” Bail yelled.
“We’re doomed!” C-3PO said.
Padmé understood that Bail was swerving for a landing platform
that abutted a wide skybridge. Tears streaming from her eyes,
stricken with a sudden nausea, she placed her right hand on her
abdomen.
Anakin! she said to herself. Anakin!
Flagship of the Separatist flotilla, General Grievous’s kilometerslong cruiser the Invisible Hand held to a stationary orbit above
Coruscant’s Senate District, just now in full sunlight, the most
majestic of its forest of aeries standing tall above the clouds.
Magnified holoimages of the buildings rose from the tactical table on
the cruiser’s bridge. Grievous studied the images for a moment
before returning to his customary place at the forward viewscreens.
Glinting in daylight, the gargantuan wedge-shaped assault ships
that were, for good reason, the pride of the Republic fleet were
positioned to provide cover for the planet’s most important centers.
In the first moments of the sneak attack, Grievous had caught a few
of the ships with their shields contracted, and those hapless few
glided now like flaming torches above Coruscant’s pearl-strung night
side, fire-suppression tenders and rescue ships following in their
wake, gobbling up escape pods and lifeboats. The surviving cruisers
were managing to keep their Separatist counterparts at bay.
Although that scarcely mattered, since neither aerial bombardment
nor invasion was important to the plan.
From the point of view of Republic naval commanders, it must
have appeared that Grievous lacked a plan; that desperation
resulting from his previous defeats in the Mid and Outer Rims had
driven him to gather what remained of his fleet and hurl it into a
battle he couldn’t possibly hope to win. And indeed, Grievous was
doing everything he could to encourage that misconception. The
warships under his command were haphazardly dispersed,
vulnerable to counterattack, concentrating fire on communications
satellites and orbital mirrors, lobbing occasional and largely
ineffectual volleys of plasma at the world they had come so far and
risked so much to assail.
All this was crucial to the plan.
The tactics of terror had their place.
From hundreds of areas on Coruscant’s bright and dark sides
streamed columns of passenger and cargo ships, determined to reach
the safety of deep space. Indeed, there were almost as many vessels
attempting to depart as there were arriving, constrained to
autonavigation lanes and easy prey because of that. Elsewhere in
local space, inward-bound ships that had reverted to realspace
outside the battle zone had diverted from their approach vectors and
were either hanging well to the rear, close to Coruscant’s small
moons, or deviating for the star system’s inner worlds at sublight
speeds.
In the middle distance, droid fighters and clone-piloted
starfighters were destroying one another with a vengeance. Perhaps a
wing of Vulture fighters had penetrated Republic lines at the start of
the battle, but many had since been destroyed by orbital platform
cannons, flights of high-altitude patrol craft, or ground-based
artillery. Others had dashed themselves against the defensive shields
that provided additional safeguards for Coruscant’s political districts.
But that, too, was part of the plan to inspire panic, since the sight of
laser bolts or plummeting ships detonating against those transparent
domes of energy could be terrifying. Smoke billowing from some of
the capital world’s deepest canyons told Grievous that a few of the
spearhead droids had succeeded in evading both shields and
antiaircraft fire.
Similarly, tentative maneuvers on the part of Coruscant’s home
fleet vessels told him how eager their commanders were to break
formation and engage Grievous head-on. But they had a world to
protect and, more important, were too meager in number to proceed
with certainty. No doubt they were waiting for reinforcements to
arrive from distant systems. Anticipating as much, Grievous had
planted surprises for those Republic battle groups closest to the
Core, surprises in the form of mass-shadow mines, and had station
warships at reversion points along the hyperlanes. If he couldn’t
prevent reinforcements from arriving, he could at least delay them.
If everything went according to plan, the Separatist flotilla would
be ready to jump to lightspeed long before reinforcements reverted
in sufficient numbers to pose a serious threat.
Grievous took a long moment to absorb the silent battle that flared
beyond the thick transparisteel of the bridge viewports. He loathed
being so far from the action and bloodshed. But he knew that he had
to be patient a while longer. Then all the waiting and frustration
would be justified.
A Neimoidian addressed him from one of the duty stations.
“General: comlink transmissions are returning to normal in
sectors of the planet. The enemy appears to have comprehended that
we are using the jamming suite we employed to our advantage at
Praesitlyn.”
“This is not unexpected,” Grievous said, without turning from the
view. “Instruct Group One commanders that they should continue
targeting orbital mirrors and communication satellites. Relocate the
jamming platform to zero-one-zero ecliptic, and intensify the
shields.”
“Yes, General.” The Neimoidian paused, then added: “I am
compelled to report that we are sustaining heavy losses in all
groups.”
Grievous glanced at the tactical table. Group One alone had lost
two Trade Federation carriers. The Neimoidians had managed to
jettison the spherical core of one of the carriers, but the other had
been blown completely in half. In the holofield, the tiny dots spilling
from the carrier’s curved and now separated arms were droid
fighters.
“Override the survival and engagement programs of those droid
fighters,” Grievous ordered. “Issue a command that they speed
directly for Coruscant. They are to convert to explosive devices.”
“Are any specific targets assigned?”
“The outskirts of the Senate District.”
“General, some of our fighters have already infiltrated that sector.”
“Excellent. Command those to target landing platforms, skyways,
pedestrian plazas, and shelters. Wherever possible, they are to
dedicate themselves to overwhelming Coruscant’s civil defense
forces.”
“Affirmative.”
“Have any Republic auxiliaries arrived?”
“A task force comprising four light cruisers is decanting from
hyperspace and advancing from Coruscant’s night side.”
“Order our commanders there to engage them.”
Sooner than expected, Grievous thought. Ordinarily he would have
given thought to contingency plans, but he trusted that Lords Sidious
and Tyranus would apprise him of any changes. Had it not been for
the Deep Core hyperspace routes the flotilla had taken, the attack
could not have been launched successfully. Those little-known routes
had been furnished by Sidious, who was less concerned with
battlefield tactics than with long-range strategies. It was warcraft of a
sort Grievous had never practiced. Warcraft in which seeming
defeats had resulted in victories; seeming foes proved to be allies.
Warcraft of a sort that left the losers with nothing, and the winners
with everything.
The galaxy itself.
The Neimoidian communications officer had fallen silent,
apparently in reception of an update from one of the duty stations.
Now he said: “General, a group of Jedi starfighters has emerged from
Coruscant’s gravity well.”
“How large a group?”
“Twenty-two craft.”
“Deploy as many tri-fighters against them as are needed.”
“Yes, sir.”
Grievous turned from the viewports. “Is the strike force
assembled?”
The gunnery officer took a moment to reply. “Your gunboat is
ready, and your elites are standing by in the launching bay.”
“Battle droids, as well?”
“Fifty, General.”
Grievous nodded. “That should suffice.” He glanced at the
viewport a final time, then turned his gaze on the Neimoidian bridge
crew. “Carry on. Consider every Republic vessel a target of
opportunity.”
“I’m sorry, Master, but the beacon still isn’t transmitting.”
Yoda continued to pace the floor of the Temple’s computer room,
then stopped and pointed the business end of his gimer stick at the
Jedi seated at the beacon’s control console.
“Nothing for which to be sorry,” he said in reprimand. “The
Separatists’ fault this is. Jamming transmissions from this sector of
Coruscant, Grievous is.”
The Jedi—a brown-haired human female named Lari Oll—lifted
her hands from the console and shook her head in confusion. “How
could Grievous—”
“Dooku,” Yoda cut her off. “Shares our secrets with his
confederates, he does.”
“If one of our starfighters could get past the Separatist blockade,
there might be a way of relaying a message through the HoloNet.”
Yoda nodded. “Already considered that, Master Tiin has. Attempt
to recall Jedi from Belderone, Tythe, and other worlds, he will.”
“Can they get back here in time?”
“Hmph. On Grievous’s objective, that depends. Leave Coruscant
soon and only slightly bruised, he might. Wait, we must, until he
reveals his plan.” Yoda paused to consider his own words, then
leaned his weight on the gimer stick and looked hard at Lari Oll.
“Enabled the comm is?”
“Intermittently, Master Yoda.”
He nodded his chin to the communications console. “Call Master
Windu.”
Moments later, Windu’s voice issued indistinctly from the
console’s annunciators.
“… Fisto and I … Senate building. Shaak … Allie … to the
Chancellor’s quarters in Five Hundred Republica. We … with them
—”
“Raised, the defense shields are. Among one another, districts are
unable to communicate.” Yoda grimaced, then nodded once more.
“Master Ti, try.”
Lari Oll tried several frequencies before giving up. “I’m sor—” She
caught herself. “No response.”
Yoda paced away from the console, deliberately turning his back to
the glut of devices, screens, data displays, in a kind of
countermeasure.
Shutting his eyes to distance himself further, he stretched out with
his feelings, placing in his mind’s eye Mace and Kit Fisto skimming
through the deranged sky; Shaak Ti and Stass Allie hurrying toward
Palpatine’s quarters in 500 Republica; Saesee Tiin, Agen Kolar,
Bultar Swan, and other Jedi Masters and Jedi Knights streaking from
Coruscant’s envelope in their starfighters, local space flashing with
energy bolts and globular explosions, ships too numerous to count
embroiled in a monumental battle …
Grievous was loosing his war machines against both military and
civilian targets, firing at anything and everything that wandered into
his sights, commanding his droid fighters to dash themselves against
Coruscant’s defensive umbrellas or race down through traffic lanes,
initiating chain reactions of collisions.
And yet, for all the diversion, disruption, and terror those
stratagems incited, they had little to do with the real battle.
As was true of the war itself, the real battle was being fought in the
Force.
Yoda stretched out further, immersing himself fully in the Force—
only to feel his breath catch in his throat.
Frigid, the current became.
Arctic.
And for the first time he could feel Sidious. Feel him on Coruscant!
Captain Dyne stepped cautiously from the platform that had
dropped the team into the unexplored depths of 500 Republica.
Here, at an intersection of spooky corridors made of permacrete and
surfaced with panels of plasteel, no water dripped, no insects
constructed hives, no conduit worms nursed on electrical current.
Strangely, however, the air was stirred by a faint and fresh breeze.
Dyne took a breath to steady his nerves. He was trained for
combat, but had spent so many of the past few years doing routine
Intelligence work that his once sharp reflexes were shot.
Commanding the hovering probe droids to go to stasis mode, he
deactivated the handheld processor and hooked it on his belt.
Drawing his Merr-Sonn blaster from its holster, he hefted it, then
thumbed off the stun setting switch.
Ahead of him, ghost-like in the dismal light, the commandos were
moving toward the thick door at the end of the hall, keeping close to
the walls, with weapons raised. Valiant had the point, with the
squad’s explosives expert close behind, a thermal detonator in hand.
Dyne stepped between the powered-down pair of probe droids,
TC-16 following in his footsteps.
They hadn’t advanced three meters down the corridor when
Dyne’s ears pricked up at the sound of gurgled voices.
He could sense TC-16 come to a sudden halt behind him.
“Why, someone is speaking Geonosian,” the protocol droid started
to say.
Whirling, Dyne found himself staring down the wide muzzles of
two organic-looking sonic weapons, grasped in the thick-fingered
hands of two Geonosian soldier drones, barely visible in the
shadows, their wings angled down toward the corridor’s grimy floor.
The next few moments unfurled in silent slow motion.
Dyne understood that it wasn’t his life flashing before his eyes, but
his death.
He saw the commandos drop in their tracks, as if blown over by a
gale-force wind. He watched Valiant and the explosives expert leave
the floor and hurtle headlong into the door. He observed a storm of
probe droid parts whirl past him. He felt himself go airborne and
crash into the wall, and his insides turn spongy.
It was possible, in that eternal moment of silence, that the troopers
had reacted quickly enough to get off a few bolts, because when Dyne
looked to his right, along the way he had come, there were no signs of
the Geonosians or, for that matter, TC-16.
Then again, for all he knew he had lapsed into unconsciousness for
an undetermined amount of time. He was vaguely aware of being
slumped against the wall in a position that didn’t come naturally to a
human being. It was as if every bone in his body had been made
pliant.
Soundlessly, the distant door opened inward, and light flooded
into the corridor. The light was either red or tinted so by the blood
that was filling his ruptured eyeballs.
Still set on slow motion, the immediate world came in and out of
focus. What remained of his vision registered a room filled with
blinking equipment, screens filled with scrolling data, a
holoprojector table, above which drifted a Trade Federation
battleship, halved and in flames. Two machine intelligences emerged
from the room, their slender, tubular bodies identifying them as
assassin droids. Behind them walked a human of medium height and
build, who stepped nonchalantly over Valiant’s grotesquely twisted
body.
His liquefying brain notwithstanding, Dyne found a moment to be
astonished, because he recognized the man instantly.
Incredible, he thought.
As the Jedi suspected, the Sith had managed to infiltrate the
highest levels of the Republic government.
The fact that the man had made no attempt to mask himself
assured and comforted Dyne that he was about to die, and shortly
after the realization, he did.
Where is the Chancellor?” Shaak Ti demanded of the three Red
Guards stationed outside the entrance to Palpatine’s suite in 500
Republica.
Alongside her hurried Stass Allie, one hand on the hilt of her
lightsaber. In their adamant wake followed four members of the
building’s small army of security personnel, who had escorted the
Jedi women from a midlevel skydock to the penthouse level.
Despite having been notified of their arrival, the imposing Red
Guards kept their force pikes raised in defensive postures.
“Where?” Stass Allie said, making it clear that she was going to get
past them, one way or another.
Shaak Ti had her hand raised to part the doors with a Force wave
when the guards lowered their pikes and stepped aside.
One punched a code into a wall panel, and the pair of burnished
doors opened.
“This way,” the same guard said, gesturing the Jedi inside.
A broad hallway lined with sculptures and holo-art images led into
the suite itself, which, like Palpatine’s chambers in the Senate Office
Building, was predominantly red. There was no telling how large the
suite was, but the exterior wall of the vast main room followed the
curve of the building’s crown and looked down on patchy clouds,
typical of those that gathered around the building in late afternoon.
Distant autonavigation lanes—transverse, and to and from orbit—
were motionless with stalled traffic. Between them and 500
Republica hovered two LAAT gunships and a small flock of patrol
skimmers.
A distinct disturbance at the crest of the Senate District’s defensive
umbrella meant that continued bombardment by Separatist forces
had rendered the shield permeable. Beyond the superhot edge of the
shield, light flashed within banks of gray clouds.
Lightning or plasma, Shaak Ti told herself.
Scarcely acknowledging her presence, Palpatine paced into the
room like a caged animal, hands clasped behind his back, Senatorial
robes trailing along the richly carpeted floor.
Additional Red Guards and several of Palpatine’s advisers stood
watching him, some with comlinks plugged into their ears, others
with devices Shaak Ti understood to be vital to the continued
operation of the Republic military. Should anything befall the
Chancellor, authority to initiate battle campaigns and issue war
codes would pass temporarily to Speaker of the Senate, Mas Amedda,
who, Shaak Ti had learned, was already safely ensconced in a
hardened bunker deep beneath the Great Rotunda.
She couldn’t help noticing that Pestage and Isard—two of
Palpatine’s closest advisers—looked nervous.
“Why is he still here?” Stass Allie directed at Isard.
Isard made his lips a thin line. “Ask him yourself.”
Shaak Ti practically had to plant herself in Palpatine’s path to get
his attention.
“Supreme Chancellor, we need to escort you to shelter.”
They were not strangers. Palpatine had personally commended her
for her actions at Geonosis, Kamino, Dagu, Brentaal IV, and
Centares.
He stopped briefly to regard her, then swung around and paced
away from her. “Master Ti, while I appreciate your concern, I’ve no
need of rescue. As I’ve made abundantly plain to my advisers and
protectors, I feel that my place is here, where I can best communicate
with our commanders. If I were to go anywhere, it would be to the
holding office.”
“Chancellor, communications will be clearer from the bunker,”
Pestage said.
Isard added: “All those familiarization drills you so despised were
conducted for just this scenario, sir.”
Palpatine sent him a skewered grin. “Practice and reality are
different matters. The Supreme Chancellor of the Galactic Senate
does not hide from enemies of the Republic. Can I be any clearer?”
The fact that Palpatine was flustered, confused, possibly frightened
was obvious. But when Shaak Ti attempted to read him through the
Force, she found it difficult to get a sense of what he was truly
feeling.
“Chancellor, I’m sorry,” Stass Allie chimed in, “but the Jedi are
obliged to make this decision for you.”
He swung to her. “I thought you answered to me!”
She remained unfazed. “We answer first to the Republic, and
safeguarding you is tantamount to safeguarding the Republic.”
Palpatine deployed his signature penetrating gaze. “And what will
you do should I refuse? Use the Force to drag me from my quarters?
Pit your lightsabers against the weapons of my guards, who are also
sworn to safeguard me?”
Shaak Ti traded looks with one of the guards, wishing she could
see through the face shield of his red cowl. The situation was
becoming dangerous. A shiver born in the Force moved her to glance
out the window.
“Supreme Chancellor,” Pestage was saying. “You must listen to
reason—”
“Reason?” Palpatine snapped. He aimed a finger toward the
window. “Have you gazed into our once tranquil skies? Is there
anything reasonable about what’s occurring there?”
“All the more reason to move you to safety as quickly as possible,”
Isard said. “So that you conduct Coruscant’s defense from a
hardened site.”
Palpatine stared at him. “In other words, you agree with the Jedi.”
“We do, sir,” Isard said.
“And you?” Palpatine asked the captain of his guards.
The guard nodded.
“Then all of you are in error.” Palpatine stormed to the window.
“Perhaps you need to take a closer look—”
Before a further word could fly from his mouth, Shaak Ti and Stass
Allie were in motion; Shaak Ti tackling Palpatine to the floor, while
Allie ignited her blade and brought it vertically in front of her.
Without warning, the gunships closest to 500 Republica were
lanced by plasma bolts. Their door gunners blown into midair, the
two ships veered and began to fall through the clouds, trailing
plumes of fire and thick black smoke.
“Unhand me!” Palpatine said. “How dare you?”
Shaak Ti kept him pinned to the floor and called her lightsaber
into her hand.
A shrill sound overrode the window’s noise cancellation feature,
and a Separatist assault craft rose into view from somewhere below
the suite. Crowded at the side hatches and ready to deploy stood a
band of battle droids and others. As the craft hovered closer to the
window Shaak Ti gaped in disbelief.
Grievous!
“Down!” Stass Allie shouted a moment before the entire window
wall blew inward, filling the air with permaglass pebbles. Through
the shattered window, droids leapt into the room, opening up with
blaster rifles.
Stass Allie stood immobile in the rush of wind, noise, and blaster
bolts. Six Red Guards raced to her side, their activated force pikes
humming in concert with Allie’s lightsaber. Droids fell armless,
legless, headless before they made it two meters into the room.
Blaster bolts deflected by Allie’s flashing blue blade blazed out of the
window opening, ripping into the other droids waiting to hurdle the
gap between craft and building.
For a moment Shaak Ti was certain that Allie was going to throw
herself aboard the hovering gunboat, but there were simply too many
droids standing in the way. Keeping Palpatine in a crouch, she
grabbed a handful of his robes and began to guide him deeper into
the room, her upraised lightsaber parrying bolts that ricocheted from
the walls and ceiling.
Beaten back, the battle droids broke off their attack. Outside the
window, the gunboat was taking heavy fire from a surround of patrol
skimmers. As Allie and the Red Guards were felling the final few
droids, the Separatist craft dropped back into the clouds, with bolts
from the skimmers chasing it.
Releasing Palpatine to the custody of two guards, Shaak Ti raced to
the window and gazed down into the clouds. By then, there was little
to see but angry exchanges of cyan and crimson light.
She turned to face Isard. “Alert Homeworld Security that General
Grievous has broken through the perimeter.”
Elsewhere in the room, Pestage was helping Palpatine to his feet.
“Ready now, sir?”
Palpatine returned a wide-eyed nod.
“These familiarization drills you’ve been conducting,” Stass Allie
started to say.
Isard gestured to one of the side rooms. “The suite is equipped
with a secret turbolift that serves a secure, midlevel skydock. An
armored gunship is standing by to transport the Chancellor to a
bunker complex in the Sah’c District.”
“Negative,” Shaak Ti said, shaking her head. “Grievous knew
enough to come here. We have to assume that the escape route has
been compromised, as well.”
“We can’t just take him to a public shelter,” Isard said.
“No,” Shaak Ti agreed. “But there are other ways to reach the
bunker complex.”
“Why not use Republica’s private turbolifts,” one of the security
guards suggested. “Ride them to the basement levels and you’ll have
access to any number of landing platforms.”
Stass Allie nodded, then glanced at Palpatine. “Supreme
Chancellor, your guards are going to encircle you. You are not to
attempt to leave that circle under any circumstances. Do you
understand?”
Palpatine nodded. “I’ll do whatever you say.”
Allie waited until the Red Guards had gathered around him. “Now
—quickly!”
When everyone had moved into the hallway, Shaak Ti used her
comlink to find Mace Windu.
“Mace, Grievous is onworld,” she said the moment she heard his
voice.
The response was noisy but intelligible. “I just heard.”
“The Chancellor’s escape route may be in jeopardy,” she
continued. “We’re heading for Republica’s sub-basements. Can you
meet us there?”
“Kit and I are nearby.”
Pressed into the turbolift with Stass Allie, Palpatine’s guards and
advisers, and Republica’s security personnel, Shaak Ti watched the
display tick off the floors.
No one spoke until the car had reached the first sub-level.
“Don’t stop,” Shaak Ti told the security man closest to the controls.
“The deeper we go, the better.”
“All the way to the bottom?” the man asked.
She nodded. “All the way to the bottom.”
Again.
The turbolift deposited them not far from where she had been
earlier, though on the opposite side of the tunnel leading to the east
skydock. As they hurried for the tunnel, Shaak Ti took a moment to
survey the huge space for some sign of Captain Dyne’s team.
Considering all that had happened since she left, it was likely that
Dyne and Commander Valiant had curtailed the search for Sidious’s
hideaway. Or perhaps they were still at it, somewhere in the subbasement. Just short of entering the tunnel, she caught a glance of a
bright silver protocol droid that might have been TC-16 hastening
toward the exit to the west skydock.
The tunnel was darker than it should have been at that time of day,
and the lower reaches of the canyon were darker still.
“Wait here,” Shaak Ti instructed the Red Guards and Palpatine
when they had reached the mouth of the tunnel.
Stass Allie strode to the center of the platform and gazed up at the
buildings that loomed on all sides. “Grievous’s forces must have
destroyed the orbital mirror that feeds this sector.”
Shaak Ti looked straight up at the sliver of sky.
“The shield is down. They must have taken out the generator.”
Allie blew out her breath. “I’ll find an appropriate vehicle to
confiscate.”
Shaak Ti laid a hand on her upper arm. “Too risky. We should
remain as close to ground as possible.”
Allie indicated the stairway that led to the mag-lev platform. “The
train won’t take us to the bunker complex, but close enough.”
Shaak Ti smiled at her and reactivated the comlink.
“Mace,” she said when he answered. “Another change in plans …”
Dragging himself out from under plasteel girders and chunks of
ferrocrete, Count Dooku came shakily to his feet and gazed in
astonished disbelief at the shambles of the control room. Had the
containment dome been so weak that it had succumbed to flurries of
ricocheting blaster bolts, or had Skywalker’s voiced rage actually
called the ceiling down?
Had Dooku not leapt forcefully at the last moment, he might have
been buried, as the two Jedi were, somewhere below, in the expanse
of rubble that covered the archive room. He was certain that they had
survived. But if nothing else they were trapped, which had been the
intent from the start.
But Skywalker … Assuming that he had grown powerful enough to
have collapsed the dome, the end result was simply further evidence
that he would someday undo himself. Wasn’t it? Because admitting
to any alternative explanation meant accepting that Skywalker was
potentially a greater threat to the Sith than anyone realized.
Initially, it had cheered him to observe that Skywalker and Kenobi
had finally learned to fight together; to see how powerful they had
become in partnership. Complementing each other’s strengths,
compensating for each other’s weaknesses. Kenobi making full use of
his inherent discretion to balance young Skywalker’s inattentive
rowdiness. He could have watched them until the light faded on fair
Tythe. And he wished that General Grievous could have been there to
witness the display for himself.
Now he wasn’t so sure.
What if it should all come crashing down? he found himself
thinking, as he dusted himself off and raced to exit the ruined
facility.
What if Grievous was outwitted and destroyed at Coruscant?
Sidious, apprehended and defeated? What if the Jedi should
triumph, after all?
What would become of his dream of a galaxy brought under
eminent stewardship?
On Vjun, Yoda had implied that the Jedi Temple would always be
open to Dooku’s return … But, no. There was no turning back from
the dark side, especially from the depths in which he had swum. Was
there, then, a life of retirement somewhere in the galaxy for the
former Count Dooku of Serenno?
So much rested on what would take place over the next few
standard days.
So much rested on whether Lord Sidious’s plan could succeed on
all fronts—even though forced to unfold hastily, because of a foolish
oversight by Nute Gunray.
Outside, under Tythe’s yellow-gray sky, his sloop was waiting, and
standing alongside it the ship’s pilot droid.
“A recorded message,” the droid announced. “From General
Grievous.”
“Play it!” Dooku said as he hurried up the sloop’s aft boarding
ramp and into the instrument-filled main hold.
A paused holoimage of the cyborg floated in blue light.
Throwing off his dusty cape, Dooku paced while the FA-4 triggered
the recording to replay.
“Lord Tyranus,” Grievous said, in motion suddenly and
genuflecting. “Supreme Chancellor Palpatine will soon be ours.”
Dooku exhaled in satisfaction. “And just in time,” he muttered.
As if recalled to life, he positioned himself on the transmission grid
and sent a simple return message: “General, I will join you shortly.”
Padmé’s eyes fluttered open.
Into focus swam the faintly smiling face of Mon Mothma.
“No sleeping on the job, Senator,” Mon Mothma said, as if from
underwater. “We have to get you out of here.”
Padmé took stock of herself; realized that she was reclined in the
rear seat of Stass Allie’s skimmer. Her head was pillowed on Mon
Mothma’s left arm, and her ears felt as if they were plugged with
cotton.
“How long—”
“Just for a moment,” Mon Mothma said in the same watery tone.
“I don’t think you struck your head. You were fine after the crash.
Then you fainted. Can you move?”
Padmé sat up and saw that the skimmer’s safety mechanisms had
deployed. Light-headed but unhurt, she brushed her hair from her
face. “I can barely hear you.”
Mon Mothma regarded her in knowing silence, then extended a
hand to help her climb from the craft. “Padmé, you have to be
careful. Quickly, now.”
She nodded. “Crashing wasn’t exactly on my agenda.”
Mon Mothma hurried her away from the skimmer, to where Bail
and C-3PO were hiding behind the blockish pedestal of a modernistic
sculpture.
“Master Allie doesn’t strike me as someone who will sue for
damages,” the droid was saying.
Still in a daze, Padmé grasped that they had skidded into the plaza
that fronted the Embassy Mall, taking out a large holosign and three
news kiosks along the way. Bail’s skill had somehow kept them from
mowing down pedestrians, who had apparently scattered on first
sight of the nose-diving ship. Or perhaps at sight of the craft that had
fallen to Separatist fire ahead of the skimmer—a military police
vehicle, similar to a Naboo Gian speeder, tipped on its side against
the façade of the mall and belching smoke. Sprawled on the plaza
close to the vehicle were the charred corpses of three clone troopers.
Reality reasserted itself in a rush of deafening noise, flashing light,
and acrid smells. From nearby came anguished moans and terrified
screams; from the tiered heights above the plaza, distant discharges
of artillery. Higher still, plasma bolts raked the sky; fire bloomed,
detonations thundered.
Padmé saw a smear of blood on Bail’s cheek. “You’re hurt—”
“It’s nothing,” he said. “Besides, we have more to worry about.”
She followed his grim gaze, and understood immediately why
Coruscanti were fleeing the pedestrian skybridge that linked the mall
to the midlevel entrances of the Senate Hospital. Five Vulture droids
had alit on the far side of the span and reconfigured to patrol mode.
Four-legged gargoyles, with heads deployed forward and sensor
slits red as arterial blood, they were striding through Hospital Plaza,
sowing destruction. Their four laser cannons were aimed downward,
but from paired launchers in their semicircular fuselage flew
torpedoes aimed at air taxis, craft attempting to dock at the hospital’s
emergency platforms, the tunnel entrances to the Senate shelters …
Republic LAATs had dropped from the Senate Plaza to engage the
three-and-a-half-meter-tall droids but were maintaining a wary
distance just now, pilots and gunners clearly worried about adding
energy weapons or EMP missiles to the chaos.
“Xi Char monstrosities,” Mon Mothma said.
Padmé remembered standing helplessly at the tall windows of
Theed Palace, watching squadrons of Vulture fighters fill the sky, like
cave creatures loosed on Naboo by darkness …
Caught in the crossfire, pedestrians had raced across the
skybridge, hoping to find sanctuary in the Embassy Mall—midlevel
in the dome-topped Nicandra Counterrevolutionary Signalmen’s
Memorial Building—but thick security grates had been lowered over
the entrances, leaving crowds of Coruscanti to scramble for whatever
cover could be found.
Padmé felt faint once more.
Huddled, frightened, panicked masses of Coruscanti were
suddenly getting a taste of what the inhabitants of Jabiim, Brentaal,
and countless other worlds had faced during the past three years.
Caught up in a war of ideologies, often by dint of circumstance or
location. Caught between the forces of a droid army led by a selfstyled revolutionary and a cyborg butcher, and an army of vat-grown
soldiers led by a monastic order of Jedi Knights who had once been
the galaxy’s peacekeepers.
Caught in the middle, with no allegiance to either side.
It was tragic and senseless, and she might have broken down and
cried if her current circumstances had been different. She felt sick at
heart, and in despair for the future of sentient life.
“Palpatine will never live this down,” Mon Mothma was saying.
“Committing so many of our ships and troopers to the Outer Rim
sieges. As if this war he is so intent on winning could never come to
Coruscant.”
Bail frowned in sympathy. “Not only will he live it down, he’ll
profit from it. The Senate will be blamed for voting to escalate the
sieges, and while we’re mired in accusations and counteraccusations
of accountability, Palpatine will quietly accrue more and more
power. Without realizing it, the Separatists have played right into his
hands by launching this attack.”
Padmé wanted to argue with him but didn’t have the strength.
“They’re all mad,” Bail continued. “Dooku, Grievous, Gunray,
Palpatine.”
Mon Mothma nodded sadly. “The Jedi could have stopped this
war. Now they’re Palpatine’s pawns.”
Padmé squeezed her eyes shut. Even if she managed to summon
the strength, how could she respond, when her own husband was one
of them—a general? What had the Jedi gotten Anakin into—taking
him from Tatooine, from his youth, his mother? And yet hadn’t she
done as much as anyone to encourage him to remain a Jedi; to heed
the tutelage of Obi-Wan, Mace, and the others; to perpetuate the lie
that was their secret life as husband and wife?
She hugged herself.
What had she gotten Anakin into? What had she gotten both of
them into?
Bail’s voice snapped her from self-pity.
“They’re coming.” He aimed a finger across the plaza. “They’re
coming across the bridge.”
From somewhere in the Vultures’ droid brains had come a
revelation that the pedestrian skyway offered a better vantage for
targeting buildings and craft to both sides of the kilometer-deep
canyon. More important, the gunships were even less likely to fire on
them there, lest they destroy the span and send it plummeting to the
busy thoroughfares and mag-lev lines two hundred stories below.
“Perhaps if we throw ourselves on the mercy of the owners of the
mall, they will raise the security grate,” C-3PO started to say.
Bail looked at Padmé and Mon Mothma. “We have to keep those
droids on the far side of the bridge, so the gunships can take them
out.”
Mon Mothma glanced at the overturned military craft. “I see a way
to try.”
The craft sat scarcely fifty meters from the base of the sculpture.
Without further word, the three of them hurried for it.
“What could I have been thinking?” C-3PO shouted as he watched
them search the craft for weapons. “It can never be the easy answer!”
The three humans returned momentarily, carrying three blaster
rifles.
“Not much power left,” Bail said, checking one of them. “Yours?”
“Low on blaster gas,” Padmé said.
Mon Mothma ejected the powerpack from hers. “Empty.”
Bail nodded glumly. “We’ll have to make do.”
Hunkering down behind the pedestal, he and Padmé took careful
aim on the closest of the walking droids.
By then three had started onto the skyway, firing at random.
Exploding against the façades of buildings above and below,
torpedoes sent slabs of durasteel-reinforced ferrocrete avalanching
onto plazas, landing platforms, and balconies, burying scores of
hapless Coruscanti.
“Be prepared to move as soon as we fire,” Bail said. He indicated
one of the kiosks that had survived the crashes of both speeders.
“There’s our first cover.”
Padmé centered the lead droid in the blaster’s targeting reticle and
squeezed the trigger. Her initial bursts did little more than catch the
droid’s attention, but subsequent bolts from both blasters started to
score hits on vital components. The droid actually retreated a couple
of steps toward Hospital Plaza, only to launch a trio of torpedoes
straight across the skyway.
Padmé and company were already in motion. One torpedo hit the
pedestal, blowing it and the sculpture to fragments. A second slagged
what was left of Stass Allie’s skimmer. The third detonated against
the lowered security grate, blowing a gaping hole into the mall.
Pedestrians to both sides hastened for it, fighting with one another to
be first through the smoking maw. Padmé thought that one of the
Vultures would target them, but in their moment of inattention, the
droids had left themselves open to strafing runs by the gunships.
Converging beams of brilliant light streaked from the fire dishes of
the LAATs’ wing- and armature-mounted ball turrets, and staccato
bursts erupted from the forward guns.
Two droids exploded.
One turned to answer the volleys, but not in time. Missiles from
the gunships’ mass-drive launchers took off the droid’s left legs, then
the head, then blew the rest clear across the plaza. The remaining
two Vultures skittered onto the skyway to increase their odds of
survival.
Bail and Padmé laid down steady lines of fire, but the droids were
undeterred.
“And I thought the Senate was a battlefield!” Mon Mothma said.
The sight of smoke curling from holes in the lead droid’s fuselage
seemed to invigorate the one behind. Driving Padmé and the others
in search of new cover with a single torpedo, the droid scurried
forward, edging around its stricken comrade and stepping brazenly
into the mall plaza, red sensors gleaming.
A gunship made a quick pass, but couldn’t find a clear field of fire.
“I’m out,” Bail said, dropping his rifle.
Padmé checked her weapon’s display screen. “Same.”
C-3PO shook his head. “How will I ever explain this to ArtooDetoo?”
They broke for cover a final time, hoping to throw themselves
through the ragged hole in the still-smoking security grate, but the
droid hurried to intercept them; then, in seeming sadistic delight,
began to back the four of them against the wall of the Nicandra
Building.
A rage began to build in Padmé, born of instincts as old as life
itself. She was on the verge of hurling herself against the towering
machine, ripping the sensors from its teardrop-shaped head, when
the droid came to a sudden halt, obviously in reception of some
remote communication. Retracting its head and stiffening its scissorlike legs into wings, it turned and launched itself over the edge of the
plaza into the canyon below.
The droid on the skyway did the same, even with two gunships in
close pursuit.
Padmé was first to reach the skyway railing. Far below, the Senate
District mag-lev was racing south toward the skytunnel that would
take it through the kilometer-wide Heorem Complex and on into the
wealthy Sah’c District. The two Vulture droids were swooping down
to join ranks with a Separatist gunboat that was already chasing the
train.
How had Grievous known to attack 500 Republica? Mace asked
himself as the mag-lev rushed at three hundred kilometers per hour
toward the skytunnel that would spirit the train from the Senate
District.
Having boarded the mag-lev at its 500 Republica platform, he, Kit
Fisto, Shaak Ti, and Stass Allie were in the car the Supreme
Chancellor’s Red Guards had commandeered—second in a train of
some twenty cars. Through a gap in the protective circle the guards
had forged, Mace caught a glimpse of Palpatine, his head of wavy
gray hair lowered in what might have been anguish or deep
concentration.
How had Grievous known? Mace asked himself.
Many Coruscanti knew that Palpatine resided in 500 Republica,
but the location of his suite was a well-kept secret. More important,
how had Grievous known that Palpatine wasn’t to be found in either
of his offices?
Not everything could be traced to Dooku.
It was conceivable that Dooku had furnished Grievous with data
on hyperlanes that skimmed the outer limits of the Deep Core. That
much, Dooku could have pilfered from the Jedi archives before he
left the Order, presumably when he was erasing mentions of Kamino
from the data banks. Similarly, Dooku could have supplied Grievous
with the orbital coordinates of specific communications satellites and
mirrors, or with tactical information regarding the location of
dedicated shield generators on the surface. But Palpatine had only
just been elected Supreme Chancellor when Dooku left Coruscant to
return to Serenno, and back then, some thirteen years ago, Palpatine
had relocated to a high-rise tower close to the Senate Building.
So how had Grievous known to go to 500 Republica?
Sidious?
If it was true that hundreds of Senators had, for a time, been under
the Sith Lord’s influence, then he may have had access to the highest
levels of confidential information. As many on the Jedi Council
feared, Sidious’s network of agents and assets might have infiltrated
the Republic military command itself. Which suggested that the
sneak attack on Coruscant may have been years in the planning!
Mace caught another glimpse of Palpatine, insulated by the
flowing red robes of his handpicked bodyguards.
This was hardly the time to question him about his closest
confidants.
But Mace would make it his business to find the time later.
Briefly, he wondered what had become of Captain Dyne’s team.
Surmising that Dyne had called off the search for Sidious shortly
after the attack had commenced, Intelligence hadn’t dispatched a
second search team—aimed at locating Dyne and Valiant—until
neither of them had been heard from, even after communications
had been restored to the Senate District.
Shaak Ti hadn’t seen them when she and Palpatine’s protectors
had whisked the Supreme Chancellor through 500 Republica’s subbasement.
So had Dyne and the commandos fallen victim to Grievous’s
attack? Were they trapped somewhere under a crashed cargo ship or
tons of ferrocrete rubble?
Yet another ill-timed concern, Mace thought.
The mag-lev’s other cars were packed cheek-to-jowl with
Coruscanti attempting to flee the Senate and Financial Districts.
Palpatine’s guards would have commandeered the entire train if
Palpatine hadn’t intervened, refusing to allow it. Shaak Ti had told
Mace and Kit about the Supreme Chancellor’s earlier reluctance to
leave his suite. Mace didn’t know what to make of it. But now at least
they were on the way to the bunker. The mag-lev line didn’t run past
the complex, but the first stop in Sah’c was close to a system of
skyways and turbolifts that did.
Light filtering into the car through the tinted windows dimmed.
The mag-lev was entering the Heorem Skytunnel, a broad burrow
that accommodated not only the speeding train, but also opposing
lanes of autonavigation and free-travel traffic, passing through
several of the Senate District’s largest buildings. Lanes leading south
—away from the district, and off to the right side of the mag-lev—
were crawling with public transports and air taxis. By contrast, the
northbound lanes were almost empty, the result of traffic having
been rerouted well before it reached the Senate District.
A blur of light off to the left-hand side of the car caught Mace’s eye,
and he hurried to the closest window. Streaking southbound in the
northbound free-travel lane, two droid fighters were trying to
overtake the train. Before Mace could utter a word of warning,
cannon fire from one of the twin-winged ships stitched a broken line
of holes across the blunt nose of a transport in the autonavigation
lane. Instantly the transport exploded, savaging nearby vehicles with
shrapnel and nearly rocking the mag-lev from its elevated guide rails.
Screams issued from Coruscanti wedged into the cars to the front
and rear of Palpatine’s.
“Vulture fighters!” Mace told the Jedi and Red Guards.
Leaning low at the window, he saw one of the droids climb over
the mag-lev, only to descend on the opposite side of the train in the
midst of the free-travel lane, initiating a succession of collisions that
flung speeders, taxis, and buses all over the skytunnel. Two vehicles
careened into the train, only to rebound back into the travel lane,
starting a second series of fatal crashes. Racing alongside Palpatine’s
car, the same droid responsible for the collisions surged into a steep
climb and disappeared from view.
Not a moment later an earsplitting sound reached Mace from
somewhere in the rear of the train and overhead. Behind the tinted
glass, sparks showered down the rounded sides of the car, and the
smell of molten metal wafted from the ventilation grilles. A tumult of
terrified cries rose from the car directly behind Palpatine’s, and
hands and feet began to pound against the passageway door.
Part of a group of mag-lev security personnel stationed there, a
Weequay looked to Mace.
“We won’t be able to hold them back!”
In turn, Mace whirled to Shaak Ti and Allie. “Move the Chancellor
into the forward car!”
Shaak Ti regarded him as if he had lost his mind. “It’s packed,
Mace!”
“I know that. Find a way!”
He gestured for Kit Fisto, and the two of them shouldered through
the cluster of security personnel at the rear of the car and activated
their lightsabers. Faced with the purple and blue blades, passengers
on the far side of the door’s window began to retreat into the
vestibule, battling with those behind them who were attempting to
press into the forward car.
When there was space enough in the vestibule, Mace instructed
the Weequay to unlock the door. Without hesitation he and Kit
dashed through the vestibule and on into the rear car, where most of
the mixed-species passengers were heaped atop seats on both sides
of the wide aisle. Wind howled through the car from a jagged rend
that had been opened in the roof, and through which had dropped
half a dozen infantry droids.
Mace allowed himself a moment of bewilderment. Since the battle
droids couldn’t have been delivered by the droid fighters, there had
to be a third Separatist craft racing alongside the train.
The battle droids opened fire.
To many of the passengers all but fused to the tinted windows, the
situation must have seemed hopeless. Not because the two Jedi
couldn’t deflect the hail of blaster bolts aimed at them, but because
they couldn’t deflect them without sending some into or through
people in the car. But those passengers failed to recognize that one of
the Jedi was Mace Windu—rumored to have single-handedly
destroyed a seismic tank on Dantooine—and that the other was Kit
Fisto, Nautolan hero of the Battle of Mon Calamari.
Together they returned some of the sizzling bolts into the
advancing droids. Others they sent whizzing through the opening in
the roof, managing in the process to catch one of the Vultures in the
belly and send it spiraling to its death somewhere below the mag-lev
line. Sparks and smoke whirled through the car, and parts of spindly
arms and legs flew about unavoidably, but Mace and Kit called on the
Force to control even those. A few Coruscanti were struck, but,
against all odds, the Jedi saw to it that none was critically injured.
No sooner had the final droid dropped than Mace leapt straight up
through the rend, landing in a crouch on the roof of the next car
down the line, holding himself in place by the Force with the wind
whipping at the back of his shaved skull and coarse tunic. Senses on
alert, he saw a Separatist craft drop down behind the final car in the
line. Farther away, but quickly making up the distance, flew two
Republic gunships.
Instinctively he glanced to the right just as the second Vulture
droid was rocketing into view. Seeing him, the droid sprayed the roof
of the car with cannon fire. Mace turned into the powerful wind and
focused all his intention on a front flip that carried him back through
the rend. The Vulture veered, positioning itself directly over the
laceration its partner had opened, and reorienting its wing cannons.
In what would surely have been a futile act, Mace raised his
lightsaber.
But the expected cannon blast never arrived. Wings clipped and
repulsors damaged by missiles fired from the gunships, the Vulture
slammed down onto the roof of the speeding train, then rolled out of
sight.
Deactivating their blades, Mace and Kit rushed into the forward
car, which was now filled with Palpatine’s advisers and those
passengers the Jedi women and Red Guards had relocated from the
train’s lead car. Mace and Kit continued to squirm forward, arriving
in the Supreme Chancellor’s car just as the mag-lev was emerging
from the skytunnel. The sun was going down, and the tall buildings
that rose to the west cast enormous shadows across the city canyon
and the busy thoroughfares far below the cantilevered mag-lev line.
In the middle of the car, Palpatine stood at the center of the
cordon the Red Guards had formed around him. And at a fixed-pane
window they had deliberately shattered, Shaak Ti and Stass Allie
were gazing toward the rear of the train.
“Those fighters could easily have derailed us with a torpedo,”
Shaak Ti said as Mace and Kit approached.
Mace leaned partway out the window, eyes searching the canyon.
“And battle droids don’t just drop from the sky. There’s a third craft.”
Kit’s bulging black eyes indicated Palpatine. “They want to take
him alive.”
The words had scarcely left his mouth when something hit the
train with sufficient force to whip everyone from one side of the car
to the other, then back again. The Red Guards were just regaining
their balance when the roof began to resound with the cadence of
heavy, clanging footfalls, advancing from the rear of the train.
“Grievous,” Mace grumbled.
Kit glanced at him. “Here we go again.”
Hurrying into the vestibule between the two lead cars, they
launched themselves to the roof. Three cars distant marched General
Grievous and two of his elite droids, their capes snapping behind
them in the wind, pulse-tipped batons angled across their barrel
chests.
Farther back, clamped by animal-like claws to the roof of the train,
was the gunboat from which the frightful trio had been released.
Without pausing, Grievous drew two lightsabers from inside his
billowing cloak. By the time they were ignited, Mace was already on
and all over the cyborg, batting away at the two blades, swinging low
at Grievous’s artificial legs, thrusting at his skeletal face.
The lightsabers thrummed and hissed, meeting one another in
bursts of dazzling light. In a corner of Mace’s mind he wondered to
which Jedi Grievous’s blades had belonged. Just as the Force was
keeping Mace from being blown from the mag-lev’s roof, magnetism
of some sort was keeping the general fastened in place. For the
cyborg, though, the coherence hindered as much as it helped,
whereas Mace never remained in one place for very long. Again and
again the three blades joined, in snarling attacks and parries.
Grievous was well trained in the Jedi arts. Mace could recognize
the hand of Dooku in the general’s training and technique. His
strikes were as forceful as any Mace had ever had to counter, and his
speed was astonishing.
But he didn’t know Vaapad—the technique of dark flirtation in
which Mace excelled.
To the rear of the car, where Grievous’s pair of MagnaGuards had
made the mistake of pitting themselves against Kit Fisto, the
Nautolan’s blade was a cyclone of blazing blue light. Resistant to the
energy outpourings of a lightsaber, the phrik alloy staffs were potent
weapons, but like any weapon they needed to find their target, and
Kit simply wasn’t allowing that. In moves a Twi’lek dancer might
envy, he spun around the guards, claiming a limb from both with
each rotation: left legs, right arms, right legs …
The speed of the train saw to the rest, ultimately whisking the
droids into the canyon like insects blown from the windscreen of a
speeder bike.
The loss of his confederates was noted by whatever computers
were slaved to Grievous’s organic brain, but the loss neither
distracted nor slowed him. His sole setting was attack. Successful at
analyzing Mace’s lightsaber style, those same computers suggested
that Grievous alter his stance and posture, along with the angle of his
parries, ripostes, and thrusts.
The result wasn’t Vaapad, but it was close enough, and Mace
wasn’t interested in prolonging the contest any longer than
necessary.
Crouching low, he angled the blade downward and slashed,
guiding it through the roof of the car, perpendicular to Grievous’s
stalwart advance. Mace saw by the surprised look in the cyborg’s
reptilian eyes that, for all his strength, dexterity, and resolve, the
living part of him wasn’t always in perfect sync with his alloy servos.
Clearly, Grievous—onetime courageous commander of sentient
troops—realized what Mace had done and wanted to sidestep, where
General Grievous—current commander of droids and other war
machines—wanted nothing more than to impale Mace with lunging
thrusts of the paired blades.
Slipping into the gap made by Mace’s saber, Grievous’s left talon
lost magnetic purchase on the roof, and the general faltered. Mace
came out of his crouch prepared to drive his sword into Grievous’s
guts, but some last-instant firing of the general’s cybersynapses
compelled the cyborg’s torso through a swift half twist that would
have sent Mace’s head hurtling into the canyon had the maneuver
prevailed. Instead Mace leapt backward, out of the range of the
slicing blades, and Force-pushed outward, just at the instant of
Grievous’s single misstep.
Off the side of the car the general went, twisting and turning as he
fell, Mace trying to track the general’s contorted plunge, but
unsuccessfully.
Had he fallen into the canyon? Had he managed to dig his
duranium claws into the side of the car or grab hold of the mag-lev
rail itself?
Mace couldn’t take the time to puzzle it out. One hundred meters
away, the gunboat retracted its landing gear and rose from the roof
on repulsorlift power. Reckless shots from one of the pursuing
gunships obliged the Separatist craft to skew, then dive, with the
gunship following close behind.
Mace and Kit watched in awe as the two ships began to helix
forward around the speeding mag-lev, exchanging constant fire.
Climbing away from the train’s sharp nose, within which the
magnetic controls were housed, the gunboat made as if to bank west,
only to bank east at the last instant.
By then, however, the gunship—leading its target west—had
already fired.
Drilled by a swarm of deadly hyphens, the mag-lev’s control
system blew apart, and the entire train began to drop.
In the darkness, buried alive, Anakin stretched out with his feelings.
In his mind’s eye he saw Padmé stalked by a dark, towering
creature with a mechanical head, poised at the edge of a deep abyss,
her world turned upside down. A surprise attack. Opponents locked
in combat. Ground and sky filled with fire, smoke billowing in the
air, clouding everything.
Death, destruction, deceit … A labyrinth of lies. His world turned
upside down.
He shuddered, as if plunged into liquid gas. One touch would
break him into a million shards.
His fear for Padmé expanded until he couldn’t see past it. Yoda’s
voice in his ear: Fear leads to anger; anger to hatred; hatred to the
dark side …
He was as afraid to lose her as he was to hold on to her, and the
pain of that contradiction made him wish he had never been born.
There was no solace, even in the Force. As Qui-Gon had told him, he
needed to make his focus his reality. But how?
How?
Qui-Gon, who had died—even though, to his young mind, Jedi
weren’t supposed to …
Beside him, Obi-Wan stirred and coughed.
“You’re getting awfully good at destroying things,” he said. “On
Vjun, you needed a grenade to do this much damage.”
Anakin shook the vision from his mind. “I told you I was becoming
more powerful.”
“Then do us both a favor by getting us out from under all this.”
They used the Force, their hands and backs to extricate
themselves. Getting to their feet, they stood staring at each other,
dusted white head-to-toe from the debris.
“Go ahead,” Anakin said. “If you don’t say it, I will.”
“If you insist.” Obi-Wan snorted dust from his nose. “Almost
makes me nostalgic for Naos Three.”
“Once more, with feeling.”
“Some other time. Dooku, first.”
Scampering over the remains of the dome, droid parts, buried
pieces of furniture, overturned shelves of holodocuments, they raced
for the landing platform, arriving in time to see Dooku’s sloop, one
among dozens of Separatist vessels, streaking for space.
“Coward,” Obi-Wan said. “He flees.”
Anakin watched the sloop for a moment longer, then looked at
Obi-Wan. “That’s not the reason, Master. We’ve been tricked. Tythe
was never the target. We were.”
Bleeding speed and loft, the mag-lev settled hard onto the guide rail
that projected from the skyscraper-lined rim of Sah’c Canyon.
Counterpoint to the sobs and moans of the passengers, the two dozen
cars—two now with slashed-open roofs—pinged and creaked.
Balanced on the balls of their feet, Mace and Kit hooked their
lightsabers to their belts and drifted back down into the vestibule, as
gently as the Force allowed. As if buffeted by thermals, the train
swayed lazily from side to side. But with traffic halted in both
directions, the air at midlevel should have been unruffled.
A quick glance out the right side of the vestibule supplied Mace
with the explanation.
The aged, cantilevered supports anchored to the sides of the
buildings were beginning to bend under the weight of the train.
In the distance, sirens wailed and dopplered as emergency craft
hurried to render aid. Left of the stricken mag-lev, two enormous
repulsorlift platforms were making a careful approach. Waiting for
the train to quiet, Mace and Kit stood like statues in the vestibule.
When the rocking motion had subsided somewhat, they pressed the
release stud for the passageway door and eased themselves into the
lead car.
The train continued to protest its peculiar circumstance with an
assortment of stressful sounds, but the sagging supports held.
Held for a few seconds more.
Then, with explosive reports, the rail supports beneath the center
of the train tore away from the canyon rim, taking a lengthy portion
of the rail with them. The train V’ed into the sudden gap, and would
have plunged completely but for the fact that enough forward and
rear cars remained clasped to the rail to support the few that now
formed an inverted triangle. Even so, Coruscanti in the rear were
propelled forward by the collapse, while those in the lead cars were
jerked violently backward.
Steps into Palpatine’s car, Mace and Kit called on the Force to
prevent everyone from flailing toward the vestibule door. Farther
forward in the car, Shaak Ti and Stass Allie were keeping the
Supreme Chancellor on his feet.
Strident sounds issued from the guide rail. The mag-lev lurched,
and another two cars slipped into the V-notch, their motion adding a
sudden twist to the train that turned some of the cars onto their
sides, and sent passengers sliding and tumbling toward the tinted
windows. Coruscanti screamed in terror, bracing themselves as best
they could, or clawing at one another for support.
Centered in the Force, Mace directed all his energy toward keeping
the Red Guards and others rooted in place. He wondered if he, Kit,
Shaak Ti, and Allie—acting in concert—could support the entire
train, but dismissed the idea immediately.
They would need Yoda.
Perhaps five Yodas.
Unexpectedly, a feeling of relief flowed through him.
“The emergency repulsorlifts,” Kit said.
Once more the train lurched, but this time the cars began to level
out as antigrav repulsors levitated those that had dropped into the
notch.
By then, too, the pair of repulsorlift platforms had cozied up to the
train’s left side, and scores of emergency craft were rushing in from
all sides. Mace could feel an increasing sense of desperation sweep
through the cars as passengers grew frantic to exit. He knew that it
was only going to get worse, since none of them would be allowed to
leave until Palpatine had been moved to safety.
He and Kit did their best to make that happen as quickly as
possible. Within moments, they had ushered everyone who had been
in the lead car onto one of the platforms. Pressed in among his Red
Guards, Palpatine couldn’t even be seen. Disengaging from the maglev, the platform was moving away from the train before a single
passenger—even any of Palpatine’s advisers—could scramble out
onto its twin.
The air was filled with escort craft and gunships, two of which put
down on the platform as it was closing on the canyon’s eastern rim.
Leaping out of the craft, two platoons of commandos assumed firing
positions along the platform’s perimeter. Behind them came four
Jedi Knights, who rushed to join Shaak Ti and Stass Allie in guarding
Palpatine.
Mace recognized the more scorched of the pair of gunships as one
of two that had been in pursuit of Grievous’s gunboat. Hurrying over
to it, he signaled the pilot to raise the bubble canopy.
Cupping his hands to his mouth, he said: “What became of the
gunboat?”
“My wingmate is in pursuit, General,” the pilot said. “We’re
awaiting word.”
“Did Grievous fall from the mag-lev?”
“I was too far back to see much of anything, sir. But I didn’t see
him fall, and I didn’t see anyone on the train.”
Mace replayed the events in his mind. Saw himself Force-pushing
Grievous from the roof of the car; saw Grievous plunging over the
edge, down out of sight, toward the rail or the canyon floor. The
cyborg’s gunboat disengaging from the train, descending into the
canyon before it and the second gunship had commenced their
corkscrewing race around the mag-lev …
Mace clenched his hands, and swung to Kit. “The gunboat could
have caught him—somehow.” He gazed up at the pilot again. “Any
word yet?”
“Coming in now, sir … Sector H-Fifty-Two. My wingmate is in
close pursuit. I’d better get a move on.”
“General Fisto and I are going with you.” Mace turned to Shaak Ti,
Allie, and the four newly arrived Jedi Knights.
Shaak Ti nodded at him. “We’ll see the Chancellor the rest of the
way to the bunker.”
Shaak Ti was the last to board the gunship that would deliver
Palpatine to shelter, somewhere deep in the narrow service chasms
that fractured the exclusive Sah’c neighborhood. Encircled by the
contingent of Red Guards, Palpatine stood silently in the rear of the
troop bay. His hair and robes were mussed, and he looked pale and
feeble among his striking protectors. Stass Allie and the four Jedi
Knights Yoda had dispatched from the Temple stood just inside the
door, shoulder-to-shoulder with commandos and government
agents. Shaak Ti knew the human male Jedi and the female Twi’lek
by sight, but she couldn’t recall ever running into the other two—a
male Talz and a male Ithorian. All four of them looked able enough,
though she hoped there would be no call for them to demonstrate
their skills.
Moments earlier, the gunship carrying Mace and Kit had banked
north, back toward the Senate District, in apparent pursuit of
Grievous’s gunboat. Palpatine’s gunship had taken off to the south,
and had immediately begun to descend. Dusk had already fallen on
the rim of the canyon. Bruised by the day’s events, Coruscant’s skies
were a swirl of blood red, orange, and deep lavender. Down below,
the buildings and thoroughfares were illuminated.
Halfway to the floor of the canyon, a gunship that had seen recent
action fell in alongside the Supreme Chancellor’s, and remained just
off to starboard and slightly astern through the numerous twists and
turns that led ultimately to the mountainous structure that served as
the bunker complex.
A final turn to the north brought the two gunships to the mouth of
a narrow urban ravine, where they hovered for the moment it took to
lower the particle shield that safeguarded the shelters, tactical and
communications centers, landing platforms, and the network of
tunnels that linked them. The complex could be reached by
alternative means—under normal circumstances, Palpatine would
have been conveyed by repulsorlift speeder through deep tunnels
that arrived from 500 Republica, the Great Rotunda, and the Senate
Office Building—but the ravine was the best way of entering from
anywhere west of the Senate or Financial Districts.
Shaak Ti didn’t allow herself to relax until the gunships had been
cleared through the shimmering screen and had been issued
approach vectors for landing.
Her relieved exhale seemed to go on and on.
The escort gunship shot ahead and was already on the pad when
Shaak Ti and the rest arrived moments later. The craft bearing the
Supreme Chancellor had scarcely touched down when the side doors
flew out and back, and the Red Guards hurried Palpatine off to a
waiting speeder. The commandos leapt out to reinforce the bunker’s
contingent of troopers.
Shaak Ti instructed the four Jedi Knights to accompany the Red
Guards, promising to join them after she and Stass Allie had
apprised the Temple of their safe arrival.
The two Jedi women watched the speeder race off into the broad
tunnel that accessed the bunker, then swung themselves down to the
landing pad. Allie grabbed her comlink and depressed the SEND
button. After several failed attempts to reach the Temple, she
glanced at Shaak Ti.
“Too much interference. Let’s move away from the ship.”
It was the interference that saved them from the explosion that
mangled and consumed the gunship. As it was, the blast set their
robes on fire and hurled them ten meters through the air. Retaining
consciousness, Shaak Ti used the momentum to propel herself
through a tucked roll that carried her almost to the edge of the
landing platform. Stass Allie lay facedown nearby. The missile that
had destroyed the gunship had been launched by the craft that had
preceded them into the ravine. That same craft’s several cannons
were firing now, laying waste to other vessels and making short work
of the troopers.
Shaak Ti saw several soldiers jump from the gunship’s doors and
move with astounding speed into the mouth of the access tunnel. She
raised herself to one knee, then sprinted to Stass Allie’s side to put
out the flames that had engulfed her cloak.
Allie stirred and raised herself on the palms of her hands.
“Stay down,” Shaak Ti warned.
As the gunship was lifting off—no doubt to gain a better vantage on
the landing platform—additional troopers appeared from somewhere
below the landing pad. Rocket-propelled grenades swarmed after the
rising craft, several of them infiltrating the vented nacelles of the
repulsorlift engines. The ensuing detonation resounded in the ravine
and cast fiery hunks of metal in all directions.
Shaak Ti curled her body and tucked her head to her chest. A wave
of intense heat washed over her and Allie, and a hail of fragments
clanged and clattered down around her.
One of the last pieces to land—not two meters from her face—was
the charred head of a battle droid.
Mace and Kit stood in the open doorway of the Republic gunship
as it threaded its way among the monads and skyscrapers of the
Senate District. Grievous’s gunboat raced ahead, darting left and
right as it fired continuously at its pursuer.
Mace backed into the gunship as bolts sizzled past the doorway,
nearly catching the underside of the starboard wing. The fact that it
had taken so little effort to track and catch up with the Separatist
craft gnawed at Mace. Neither he nor Kit could shake the feeling that
the gunboat had practically been waiting for them above the squat
Senate Building, and had only then attempted to go evasive. And yet
it had obviously eluded the original gunship that had chased it
through the Sah’c skytunnel.
Mace leaned into the hatch to the gunner’s compartment and
called up to him. “Where’s your wingmate?”
“Lost him, sir,” the gunner shouted. “He’s not anywhere on the
tactical screen.”
“The ship could have gone down,” Kit suggested.
Mace’s brow furrowed. “I don’t think so. Something’s wrong about
this.”
Overhead, missiles roared from the launchers and an explosion
boomed and echoed from the surround of buildings. Black smoke
and debris swept past the doorway, and the gunner whooped.
“We got him, sir! He’s trailing fire, and surface-bound!”
Mace and Kit leaned out the doorway in time to see the gunboat tip
to one side, then begin a rapid downward spiral.
“Stay with him, pilot!” Mace yelled.
Coiling into a city chasm east of the Senate, the craft clipped the
edge of a skydock and started to come apart. The pilot of the gunship
jinked to avoid airborne wreckage, but managed to remain in the
wake of the doomed ship. The collision with the skydock had added
an end-over-end flip to the gunboat’s spiral, and now the craft was
simply falling like a stone, straight down toward brightly illuminated
Uscru Boulevard, which was blessedly free of traffic. Fires sputtering
out, it hit the surface nose-first, cratering the street and shattering
windows in buildings to all sides.
Maintaining a safe distance from the crash site, the gunship pilot
engaged the repulsorlift engines and hovered to a landing at the
frayed edge of the impact crater. Mace, Kit, and a dozen commandos
jumped to the hot ground to secure the area. Crowds of startled
onlookers formed almost immediately, and the sirens of emergency
vehicles began to wail in the distance.
Lightsabers ignited, Mace and Kit strode along the perimeter of
the shallow well, alert to the slightest movements. The crumpled ship
had been torn open from bow to stern along one side, and they had
clear views into every cabin space. Neither Grievous nor any of his
elite guards were anywhere to be found.
Only battle droids: slagged, mangled, twisted into peculiar shapes.
“I can accept that Grievous might have fallen from the mag-lev,”
Mace said, “but not that he would have included only two of his elite
on a mission like this.”
Kit gazed at the wedge of night sky. “There could be a second
assault craft.”
“Pilot!” Mace called toward the gunship. “Comlink the Supreme
Chancellor’s bunker, and arrange for us to be cleared through the
shield.”
Grievous and six MagnaGuards cut a bloody swath through the
broad corridors that led ultimately to Palpatine’s sanctuary. Republic
soldiers—cloned and otherwise—fell to Grievous’s lightsabers and
the deadly staffs of his elite. Behind them, the firefight at the landing
platform was raging. If nothing else, Grievous told himself, the clash
would tie up two of the Jedi and dozens of troopers.
Thus far, things were still on target—if not proceeding according to
plan.
At Palpatine’s apartment, Grievous had managed to fool everyone
by placing the gunboat on display, then clandestinely transferring
himself and his combat droids into the Republic gunship Lord
Tyranus had promised would be waiting for them. He had been
forced to improvise when Palpatine’s protectors had opted to follow
an alternate route to the bunker, and he had enjoyed chasing the
mag-lev—if not the brief duel on the roof of the train car.
Tyranus had warned him about Mace Windu’s prowess with a
blade, and now he understood. His literal “misstep” had shamed
him, and he was grateful that the two MagnaGuards that had fought
at his side had not survived to bear witness to it. Had he not
managed at the last instant to grab hold of the mag-lev rail and be
retrieved by the borrowed gunship, all the efforts the Banking Clan
had undertaken to have him rebuilt would have been for nothing.
But as it happened he was now about to give the Separatists more
than their credits’ worth. Perhaps a means to proclaim themselves
victors of the war.
Grievous and five remaining droids completed their march to the
bunker, deflecting the fire of three troopers guarding the entrance,
then decapitating them. Hexagonal, the sturdy portal was impervious
to blaster bolts, radiation, or electromagnetic pulse. Grievous was
well aware that his lightsabers were capable of burning through the
door. While doing so would have heightened the drama of his entry,
he did the next best thing.
He used the code Tyranus had provided.
“Under no circumstances are you to harm the Chancellor,” he
exhorted his elite, while layers of the thick hatch were retracting.
The astonishment registered by Palpatine and his quartet of Jedi
Knights assured Grievous that he could not have made a more
dramatic entry. A large desk dominated the circular room, and banks
of communications consoles formed the circumference. Centered in
the curved wall opposite the entrance was a second door. Posing for
effect in the polygonal opening, Grievous granted his opponents a
moment to activate their lightsabers, force pikes, and other weapons.
Also for effect, he deflected the initial flurry of blaster bolts with his
clawed hands, before drawing two of his lightsabers.
His brazenness summoned the Jedi to him in a flash, but he knew
in the first moments of contest that he had nothing to worry about.
Compared to Mace Windu, the four were mere novices, whose
lightsaber techniques were some of the earliest Grievous had
mastered.
Behind him rushed his elite droids, with a single purpose in mind:
to tear into the guards and soldiers arrayed in a defensive semicircle
in front of Palpatine. Tall, elegant-looking, dramatic in their red
robes and face-masked cowls, the Supreme Chancellor’s protectors
were well trained and fought with passion. Their fists and feet were
fast and powerful, and their force pikes sliced and jabbed through
the near-impervious armor of the droids. But they were no real
match for fearless war machines, programmed to kill by any means
possible. Perhaps if Palpatine had been intelligent enough to have
surrounded himself with real Jedi—Jedi of the caliber of Windu and
the tentacle-headed Kit Fisto—the engagement might have gone
differently.
Fencing with his four adversaries—for that’s all the fight amounted
to—Grievous saw six of the soldiers and three of the Red Guards
jolted to spasming deaths by the MagnaGuards’ double-tipped
scepters. One of his elite had gone down, as well, but even though
blinded and savagely slashed by the guards’ staffs, the droid was
continuing to fight. And those elite still on their feet had altered their
combat stances and offensive moves to adapt to the guards’ defensive
strategies.
Grievous enjoyed going against so many Jedi simultaneously. If
time wasn’t of the essence, he might have protracted the fight.
Feinting with the blade in his right hand, he removed the head of one
Jedi with the blade in his left. Distracted when his right foot
inadvertently booted the rolling head of his comrade, the Ithorian
dropped his guard momentarily, and received as penalty a thrust to
the heart that dropped him to his knees before he pitched forward.
Stepping back to absorb what had happened, the two remaining
Jedi came at Grievous in concert, twirling and leaping about as if
putting on some sort of crowd-pleasing martial arts demonstration.
For practice, Grievous called two more blades from his belt, grasping
them in his feet even as the antigrav repulsors built into his legs were
lifting him from the floor, making him every bit as agile as the Force
did the Jedi.
With his four blades to the Jedi’s two, the duel had come full circle.
Whirling, he severed the blade hand of the Talz, then his opposing
foot, then took his life, as well. Mists of blood formed in the air,
swirled about by the ventilators.
The fourth he intimidated into retreat by wheeling all four blades,
transforming himself into a veritable chopping machine. Fear
blossomed in the Twi’lek Jedi’s dark eyes as she backed away. He
had her on the run, poor thing. But he awarded her some measure of
dignity by allowing her to land glancing blows on his forearms and
shoulders. The burns did little more than add a new odor to the
room. Emboldened, she pressed her attack, but was fast exhausting
herself from the effort of trying to amputate one of his limbs—to hurt
him in some fashion.
And all for what? Grievous asked himself. The timid old man
backed to the bunker’s rear wall? The would-be champion of
democracy, who had loosed his clone army against the merchants
and builders and traders who opposed his rule—his Republic?
Best to put the Jedi out of her misery, Grievous thought. Which he
did with a single blade to the heart—for it would have been cruel to
do otherwise.
Elsewhere his three surviving elites were doing well against five
Red Guards. With time counting down, he waded into the thick of
the action. Sensing him, one guard feinted a rotation to the left, then
pivoted to the right with his force pike raised at face level. A move
Grievous could appreciate, although he was no longer in the space
through which the weapon sliced. Using two blades, he nipped the
guard’s cowled head from his torso. The next he speared from behind
in both kidneys. Opening the backs of another’s thighs, he moved on,
disemboweling the fourth.
The last guard was already dead by the time he reached him.
With a gesture, Grievous instructed his elite to secure the bunker’s
hexagonal door. Then, deactivating his lightsabers, he turned to
Palpatine.
“Now, Chancellor,” he announced, “you’re coming with us.”
Palpatine neither cowered nor protested. He merely said: “You will
be a true loss to the forces you represent.”
The remark took Grievous by surprise. Was this praise?
“Four Jedi Knights, all these soldiers and guards,” Palpatine went
on, gesturing broadly. “Why not wait until Shaak Ti and Stass Allie
arrive.” He cocked his head to one side. “I think I hear them coming.
They are Masters, after all.”
Grievous didn’t respond immediately. Was Palpatine trying to trick
him? “I might at any other time,” he said finally. “But a ship awaits
us that will take you from Coruscant—and from your cherished
Republic, as well.”
Palpatine mocked him with a sneer. “Do you actually believe that
this plan will succeed?”
Grievous returned the look. “You’re more defiant than I was led to
believe, Chancellor. But, yes, the plan will succeed—and to your
deficit. I would gladly kill you now but for my orders.”
“So you take orders,” Palpatine said, moving with deliberate
lethargy. “Which of us, then, is the lesser?” Before Grievous could
reply, he added: “My death won’t end this war, General.”
Grievous had wondered about that. Understandably, Lord Sidious
had his plan, but did he actually believe that Palpatine’s death would
prompt the Jedi to lay down their lightsabers? Thrown into turmoil
by the Chancellor’s death, could the Senate order the Jedi to stand
down? After years of warfare, would the Republic suddenly
capitulate?
The sound of rapid footfalls roused him, and he gestured to the
bunker’s rear door. “Move,” he told Palpatine.
The MagnaGuards stepped forward to make certain that Palpatine
obeyed.
Grievous hurried to the bunker’s communication console. The stud
switch and control pad for the emergency beacon were precisely
where Tyranus said they would be. After entering the code Tyranus
had provided, Grievous pressed his alloy hand to the switch.
Palpatine watched him from the doorway. “That will call many
Jedi down on you, General—some of whom you may regret having
summoned.”
Grievous glared at him. “Only if they fail to challenge me.”
Word of the firefight on the landing platform reached Mace and
Kit in the gunship while they were returning to Sah’c. It hadn’t taken
long to piece together what had happened: the Separatists had
managed to hijack a Republic gunship and infiltrate the bunker
complex shield by timing their arrival to coincide with that of the
ship carrying Palpatine, Shaak Ti, and the others. An ARC
commander verified that the hijacked gunship had been piloted by
droids, but the same ARC would neither confirm nor deny that
Grievous had been aboard the destroyed ship.
That, alone, was cause for concern.
Mace and Kit thought they knew what had occurred, and hoped
they were wrong.
In the white glare of spotlights, the gunship that had been brought
down by RPGs was a flaming hulk, dangling from the edge of the
landing pad. Even less remained of the gunship that had delivered
Palpatine to the complex. Fatalities of the surprise attack—one in a
series of terrible surprises now—had been removed from the scene,
but the pad boasted a company of reinforcements, as well as two ATSTs that had been air-dropped by wide-winged LAAT carriers.
This time Mace and Kit didn’t wait for the gunship to touch down.
Jumping from five meters up, they raced across the brightly
illuminated landing platform and directly into the access tunnel.
Steps into the tunnel, their worst fears were realized when they saw
three troopers hauling away a MagnaGuard, holed by more blaster
bolts than would have been needed to demolish a police skimmer.
The hijacked gunship had rescued Grievous after his fall from the
mag-lev, Mace told himself. But had the fall been deliberate—part of
an increasingly elaborate ruse—or had Grievous originally planned to
abduct Palpatine from the train?
Either way, how had the cyborg general known how many of his
forces to commit to such a daring plan?
Unless, of course, he had received prior intelligence on the number
of Red Guards in Palpatine’s detail, and the number of troopers and
other combatants stationed in the bunker complex.
Every meter of the tunnel presented Mace and Kit with fresh
evidence of the ferocious fight that had taken place, in the form of
slaughtered commandos and others. Without limbs, beheaded,
shocked to death by EMP weapons …
Mace stopped counting after he reached forty.
The heavy, hexagonal entrance that was the terminus of the
bloodstained tunnel was open. If the fight leading to the door had
been fierce, the one inside the ravished bunker had been savage.
Stass Allie, her face and hands blistered and her robes singed, was
kneeling by the bodies of the four Jedi Knights with whom Mace had
spoken to briefly during the mag-lev evacuation. Only Grievous could
be held accountable for what had been done to them. The same was
true for those Red Guards whose corpses had been burned open by
lightsaber.
Grievous had taken the blades with which the Jedi had fought.
Here, too, were the shells of two more MagnaGuards.
But Palpatine was missing.
“Sir, the Supreme Chancellor was gone by the time we arrived,” a
commando explained. “His captors exited the complex by way of the
south tunnels.”
Mace and Kit glanced at the door that led to those tunnels, then
turned to Shaak Ti, who was standing by the bunker’s holoprojector
table as if lost. When Mace hurried over to her, she practically
collapsed in his arms.
“I fought Grievous on Hypori,” she said weakly. “I knew what he
was capable of. But this … And taking Palpatine …”
Mace supported her. “There will be no negotiations. The Supreme
Chancellor won’t allow it.”
“The Senate may not see it that way, Mace.” Shaak Ti composed
herself and gazed around. “Grievous had help. Help from someone
close to the top.”
Kit nodded. “We’ll find out who. But our first priority is to rescue
the Supreme Chancellor.”
Mace looked at the commando. “How did they leave the complex?”
“I can show you,” Shaak Ti said. Turning, she activated a security
recording that had captured Grievous and several of his humanoid
guards dragging Palpatine to the south landing pad, butchering the
handful of troopers posted there, scrambling into a waiting triwinged shuttle, lifting off into sunset clouds …
“How were they allowed through the shield?” Mace asked the
commando.
“Same way they entered the bunker, General.”
Mace hadn’t even thought to ask. Had assumed they had burned
their way in—
“They had the entry codes to the bunker, sir, as well as codes
issued earlier today that permitted them to clear the screen.”
Mace and Kit glanced at each other in angry bewilderment.
“What is the shuttle’s location now?” Kit asked.
The commando conjured a 3-D image from the holoprojector.
“Sector I-Thirty-Three, sir. Outbound autonavigation trunk Pseventeen. Gunships are in pursuit.”
Mace’s eyes widened in alert. “Do your gunners know that the
Supreme Chancellor is aboard? Do they realize they can’t fire on the
shuttle?”
“They have orders to disable if possible, sir. The shuttle is shielded
and well armored, in any case.”
“Who else knows of the abduction?” Kit thought to ask. “Has this
been released or leaked to the media?”
“Yes, sir. Moments ago.”
“On whose orders?” Mace fumed.
“The Supreme Chancellor’s top advisers.”
Shaak Ti forced an exhale. “All of Coruscant will panic.”
Mace squared his shoulders. “Commander, scramble every
available starfighter. That ship cannot be allowed to reach the
Separatist fleet.”
Dooku hadn’t fled alone. The only indications of Tythe’s invasion
were the hulking remains of Separatist and Republic warships,
tumbling indolently in starlight.
“We were all beginning to wonder if you were going to return,” a
human crew chief said by way of welcoming Obi-Wan and Anakin
back to the assault cruiser’s ventral landing bay.
Obi-Wan descended the ladder affixed to the starfighter’s cockpit.
“When did the Separatists jump?”
“Less than an hour, local. Guess they had enough of the pounding
we were giving them.”
Leaping to the deck, Anakin laughed nastily. “Believe whatever you
want.”
The crew chief furrowed his brow in uncertainty.
“Do we know where they’re headed?” Obi-Wan asked quickly.
The crew chief turned to him. “Most of the capital ships jumped
Rimward. A few appear to be headed for the Nelvaan system—
thirteen parsecs from here.”
“What are our orders?”
“We’re still waiting to find out. The fact is, we haven’t received any
communications from Coruscant since the start of the battle.”
Anakin took a sudden interest in the crew chief’s remarks.
“Could be local interference,” Obi-Wan said.
The crew chief looked dubious. “Several other battle groups
reported that they have been unable to communicate with
Coruscant.”
Anakin shot Obi-Wan an embittered look and began to storm
away.
“Anakin,” Obi-Wan said, following in his footsteps.
Anakin whirled on him. “We were wrong to come here, Master. I
was wrong to come here. It was all a feint, and we fell for it. We’re
being kept away from Coruscant. I can feel it.”
Obi-Wan folded his arms across his chest. “You wouldn’t be saying
that if we’d captured Dooku.”
“But we didn’t, Master. That’s what counts. And now no
communication with Coruscant? You don’t even see it, do you?”
Obi-Wan regarded him carefully. “See what, Anakin?”
Anakin started to speak, then cut himself off and began again.
“You should keep me fighting. You shouldn’t give me time to think.”
Obi-Wan rested his hands on Anakin’s shoulders. “Calm yourself.”
Anakin shrugged him off, a new fire in his eyes. “You’re my best
friend. Tell me what I should do. Forget for a moment that you’re
wearing the robes of a Jedi and tell me what I should do!”
Stung by the gravity in Anakin’s voice, Obi-Wan fell silent for a
moment, then said: “The Force is our ally, Anakin. When we’re
mindful of the Force, our actions are in accord with the will of the
Force. Tythe wasn’t a wrong choice. It’s simply that we’re ignorant of
its import in the greater scheme.”
Anakin lowered his head in sadness. “You’re right, Master. My
mind isn’t as fast as my lightsaber.” He stared at his artificial limb.
“My heart isn’t as impervious to pain as my right hand.”
Obi-Wan felt as if someone had knotted his insides. He had failed
his apprentice and closest friend. Anakin was suffering, and the only
balm he offered were Jedi platitudes. His body heaved a stuttering
breath. He had his mouth open to speak when the crew chief
interrupted.
“General Skywalker, something has your astromech very
flustered.”
Obi-Wan and Anakin swung to Anakin’s starfighter.
“Artoo?” Anakin said in a concerned tone.
The astromech tooted, shrilled, chittered.
“Does he understand droid?” the crew chief asked Obi-Wan as
Anakin hurried past him.
“That droid,” Obi-Wan said.
Anakin began to scale the cockpit ladder. “What is it, Artoo?
What’s wrong?”
The droid whistled and zithered.
Throwing himself into the open cockpit, Anakin toggled switches.
Obi-Wan had just reached the base of the ladder when he heard
Palpatine’s voice issuing through the cockpit annunciators.
“Anakin, if you are receiving this message, then I have urgent
need of your help …”
The crew chief’s comlink toned.
Obi-Wan glanced from the crew chief to Anakin and back again.
“What is it?” he asked in a rush.
“Tight-beam comm from Coruscant,” the crew said.
He listened for another moment, then added, in obvious disbelief:
“Sir, the Separatists have invaded!”
Obi-Wan gaped at him.
Above him, Anakin lifted his face to the high ceiling and let out a
sustained snarl. Glaring down at Obi-Wan, he said: “Why does fate
target the people who are most important to me?”
“I—”
“Crew chief!” Anakin cut him off. “Refuel and rearm our
starfighters at once!”
Grievous had a good lead on them.
Seated in the copilot’s seat of a Republic cruiser, Mace accepted
that the shuttle couldn’t be intercepted before it left Coruscant’s
envelope. And perhaps not before it was in the protective embrace of
the Separatist fleet.
Regardless, the hot scrambled starfighters were giving all they had
to the chase.
Having access to high-clearance codes, Grievous could have
plotted a proprietary launch vector for the shuttle. But by doing so he
would have put the shuttle at risk of arrest by disabling fire or tractor
beam. Instead, he had elected to avail himself of the protection
afforded by starship traffic in one of the outbound autonavigation
trunks.
Police, governmental, and emergency vessels were permitted to
use free-travel lanes that paralleled the trunks, but even with that
advantage, Mace and Kit’s cruiser was still several kilometers behind
the rising shuttle. Below, vast areas of darkness stained the usual
circuit board perfection of night-side Coruscant.
That the vessels surrounding it were compelled by orbital tractor
beam arrays to adhere to standard launch velocities benefited the
shuttle. The tri-wing benefited even more from the fact that Grievous
was almost as adept at handling a ship as he was a lightsaber. Each
time flights of starfighters attempted to hem him in, Grievous would
lead them on spiraling chases through the thick traffic, inserting the
shuttle between ships, initiating collisions, resorting to firing the
shuttle’s meager weapons when necessary.
Recalled from the battle outside the well, Agen Kolar, Saesee Tiin,
and Pablo-Jill had come closest to incapacitating the shuttle, but,
twice now, Grievous had managed to evade them by bringing the
shuttle’s laser cannons to bear on cargo pods and strewing local
space with debris. Even when the three Jedi had gotten near enough
to launch disabling runs, the shuttle’s shielding and armor had
absorbed the bursts.
With the pursuit closing rapidly on the rim of the gravity well, the
Jedi pilots were executing maneuvers they had been reluctant to
employ deeper in the atmosphere. Weaving among the vessels, the
starfighters fired on the shuttle at every opportunity, scorching its
wings and tail, as the shield generator became overtaxed. Grievous
was unable to match them maneuver for maneuver, but his response
to the attacks was to target any innocent in his sights, ultimately
forcing the Jedi to fall back once again.
Punching through Coruscant’s sheath of gases, the autonavigation
trunk branched like the crown of a shade tree. Thrusters flared as
endangered ships slued and rolled onto vectors meant to distance
them from the fray. With local space crosshatched with plasma trails
and brilliant with explosions, escape was scarcely an option. Even so,
many ships were attempting to follow the curve of the gravity well
toward Coruscant’s bright side, while others veered for the safety of
Coruscant’s moons, and still others sped for the nearest jump points.
Except for the shuttle, which accelerated straight for Grievous’s
flagship.
Calling full power from the cruiser, Kit Fisto joined the three Jedi
starfighters in a flat-out race for the shuttle. By then, too, several
Republic frigates and corvettes were diverting from the principal
battle to assist in the interception.
Despite his earlier misgivings, Mace thought for a moment that
they might succeed.
Then he watched in disquiet as five hundred droid fighters—
gushing from the great curving arms of a Trade Federation battleship
—swarmed forward to safeguard the shuttle in its flight to freedom.
Three among a crowd several hundred strong standing in the
Nicandra Plaza, Padmé, Bail, and Mon Mothma watched the latebreaking news report on the Embassy Mall’s HoloNet monitor. When
word of Supreme Chancellor Palpatine’s capture had first been
rumored, then verified, all anyone in the crowd could ask was, How,
in three short years, had it come to this?
The armies of chaos were parked in stationary orbit above
Coruscant, and the beloved leader of the Galactic Republic seized.
For so many, what had been an abstraction was stark reality, playing
out overhead, for all of Coruscant and half the galaxy to watch.
Now that time had passed, however, Padmé had begun to notice a
change in the crowd. Though a climactic battle was raging as near as
the night sky’s frightening fireworks, most Coruscanti preferred to
keep their gaze fixed on the real-time images of battle. That way, it
was almost like watching an exciting HoloNet drama.
Would the starfighters be able to overtake the shuttle in which
Palpatine was being held captive by a cyborg monster? Might the
shuttle or the flagship that was its destination explode? What would
become of the Republic should the Supreme Chancellor be killed, or
Coruscant occupied by tens of thousands of battle droids? Would the
Jedi and their clone army fly to the rescue?
When Padmé could take no more of the 3-D images or the remarks
of the audience, she wended her way to the perimeter of the crowd to
take hold of a handrail at the plaza’s edge, and to lift her eyes to the
strobing sky.
Anakin, she said to herself, as if she could reach him with a
thought.
Anakin.
Tears coursed down her cheeks, and she wiped them away with the
back of her hand. Her sadness was personal now, not for Palpatine,
though his abduction hollowed her. She wept for a future she and
Anakin might have had. For the family they might have been. More
than ever she wished that she hadn’t been a featured player in the
events that had shaped the war, but merely one of the crowd.
Come home to me before it’s too late.
Her gaze lowered, she caught sight of C-3PO, parting company
with a silver protocol droid that disappeared into the crowd.
“What was that about, Threepio?” she asked as he approached.
“A most curious encounter, Mistress,” C-3PO said. “I think that
shiny droid fancies himself something of a seer.”
Padmé looked at him askance. “In what way, Threepio?”
“In essence, he told me to flee while it was still possible. He said
that dark times are coming, and that the line that separates good and
bad will become blurred. That what seems good now will prove evil;
and that what seems evil, will prove good.”
Sensing there was more, Padmé waited.
C-3PO’s photoreceptors locked on Padmé. “He said further that I
should accept a memory wipe if it is ever offered to me, because the
only alternative will be to live in fear and confusion for the rest of my
days.”
Slapped by fire, the tri-winged shuttle fairly crawled toward the
docking bay of the Invisible Hand. Grievous held to his treacherous
course, even while contingency plans formed in his mind. Wings of
Trade Federation droid fighters had burned a path for the shuttle
through areas of intense combat, but the vulnerable little ship was
not yet in the clear. Many of Grievous’s impassioned pursuers were
so busy defending themselves that they no longer represented a
threat, but three starfighters had managed to stay with the shuttle,
and were continuing to harry it with surgical fire.
The spiraling chase up the gravity well and the twisting transit to
the cruiser had left the ship battered. The sublight engine was
whining in protest, the ray shield dangerously diminished, the
minimal weapons depleted. Uncertain as to where Grievous had
stashed Palpatine, the pilots of the trio of starfighters were being
careful with their bolts, but every hit was inflicting further damage to
the stabilizers and shield generator. Plasma fire from the Invisible
Hand’s point-defense weapons had only prompted them to close
ranks with the shuttle, using it in the same way Grievous was using
Palpatine—as a kind of screen.
The mechanical voice of a control droid aboard the cruiser issued
from the shuttle’s cockpit speakers. “General, do you wish us to
deploy tri-fighters against the starfighters?”
“Negative,” Grievous said. “Save them for when we actually need
them. Continue cannon fire.”
“General, our computations suggest that continued close-range
fire could subject the shuttle to fratricide.”
Grievous didn’t doubt it. As it was, the hull was blistering with
each salvo from the cruiser.
“Ready the forward tractor beam,” he said after a moment. “Fire a
disabling burst at all four of us. Then utilize the beam to ensnare
what remains of the shuttle and draw it into the docking bay—even if
that means dragging a starfighter in, as well. Have battle droids
standing by.”
“Yes, General.”
Grievous swiveled his seat toward Palpatine, who was strapped
into an acceleration couch between two MagnaGuards. The Supreme
Chancellor had been unexpectedly compliant since leaving the
bunker, at times brazen enough to take Grievous to task for his lessthan-perfect piloting skills.
You fool, you’ll get us both killed! Palpatine had barked at him
repeatedly.
What did Palpatine think was going to become of him after they
reached the Invisible Hand? Grievous had asked himself. Was he
under the delusion that Lords Sidious and Tyranus would simply
hold him for ransom? Did it somehow escape him that he wasn’t
likely to see Coruscant again?
Once more, Grievous questioned the needless complexity of the
Sith Lords’ plan. Why not kill Palpatine sooner rather than later? If
he hadn’t been under orders …
You take orders? Palpatine had mocked him.
Which of them was the lesser, indeed?
“Strap in, Chancellor,” Grievous said now. “This could get rough.”
Palpatine sneered. “With you at the controls, I’m certain it will.”
No sooner did Grievous swing back to the viewport than gouts of
fire spewed from the Invisible Hand’s forward cannons. Two of the
starfighter pilots must have sensed something coming, because they
all but glued themselves to the shuttle. Rocked by the burst, the
shuttle lost portions of itself to space, and all systems shut down.
One of the starfighters was blown away, but the other two had lost
little more than their wings.
The shuttle reeled as the tractor beam took hold of it.
With it came the pair of starfighters.
Grievous considered ordering that the docking bay be purged of
atmosphere. Somewhere aboard the shuttle there would be
extravehicular gear Palpatine could don. But with life support failing,
Palpatine was already in enough trouble.
Grievous would just have to deal with the starfighter pilots when
the ships were released from the beam.
The three were scarcely through the docking bay’s containment
field when explosive charges flung the canopies from the starfighters
and two Jedi Knights leapt to the deck, lightsabers ablaze, deflecting
blaster bolts from battle droids as they raced for the shuttle. Before
the shuttle had even settled to the deck, one of the Jedi had plunged
his glowing blue blade straight through the starboard hatch.
Hurrying aft through thickening smoke, Grievous caught sight of
Palpatine’s expression of derision.
“Surprise, surprise, General.”
Grievous halted just long enough to say: “We’ll see who’s
surprised.”
He saw the lightsaber blade retract. By the time he had shouldered
through the hatch onto the landing platform the Jedi had moved to
either side. Even while continuing to parry blaster bolts, they surged
at him, engaging the two lightsabers he drew from his cloak.
The duel raged through the hold. Battle droids lowered their
weapons for fear of hitting Grievous. These Jedi were more proficient
than the ones he had fought in the bunker, but not skilled enough to
challenge him. The four blades seared through the recycled air,
washing the burnished bulkheads with harsh light and outsized
shadows.
Flanking him, the Jedi rushed in.
Grievous waited until the last instant to command his legs to raise
him up several centimeters. Then he extended his lightsabers
straight out from his sides, angled slightly downward. Slipping past
the flashing strikes of his opponents, Grievous’s blades pierced the
chests of both. They fell away from him, faces contorted in surprise,
of the sort only sudden death could bring.
Several battle droids hastened forward, almost prancing in
eagerness.
“Jettison the bodies,” Grievous instructed. “Choose a place where
the Republic can have a good look at them.”
Diminutive between two MagnaGuards, Palpatine was waiting at
the foot of the shuttle boarding ramp.
“Take him,” Grievous said.
Lifting Palpatine by his armpits, the combat droids followed
Grievous through the cruiser, and at last through an oval of
opalescent portal into a large cabin space containing a situation table
surrounded by chairs. Grievous ordered the guards to set the
Supreme Chancellor down in a swivel chair at the head of the table
and to shackle his hands.
“Welcome to the general’s quarters,” he said while he did input at a
console built into the table. Shortly the bulkhead behind the swivel
chair became a hologrammic display, showing the battle of
Coruscant. The flick of a final switch summoned a stalked, eyeballshaped holocam from the tabletop.
“You’re about to make an unscheduled appearance on the
HoloNet, Chancellor,” Grievous said. “I apologize for not providing a
mirror, hairbrush, and cosmetics, so that you might at least
camouflage some of your fear.”
Palpatine’s voice was sinister when he spoke. “You can display me,
but I won’t speak.”
Grievous nodded at what seemed an obvious statement. “I’ll
display you, but you won’t speak. Is that understood?”
“You will do all the talking.”
“That’s correct. I will do all the talking.”
“Very good.”
For no apparent reason, Grievous felt uncertain. “Lord Tyranus
will soon be here to take charge of you.”
Palpatine smiled without showing his teeth. “Then I am assured of
being greatly entertained.”
From aboard his cruiser, General Grievous addressed a captive
audience of trillions of beings. His frightening visage dominating
every frequency of the HoloNet, he delivered a message of gloom and
doom, forecasting the end of Palpatine’s reign, the long-delinquent
downfall of the corrupt Republic, a bright new future for all the
worlds and all the species that had been enslaved to it …
Crushed in among Nicandra Plaza’s suddenly silent multitude, Bail
touched Mon Mothma’s arm in a gesture that promised his imminent
return, and began to writhe his way to the edge of the crowd. Gazing
around, he spied Padmé standing with C-3PO, arms cradled against
her, elbows in the palms of her hands, her face raised to the lightsplintered sky.
Hastening to her, he called her name, and she turned from the
handrail into his comforting embrace, her tears wetting the front of
his tunic.
“Padmé, listen to me,” he said, stroking her hair. “The Separatists
have nothing to gain by killing Palpatine. He’ll be all right.”
“What if you’re wrong, Bail? What if they do kill him, and power
falls into the hands of Mas Amedda and the rest of that gang? That
doesn’t worry you? What if Alderaan is next on Grievous’s list of
worlds to attack?”
“Of course it worries me. I fear for Alderaan. But I have faith that
won’t happen. This attack will put an end to the Outer Rim sieges.
The Jedi will be back where they belong, here in the Core. And as for
Mas Amedda, he won’t last a week. There are thousands of Senators
who think as we do, Padmé. We’ll rally them into a force to be
reckoned with. We’ll put the Republic back on course, even if we
have to fight tooth and nail to overcome anyone who opposes us.” He
put his hand under her chin to lift her face toward his. “We’ll get
through this, no matter what.”
She sniffled; smiled lightly. “If I could keep my concerns focused
only on the future of the Republic …”
Bail held her gaze, and nodded in understanding. “Padmé, if it’s
any comfort to you, please know that my wife and I would do
anything to protect you and those close to you.”
“Thank you, Bail,” she said. “With all my heart, thank you.”
On Utapau, an Outer Rim world of vast sinkholes and lizard
mounts, Viceroy Nute Gunray watched a grainy HoloNet image of
General Grievous lower the boom on Coruscant.
Had he been wrong to underestimate the cyborg? Might this war
actually end with the Republic vanquished? It was almost too much
to contemplate: unrestricted trade from Core to Outer Rim,
undreamed of wealth, unlimited possessions …
Gunray glanced at Shu Mai, Passel Argente, San Hill, and the rest,
a backslapping fellowship all of a sudden. Smiling broadly—for the
first time in several years—he joined them in celebration.
In his quarters in the Temple, Yoda watched a HoloNet feed that
showed the bodies of two Jedi drifting in space, close to the flagship
of the Separatist fleet. The corners of his mouth pulled down in
sadness, he turned to the comlink.
“See them, I do.”
Mace’s voice rumbled from the speaker. “If we can ever break
through this fighter screen, we’ll storm the cruiser.”
“Kill the Supreme Chancellor, Grievous will.”
“I don’t think so. He’s had plenty of chances already.”
“Wait, then, to hear the Separatists’ demands, we should.”
“The Senate will give away Coruscant to effect Palpatine’s
release.”
“Worse the situation will be if the Supreme Chancellor dies. Fall,
the Republic will.”
Mace fell silent for a moment. Yoda saw him in the cockpit of the
cruiser he and Kit had piloted off Coruscant. “What should we do?”
“To the Force, look for guidance. Accept what fate has placed
before us. For now, prevent Grievous’s fleet from escaping to
hyperspace, you must. Recalled, many Jedi and others have been.
Turn, the battle will, when they arrive.”
“Master Yoda, we were close to capturing Sidious. I could feel it.”
“Knew this, Sidious did. Hiding, he is.”
No longer on Coruscant, Yoda thought.
“We’ll pin Grievous here, like the vermin he is.”
Mace severed the transmission, and Yoda tottered to the windows.
Western Coruscant was engulfed by darkness; the sky above,
splintered by rabid light. Calling his lightsaber to his hand, he ignited
the blade and waved it through the air.
Perilous the future will be. A cause for grave concern.
But the battle in local space wasn’t the end.
Beginning, the final act was!
Dooku had ordered the droid pilot of the sloop to revert from
hyperspace for a brief time at the planet Nelvaan. Should any ships
among the Republic battle group at Tythe plot his escape course, it
would appear that Nelvaan was his destination. The sloop’s
Geonosian technology would mask the fact that he had jumped
almost immediately to Coruscant to join Grievous, and to play out
the final act of the drama Sidious had composed.
The abduction of Palpatine had not only abbreviated the search for
him, but also allowed Sidious to escape Coruscant undetected. But
those events had been minor acts. Sidious would never have allowed
the Jedi to expose him. And Palpatine was hardly the prize he
appeared to be.
The greater prize, Sidious had told Dooku during their most recent
communication, was Anakin Skywalker.
“Long have you watched him,” Dooku had said, repeating words
Sidious himself had spoken.
“Longer than you know, Lord Tyranus. Longer than you know.
And the time has come to test him again.”
“His skills, my lord?”
“The depth of his anger. His willingness to go beyond the Force,
as the Jedi know it, and to call on the power of the dark side.
General Grievous will activate a special beacon that will call
Skywalker and Kenobi back to Coruscant, and onto the stage we
will set for them.”
But not to capture them.
“You will duel them,” Sidious had said. “Kill Kenobi. His only
purpose is to die and, in so doing, ignite young Skywalker to tap the
depths of his fear and rage. Should you defeat Skywalker easily,
then we will know that he is not prepared to serve us. Perhaps he
never will be prepared. Should he by some fluke best you, however,
I will control the outcome to spare you any unnecessary
embarrassment, and we will have gained a powerful ally. But
above all you must make the contest appear real, Lord Tyranus.”
“I will treat it as if it were my crowning achievement,” Dooku had
promised.
Hyperspace awaited.
“To Coruscant,” he told FA-4 from his comfortable chair in the
sloop’s main hold.
And with that, the ship jumped.
The two starfighters sat side by side in the launching bay, only a few
meters separating them, engines warming, droids in their sockets,
cockpit canopies raised.
Neither pilot wore a helmet, so Anakin could hear Obi-Wan plainly
when he shouted: “For all the jinks and jukes you’ve taken me
through, there’s no one else I’d rather fly with.”
Anakin canted his head and smiled. “It’s about time you admitted
it. Can I take that to mean you’ll follow my lead without question?”
“To the best of my ability,” Obi-Wan said. “I may not always be
able to remain at your wing, but I won’t be far off, and I’ll always
have your back.”
“When I call for help, you’ll come speeding to the rescue.”
“The day you call for help, I’ll know that we’re both in over our
heads.”
Anakin adopted a serious look. “Obi-Wan, you don’t know how
many times you’ve already rescued me.”
Obi-Wan swallowed the lump that formed in his throat. “Then
whatever lies ahead for us shouldn’t be a problem.”
Anakin laughed lightly. “Who’ll restore peace to the galaxy if we
don’t?”
Obi-Wan returned a tight-lipped nod. “At least you said we.”
They lowered the starfighters’ canopies and engaged the repulsors,
lifting off, rotating 180 degrees, and easing through the launching
bay’s transparent containment field.
Flying abreast, all but sharing a wing, they enabled their thrusters
and banked away from the massive ship. Accelerating on columns of
brilliant blue energy, sluing slightly to port, slightly sinister, they
coupled with their hyperdrive rings and disappeared into the long
night.
[TO BE CONCLUDED]
